Detection of recurrent rectosigmoid carcinoma: prospective evaluation of CT and clinical factors.Twenty-nine patients who underwent curative resection for rectosigmoid carcinoma were followed for 1-4 years by history and physical examination, computed tomography, liver function tests, and carcinoembryonic antigen levels. Recurrences occurred in 13 patients: seven asymptomatic and six symptomatic. CT scans, obtained in 10 of these 13 patients, were positive in nine. Liver function tests were not elevated in any and carcinoembryonic antigen was abnormal in six of 11 patients. CT is the most sensitive test for the detection of recurrent disease.[The doubling time of circulating CEA as an individual prognostic criterion of recurrence in patients with gastrointestinal cancers].In a prospective study of 928 patients with gastrointestinal cancer registered for primary resection, the postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) time courses were analysed in connection with disease recurrence. Only patients with established diagnosis of disease recurrence and complete follow-up to death entered the evaluation of prognostic criteria of the CEA time course. In this group the CEA time courses of 103/201 patients with recurrent disease exhibited an exponential increase of the serum CEA concentration, i.e. a linear relationship of log CEA and time, which allowed the calculation of the CEA doubling time. All 103 patients developed metastatic spread and generally exhibited CEA doubling times ranging between 10 and 158 days, in patients developing peritoneal carcinosis up to 343 days. The individual CEA doubling times of patients with recurrent disease who received no treatment (n = 71) correlated well with the times of individual survival after the initial CEA increase of the log CEA phase (rs = 0.812; P less than 0.001) thus confirming the results of a previous retrospective study. When the survival time is expressed in multiples of the individual CEA doubling time (IDT), no patient survived longer than 10.8 IDT. The median value of survival was 5.4 IDT. Patients with metastatic spread who underwent various treatments of recurrent disease (n = 32) survived distinctly longer showing survival times up to 32.6 IDT. This could be confirmed by comparing the observed survival after the initial CEA increase of treated and untreated patients (life table method) exhibiting highly significant differences (P less than 0.001).Accuracy of monitoring serum carcinoembryonic antigen levels in postoperative stage III colorectal cancer patients is limited to only the first postoperative year.The aim of the present study was to determine the accuracy of yearly postoperative monitoring of serum tumor markers to either detect or rule out recurrence in colorectal cancer patients.A total of 127 colorectal cancer patients who underwent curative surgery were enrolled. The serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9) levels were assayed, and radiological examinations were performed routinely for 5 years after surgery or until recurrence was detected. Yearly recurrence rates (number of recurrences/number of patients assessed in a given year), sensitivities, specificities, and likelihood ratios were calculated. Post-test probabilities were calculated from these values.Recurrences tended to show almost the same frequencies in the first and second year after surgery (20 of 127 patients and 18 of 107 patients, respectively). However, the post-test probability of recurrence in patients with positive and negative serum CEA levels was significantly lower in the second year than in the first year (test positive: 40.0% and 76.0%; test negative: 9.3% and 0.5%, respectively).Measuring CEA can help to identify patients likely to demonstrate recurrence with high accuracy only within the first year after surgery. Another examination, such as imaging, is therefore necessary for monitoring patients at 2 or more years after surgery.Surveillance with serial serum carcinoembryonic levels detect colorectal cancer recurrences in patients who are initial nonsecretors.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels, elevated in a subgroup of patients with colorectal cancer (CRC) at presentation, are serially followed as part of recommended surveillance after initial resection. The value of following serial CEA levels in patients who initially present with less than or normal levels of CEA (nonsecretors) is controversial. This study sought to determine the use of follow-up CEA levels in nonsecretors. A retrospective review was performed of patients with resected Stage I, II, and III CRC. We excluded patients who did not have a pretreatment CEA level, at least two follow-up CEA levels, or in whom CEA levels did not normalize after resection. The patients were grouped by initial CEA values: CEA 5 ng/mL or less (nonsecretors) and CEA 5 + ng/mL: (secretors). We identified 186 patients with CRC; 146 were initial nonsecretors. We identified 22 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer; 6 were secretors and 16 patients were nonsecretors. In the secretors group, CEA was elevated with recurrence in four (66%) of the patients. In the nonsecretors, CEA was elevated with recurrence in eight (50%) of the patients. In summary, many recurrences of CRC are marked by an elevation of CEA regardless of whether the patients initially presented as secretors or nonsecretors.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement during follow-up for rectal carcinoma is useful even if normal levels exist before surgery. A retrospective study of CEA values in the TME trial.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a marker in the follow-up after curative resection of colorectal carcinoma (CRC) is often omitted from follow-up despite guideline recommendations. One reason is the assumption that when a normal CEA value exists before curative resection of CRC, it will neither rise during follow-up. This study investigates this relationship.Data were derived from a study initiated to evaluate treatment regimes for rectal carcinoma (Dutch TME trial, n=1861) from which 954 were eligible for analysis. Recurrent disease occurred in 272 of these patients (29.5%). The pre-operative CEA value was compared to CEA values during follow-up, using threshold values of 2.5 and 5.0 ng/ml.Normal pre-operative CEA values were present in 63% (CEA<5.0) and 39% (CEA<2.5) of patients with recurrent disease. Patients with a normal pre-operative CEA and recurrent disease had elevated CEA values during follow-up in 41% (CEA<5.0), 50% (CEA<2.5) and in 60% with both threshold values when the last measurement was done within 3 months before recurrent disease was diagnosed.A normal pre-operative CEA is common in patients with rectal carcinoma. CEA does rise due to recurrent disease in at least 50% of patients with normal pre-operative values. Serial post-operative CEA testing cannot be discarded based on a normal pre-operative serum CEA.[Interest and limits of estimation of the carcinoembryonic antigen in colonic and rectal (author's transl)].An attempt is made to define the usefulness and limitations of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) radioimmunoassay for evaluation of diagnosis, tumor resection and detection of tumor relapse in 108 patients with colorectal carcinoma. Preoperative CEA levels were correlated with pathological stage and tumors localisations. Increasing levels of CEA were found with advanced stage of disease (Stage C and D lesions). Our results indicate: 1) that an incomplete drop in circulating CEA level one month after surgery was a bad prognostic sign; 2) that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased CEA levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.Persistent high postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen in colorectal cancer patients--is it important?Evaluation of pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels together has seldom been assessed for the prognosis of colorectal cancer (CRC).To concurrently evaluate pre- and postoperative CEA as factors of relapse and survival.The study consisted of 114 patients who had undergone surgery from February 2002 to June 2006 for CRC. All patients were classified into four groups according to their pre- and postoperative CEA levels. Data obtained for clinicopathologic parameters, lymph node metastasis, stage, recurrence, and CEA levels were analyzed to determine their association with survival. Multivariate analysis by the Cox proportional hazard regression model was performed to identify the independent prognostic factors associated with survival.Postoperative serum CEA levels remained high in Group 3 (n = 32). Nineteen patients (59.3%) demonstrated a detectable cause for persistent high CEA levels, while the reasons for those in the other thirteen patients (40.6%) remained obscure. Abnormal preoperative CEA levels significantly correlated with the depth of tumor invasion, lymph node metastasis, TNM stage, and recurrence (p < 0.05). Abnormal postoperative CEA levels were significantly related to the depth of tumor invasion, TNM stage, and postoperative relapse (p<0.05). Patients in Group 3 demonstrated the worst survival rate. Abnormal postoperative CEA levels, lymph node metastasis, and location of the tumor were independent prognostic factors for survival.The survival of patients with high postoperative CEA levels due to unknown reasons may be extended if they are exhaustively tested with sensitive diagnostic methods and treated at an early stage.Cost-effectiveness analysis of postoperative surveillance protocols following radical surgery for colorectal cancer.Up to 30-50% of patients who undergo radical surgery for colorectal cancer (CRC) develop tumor relapse. The aim of this study was to assess various surveillance protocols utilized in a tertiary referral hospital in Northern Italy.Data concerning 373 consecutive patients who underwent radical surgery for CRC between 1990 and 2006 and whose data had been entered into a prospective database were considered eligible for this study. The overall costs and the percentages of recurrence following the various surveillance protocols were calculated.One hundred two (27.35%) of the patients suffered a recurrence after a mean of 17.6 (95% CI 13.9-21.1) months. The combination of physical examination, colonoscopy, thorax-abdominal computed tomography (CT) scan, and serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) dosage was found to be the most cost/effective one to monitor stages I and II colon cancer; while physical examination, rigid sigmoidoscopy, thorax-abdominal CT scan, and serum CEA dosage were found to be the most cost/effective surveillance to monitor stages III and IV of colon cancer and rectal cancer.Adherence to follow-up guidelines and early detection are vital factors affecting the curability of relapsed cancer in CRC patients who undergo surgery. The first five years after surgery was found to be the most risky period for recurrence. Cost/effectiveness analysis indicate that follow-up protocols should be tailored to the risk of recurrence with the aim of identifying relapse when the disease is at an asymptomatic, presumably more curable stage.Use of CEA as an indicator of early recurrence and as a guide to a selected second-look procedure in patients with colorectal cancer.The usefulness of the CEA as an indicator of recurrence and a guide to selected second-look surgery was evaluated from a retrospective analysis of 358 patients with colorectal cancer and from a prospective experience with 16 patients all of whom had been admitted for second-look surgery because of postoperative elevations of CEA only. Our previous experience had shown that after curative resection the CEA usually returned to normal levels (less than 5 ng/ml) within one month, but became elevated at time of clinically obvious recurrence being very high in patients with liver metastases, but only moderately elevated or normal in patients with local recurrence. All 16 patients had previously had curative resection of colorectal cancer; 13 in the rectum or rectosigmoid and three in the right colon. There were 13 Dukes' C and three Dukes' B cancers. All had been followed clinically and by CEA testing at three monthly intervals and were considered free of disease (NED) at time of CEA elevation. The median disease free interval was 13 months (range 4-57 months) and the median CEA prompting admission for second-look operation was 21 ng/ml (range 10-56 ng/ml). The sites of recurrence were liver in six, lung in two and localized disease in six. Two patients had negative exploration for recurrence and were found to have cholelithiasis only (one of these later died of metastases). Resection for cure was done in seven and palliative resection or biopsy only was done in nine patients. At this time, four patients are NED (12-37 months), five are living with disease (10-16 months) and seven have died of disease (2-12 months). The CEA test provides a method of early detection of recurrence and may permit surgical retrieval in selected patients and earlier initiation of palliation in other patients. The longterm effects in patient salvage remain to be defined.CEA directed second-look surgery for colon and rectal cancer.Value of follow-up in the management of recurrent colorectal cancer.The purpose of this article was to study the effectiveness of a prospective follow-up programme in patients after curative surgery for colorectal cancer. Of the initial 151 selected patients, 61 (40%) developed a recurrence in whom only six cases (10%) of potentially curable recurrent lesions were detected. The first clues to recurrence in the 61 patients were history or physical examination in 49%, a rising CEA in 29% and a positive imaging finding in 10%, being difficult to decide which test first signalled a recurrent cancer in an additional 11%. Endoscopy and CEA determinations were the most rewarding investigations. CEA was a sensitive means of identifying disseminated recurrent disease and liver metastases compared with liver function tests or liver ultrasound every 3 months. Endoscopy was useful in the diagnosis of local recurrences. However no follow-up test was capable of detecting recurrent colorectal cancer when it might still have been curable. As a direct result of this follow-up programme 15 patients (23%) underwent re-exploration. No symptomatic patients were candidates for curative re-operation. Of the asymptomatic patients six (four colonic and two rectal cancers) (19.5%) were re-resected for cure. Only three of these were alive and without evidence of disease, 40, 43 and 69 months later so that long term survivors after curative re-resection represent only 5% of all patients with recurrences (7.2% of the recurrent colonic cancer and 3% of the rectal cancer). Our follow-up programme did not permit us to alter the incidence of disseminated recurrent disease, and the effectiveness of the curative re-resection represents an increase of only 1.3% in the global 5-year survival rates for colorectal cancer. Our study does not demonstrate any great value of 'classical' postoperative follow-up programme.Detection of recurrence of large-bowel carcinoma by radioimmunoassay of circulating carcinoembryonic antigen (C.E.A.).The usefulness and limitations of the carcinoembryonic antigen (C.E.A.) radioimmunoassay for the evaluation of tumour resection and for the detection of tumour relapse were studied in patients with large-bowel carcinoma. The level of plasma-C.E.A. was determined before any treatment in a group of 101 patients with histologically proven adenocarcinoma of the colon and rectum. 71% of all patients and 63% of cases with localised tumour (Dukes A and B) had a preoperative C.E.A. value of 5 ng. per ml. or higher. This limit was reached by only 1 of 90 apparently healthy, non-smoking blood-donors. Among 45 patients for whom a complete tumour resection was reported, all patients except 5 showed a drop of C.E.A. to normal values after surgery. The 5 patients whose C.E.A. did not fall to below 5 ng. per ml. showed a subsequent rise in C.E.A. level and were all found later to have a tumour relapse. The results indicate that an incomplete drop of circulating C.E.A. level one month after surgery has a bad prognostic significance. 22 of these patients were followed up by repeated C.E.A. radioimmunoassay for several months after surgery. 8 showed a progressive increase in C.E.A. levels preceding clinical diagnosis of tumour relapse by two to ten months. 6 other patients showed a moderate increase in C.E.A. levels, suggesting a tumour relapse not yet clinically detectable. The remaining 8 patients showed no increase in C.E.A. level above 5 ng. per ml. and no clinical symptoms of relapse. The results demonstrate that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased C.E.A. levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.A retrospective and prospective study of serial CEA determinations in the early detection of recurrent colon cancer.The results of the present study emphasize the importance of minimizing the time delay between a significant elevation in CEA and a second-look operation. Equally important are the frequency of serial determinations, a thorough understanding of the limitations of the assay, and careful evaluation of the clinical condition of the patient.18F-FDG PET/CT superior to serum CEA in detection of colorectal cancer and its recurrence.The aim of this study was to examine whether positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) can detect more cases of colorectal cancer (CRC) than serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), both at initial staging and during surveillance for recurrence. A retrospective review of 639 CRC patients imaged with PET/CT was performed. PET/CT was superior to serum CEA in detecting CRC, identifying 2.5 times as many CRC at initial staging compared to serum CEA and 1.5 times as many CRC recurrences. The current guideline recommendations of utilizing PET/CT only in the context of a rising serum CEA will miss more than one third of all CRC recurrences. Value of serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen, CEA, and gastrointestinal cancer antigen, GICA or CA 19-9, for preoperative staging and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal carcinoma.Serum levels of gastrointestinal cancer antigen (GICA) and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) were determined in 167 patients with colorectal carcinoma. Eighty-eight patients were studied preoperatively, and 79 postoperatively, before, at the time of, and after the diagnosis of relapse. The authors aimed to assess how often the GICA test failed, i.e., was false-negative in patients in whom the CEA test was true-positive and, more importantly, whether it could give diagnostic information in patients in whom the CEA test failed. Before surgery, serum GICA gave similar information to serum CEA in 56 percent of the patients: true-positive in 18 percent and false-negative in 38 percent; less information in 42 percent; and more information in only 2 percent. During the postoperative follow-up, serum GICA gave similar information to serum CEA in 55 percent of the patients: true-positive (i.e., rising persistently from a postoperative nadir) in 27 percent and false-negative in 28 percent; less information in 44 percent; and more information in only 1 percent. Therefore, this test in its present version, where both the catcher and the tracer antibody are the same, NS 19-9, is redundant.[Prospective follow-up study of radically resected colorectal carcinoma. Status after 5 years].207 patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer have been followed up in a prospective, controlled study using serial CEA, ultrasound, colonoscopy and clinical examination for early detection of recurrent tumor. After a median follow-up of 2.5 years, 52 recurrences (25%) have been detected, rising CEA value being the most sensitive indicator (86%) among the diagnostic procedures. 26 patients were reoperated for recurrent disease; in 10 out of 19 patients with local and 3 out of 7 patients with distant recurrence a potentially curative resection was possible. Median survival of patients not operated upon (n = 26) or incompletely resected (n = 13) is 8.5 months, whereas median survival for the 13 patients reoperated for cure has not yet been reached at 2 1/2 years. With respect to resectability, thorough clinical examination and endoscopy have been the most sensitive examinations (both 44%). Aggressive follow-up for suitable patients with colorectal cancer will detect most of the recurrences in an early asymptomatic phase, increase the rate of resectability and prolong survival in selected, curatively reresected cases.Postoperative surveillance of patients with carcinoma of the colon and rectum.The early detection and management of recurrence following curative resection for colorectal carcinoma can prolong survival. However, at the present time there is no consensus on the appropriate follow-up protocol for such patients. This investigation was undertaken to determine which tests and procedures are most useful in detecting recurrence and the frequency with which they should be employed. Another purpose of this study was to identify those patients at high risk for recurrence. Sixty-five patients who underwent curative resection of adenocarcinoma of the colon and rectum were followed for at least two years or until recurrence. Thirty were classified as Duke's A carcinoma of the colon, 18 were Duke's B, and 17 were Duke's C. Mean follow-up was 44.9 months. The follow-up regimen consisted of clinical exam, liver function tests, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level, and chest x-ray every three months for the first two years postoperatively and every six months thereafter, and colonoscopy or barium enema and proctoscopy every six months for the first two years postoperatively and every year thereafter. Seventeen patients (26%) had a recurrence; 24% per cent of these developed within one year, 65 per cent developed within two years, 82 per cent developed within three years, and 94 per cent developed within four years of resection. Recurrence was detected by CEA in eight patients, chest x-ray in five, endoscopy in three, and laparotomy for small-bowel obstruction in one patient.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Lead time of carcinoembryonic antigen elevation in the postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancer did not affect the survival rate after recurrence.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the early detection of recurrence during the postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancer remains unclear. We hypothesize that the tumor with longer lead time of CEA elevation to the definite recurrence may have a better prognosis because of its slower growth rate and closer observation.From 1995 to 2003, 4,841 consecutive patients who received curative resection of localized colorectal adenocarcinoma were enrolled from a prospective database. The patients with persisting CEA elevation after operation had been already excluded. Postoperative follow-up, including physical examination, imaging, and CEA test, were performed according to a surveillance program. A CEA >/=5 ng/mL was defined as elevated. The definition of the CEA lead time was the period between CEA elevation and detection of recurrence. All statistical analyses were performed by SPSS package for Windows (Microsoft, Redmond, WA, USA).The postoperative median follow-up time for the 4,841 patients was 68 months. A total of 999 patients (20.6%) had CEA elevation and recurrence. Among these patients, recurrence was confirmed in 727 patients (72.8%)before, at the same time, or within 3 months of CEA elevation and thus had a short lead time of CEA elevation (SLT group). In 272 patients (27.2%), recurrence was confirmed after more than 3 months of CEA elevation and thus had a longer lead time of CEA elevation (LLT group). The recurrence pattern showed similarities in these two groups. A total of 193 patients (193/999, 19.3%) received a second radical operation, and 806 patients (80.7%) were inoperable. The re-resection rate between the SLT group (146 patients, 20.1%) and the LLT group (47 patients, 17.3%) was not significantly different. The overall survival rate after recurrence showed no difference between these two groups (P = 0.123).Most cases of recurrence were detected at nearly the same time when the CEA level was elevated. Therefore, a more sensitive test is needed for early detection. The relationship between the lead time of CEA and the clinical outcome was not statistically significant. A more aggressive approach to the patient who has CEA elevation and is highly suspect of recurrence may be needed.[Prognostic value of CEA in postoperative monitoring of colorectal cancers].The prognostic value of CEA for the purposes of postoperative monitoring assessed in 45 patients with cancer of the colon and rectum. Values were obtained 1-36 months after surgery in all operable cases. Means were also evaluated statistically at various follow-up times. In patients who relapsed, values stayed significantly higher for up to 6 months after surgery than in those who did not. Cockran's method showed that the prognostic significance of this difference 6 months after surgery was p less than 0.05.[Carcinoembryonic antigen in colo-rectal tumors. Prognostic evaluation and postoperative monitoring].Evaluating serial cancer marker studies in patients at risk of recurrent disease.The proportional hazards model of Cox (1972, Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Series B 34, 187--220), with a time-dependent covariate, is used to analyze serial cancer marker data. A particular advantage of this method is the case with which missing marker data are handled. Analysis of a real data set shows that high levels of the cancer marker carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) are associated with increased risk of death in patients with resected colorectal cancer. Several aspects of CEA marker history are analyzed, including CEA level at death time t, CEA level 200 days prior to time t, and whether or not CEA exceeded 5 ng/ml prior to t. Methods to test the hypothesis of no marker effect and to give estimates and confidence intervals for model parameters are outlined both for continuous and for grouped time-to-response data. For grouped data a likelihood ratio test of the proportional hazards assumption is suggested.Significance of postoperative serum level of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and actual half life of CEA in colorectal cancer patients.The postoperative levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and the actual half life (T1/2) of CEA were evaluated to ascertain their potency in predicting the recurrence of colorectal cancer after curative surgery in patients who had an abnormally high level of preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA, > or = 5 ng/ml). Ninety-four patients who underwent curative surgery were enrolled and 24 patients (25.5%) had recurrence during the follow-up period (median: 30 months, range: 2-69 months). T1/2 of CEA for all patients ranged from 1.2 days to 88.1 days, with a median of 4.4 days. T1/2 of CEA (mean +/- standard deviation) was 11.7 +/- 17.9 days in recurrent patients, whereas it was 6.2 +/- 4.9 days in patients without recurrence (p = 0.0224). The patients' age, gender, size of the tumor, location of the tumor, pre-, and postoperative CEA level, pathologic type of the tumor and Dukes stage had no significance in recurrence. The 1-year, 2-year, and 5-year disease-free survival rates were 95.1%, 81.1%, and 73.8% in patients with postoperative CEA levels less than 5 ng/ml (n = 62), respectively, and 71.4%, 64.8%, and 64.8% in patients with postoperative CEA levels higher than or equal to 5 ng/ml (n = 32), respectively (p = 0.04). Patients were divided into Group S (T1/2 of CEA < 4.4 days, n = 43) and Group L (T1/2 of CEA > or = 4.4 days, n = 51). The 1-year, 2-year, and 5-year disease-free survival rates were 95.3%, 85.1%, and 77.7% in Group S, respectively, and 80%, 67.5%, and 64.1% in Group L, respectively (p = 0.0261). In conclusion, the disease-free survival of colorectal cancer patients was prolonged in patients who had a short T1/2 of CEA or a low level of postoperative CEA. In high-risk colorectal cancer patients with an abnormally high level of preoperative CEA, recurrence may be predicted by checking an early postoperative CEA level and/or by a simple calculation of the actual half life of CEA.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a prognostic and monitoring test in clinically complete resection of colorectal carcinoma.The prognostic and postoperative monitoring capabilities of the CEA assay were compared to pathological staging of the operative specimens, clinical followup including endoscopy, radiology and scanning techniques, as well as DNCB skin testing and laboratory enzyme determinations (alkaline phosphatase and transaminase). A total of 46 patients with curative resection for colorectal carcinoma were studied. This included 23 patients with recurrent tumors compared to 23 long-term survivors without signs of recurrence at the time of the study. Preoperative CEA determinations were a good prognostic tool comparable to pathological staging of the specimen. Post operative CEA monitoring was the earliest sign of recurrence in 14 of 23 patients and was positive at the time of recurrence determined by other methods in 20; it was negative in only three cases. The incidence of false positive results among the non recurrent group became a lesser problem when repeated elevated values were required before considering the patient as having a recurrence. From these data, it seems reasonable to propose the use of a second-look operation in patients with maintained elevation of circulating CEA and no clinical signs of tumor presence, if we are to treat recurrence at an early stage. Chemotherapy would be an alternative way to deal with this problem, since the absence of clinical signs in general correlate with small bulk of tumor which at this time may be more susceptible to chemotherapeutic agents.[Carcinoembryonic antigen: diagnosis and tumor progression in gastrointestinal tumors].Tumour progression in 340 patients with resected gastrointestinal primary tumours was monitored using the gradual increase in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in serum. The commencement of the rise in CEA generally preceded clinical detection of the cancer by several months. The degree to which the rise in CEA correlated with the recurrence of cancer was investigated. There was a marked difference in the distribution of the rises in CEA between local tumour growth and distant metastases. CEA increases of more than 1 microgram CEA/l serum in 10 days occurred exclusively in patients with distant metastases. There was a further marked difference in the distribution of the CEA increase between the group with liver metastases and the groups with peritoneal carcinomatosis or other metastases. The site of the primary tumour had no influence on the CEA increase during formation of metastases.Carcinoembryonic antigen: its value in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer.We examined the value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring for detecting treatable recurrence of colorectal carcinoma. CEA assays were undertaken in 193 patients over a 2-year period. The levels in 34 patients were raised in one or more assays above the laboratory-defined upper limit of normal; 31 cases were reviewed retrospectively. In 10% of patients there were Dukes' A lesions at the initial resection, in 39% Dukes' B, and in 52% Dukes' C1 or C2. Tumours were rectal in 61%. Median follow-up was 3 years (range, 16 years-2 months). In 23 of 31 (74%) there were symptoms or signs of recurrent disease prior to or simultaneously with an observed rise in CEA; in 8 the CEA rise preceded the onset of symptoms or the appearance of signs. Of the 31 cases 26 underwent investigation for recurrent disease, but in only 6 of these was the investigation driven by the observed rise in CEA rather than the onset of symptoms or presence of signs. Three of these six were false-positive results (50%), one has been lost to follow-up, and two had confirmed recurrence. Neither of the two with recurrence had operable disease. One of the two had no further treatment, and one underwent laparotomy at which multiple peritoneal seedlings were found. In both of the two cases going to laparotomy, one of which was prompted by a high CEA, widely disseminated disease was found. Over a 2-year period, serial CEA measurement thus yielded no patient benefit.The value of a follow-up programme after radical surgery for colorectal carcinoma.To evaluate the effectiveness of a follow-up programme after curative surgery for colorectal carcinoma, a 10-year series of 402 patients was surveyed for the detection rate of potentially curative recurrences and metachronous neoplasms. There were 120 recurrences (30%), and 100 of them (83%) were detected at scheduled check ups. Initial suspicion of recurrence was most often based on physical examination, carcinoembryonic antigen assay, or sigmoidoscopy. Reoperation was undertaken in 62 patients, in 26 cases (22%) for cure. The 5-year survival was 48% after curative reoperations. Metachronous adenomas and carcinomas occurred in 38 and 11 patients, respectively, giving corresponding cumulative 5-year incidences of 13% and 3.8%. Altogether, 37 patients (9.2%) had a curative reoperation for recurrent or metachronous carcinoma, and a further 38 patients (9.5%) had adenomas removed by polypectomy. It is concluded that regular follow-up is useful for the patients, and the follow-up schedule must be planned to detect both early recurrences and metachronous neoplasms.Serial CEA assays and liver scintigraphy for the detection of hepatic metastases from colorectal carcinoma.Of 340 patients with histologically proven colorectal carcinoma, hepatic metastases were diagnosed in 90 (26 per cent), in 50 at the time of initial surgery (synchronously) and in 40 during the post-operative follow-up (metachronously). At the time of initial surgery, plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels were markedly elevated in patients with synchronous metastases and normal or only moderately elevated in those with metachronous metastases. During follow-up, CEA levels in the entire group of patients with metastases remained normal in 8 per cent and rose in the remainder: very quickly in 85 per cent and slowly in 15 per cent. Hepatic metastases were diagnosed by strict scintigraphic criteria in 70 per cent of patients and were suggested by liberal criteria in the remainder. During follow-up, hepatic metastases progressed in the scintigraphic image from those defined by liberal to those diagnosed by strict criteria. In two-thirds of the patients, liver scintigraphy proved to be superior to the CEA test in diagnosing hepatic metastases by strict criteria; in the majority of the remainder of patients, the CEA test, particularly in cases with a pattern of fast increase of CEA in plasma, suggested metastases before a definite diagnosis could be made by liver scintigraphy. In only 3 per cent of the patients neither liver scintigraphy nor the CEA test were indicative of metastases. Thus, the two diagnostic modalities, when combined, could attain a sensitivity of 97 per cent, when patients with persistently rising CEA levels and concomitant liver lesions defined by the liberal criteria were grouped with those for whom scintigraphy was unequivocal.The use of serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations to predict recurrence of carcinoma of the colon and the time for a second-look operation.Our patients have demonstrated that serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations contributed to the detection of recurrent tumor and that shortening the delay between carcinoembryonic antigen elevation and reoperation has resulted in an increase from 27 to 78 per cent in instances of resectable recurrent tumor encountered. If these results continue to be substantiated, the carcinoembryonic antigen assay has made a significant contribution in the control of this disease. Serial carcinoembryonic antigen assays should be performed every two months. All benign inflammatory conditions that cause carcinoembryonic antigen elevations must be searched for, and ruled out, before reoperation is decided upon. The physician must be cognizant not only of the significance of the assay but also of the limitations, and he must rely heavily on his clinical judgment.Carcinoembryonic antigen test for recurrent colorectal carcinoma. Inadequacy for early detection.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) tests were performed on 36 patients with histologically proved locally recurrent or residual malignant disease after resection of colorectal carcinoma but with no clinical evidence of distant metastasis. Only nine patients (25%) had abnormal CEA levels of greater than 5 ng/ml despite the fact that most patients had had symptoms of recurrence for several months. Among the nine of our patients, none had CEA values greater than 5 ng/ml, and only three had levels greater than 2.5 ng/ml (3.4, 3.8, and 4.7 ng/ml). The CEA assay is not a sensitive test for early detection of recurrence of colorectal carcinoma.Multivariate analysis of prognostic determinants for colorectal cancer patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels: prognostic value of postoperative serum CEA levels.High preoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels have been well investigated and found to be associated with poor prognosis in patients with colorectal cancer (CRC). However, it has been observed that the outcome varies after curative resection, along with postoperative serum CEA levels; some patients continue to have high postoperative serum CEA levels while postoperative CEA levels return to normal in others. The purpose of this study was to determine the prognostic significance of postoperative serum CEA levels in CRC patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels. Between January 2002 and December 2004, 423 CRC patients underwent operation in our hospital; 181 (42.8%) had high preoperative serum CEA levels and were enrolled in this study. Among the 181 patients, 165 patients had curative resection; the remaining 16 had stage IV disease, so they underwent palliative surgery and were subsequently excluded from analysis. Pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were measured and analyzed. All patients had curative resection and were divided into two groups according to postoperative serum CEA levels: one group comprised patients with postoperative serum CEA > or = 5 ng/mL (n = 80) and the other group comprised patients with postoperative serum CEA levels < 5 ng/mL (n = 85). Postoperative serum CEA levels were significantly related to location of primary tumors (p = 0.042), lymph node metastases (p = 0.009), TNM stage (p = 0.001), and postoperative relapse (p = 0.004). The results of multivariate analysis showed that both lymph node metastases and high postoperative serum CEA levels (> or = 5 ng/mL) were independent prognostic factors for CRC patients after curative resection. Postoperative serum CEA levels can be a single independent prognostic determinant in CRC patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels. Intensive follow-up and adjuvant therapy may be necessary in CRC patients who continue to have high postoperative serum CEA levels even after curative resection.Recurrence of colorectal cancer after hepatic resection.Survival estimates of 95, 65, and 49 percent at 1, 3, and 5 years, respectively, after hepatic resection in 77 patients when all gross metastatic cancer was removed compare favorably with the series of Wagner et al [20] of untreated, apparently comparable patients. In the present series, recurrent disease was evident after hepatic resection, most commonly in the lungs; the liver; and locally, in that order. About half of the 45 patients with a second recurrence were operated on, and the recurrence was completely removed in roughly half of these patients. A median survival estimate of 31 months (range 1 to 67 months) after complete removal of the second recurrence was better than the survival estimate of 14 months (range 1 to 18 months) for those in whom the recurrence could not be removed (p less than 0.01). An elevated carcinoembryonic antigen level as the only indicator of recurrence after hepatic resection has proved to be an ominous prognostic sign.[Determination of carcinoembryonic and carbohydrate antigens in the diagnosis of recurrences and metastases of rectal cancer].A study was made of the results of measuring the carcinoembryonic and carbohydrate antigens using a kit of reagents in 75 patients with rectal cancer recurrences and metastases. The concentration of these antigens in healthy persons was for CEA 6.4 +/- 0.71 micrograms/l, the carbohydrate antigen--19.6 +/- 2.51 units/ml. In this group of patients rectal cancer local recurrence was found in 52, metastases to the liver in 19 and metastatic involvement of the liver and lungs in 4. An elevated level of the CEA was detected in 92.8% of the patients with cancer recurrence (the mean concentration was 99.9 +/- 9.29 micrograms/l), and in 100% of the patients with metastases (the mean concentration was 193.4 +/- 30.42 micrograms/l). The content of the carbohydrate antigen in cancer recurrences was raised in 21.3% of the cases only, in metastases to the liver in 31.6% and in 2 patients with metastatic liver and lung involvement. Thus, measuring the CEA content turned out to be the most specific and sensitive test for the diagnosis of rectal cancer recurrences and metastases. The use of the carbohydrate antigen for this purpose was found ineffective.Predictive value of plasma CEA levels: preoperative prognosis and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal carcinoma.Plasma CEA levels were determined in 280 patients with histologically proven colorectal carcinoma: in 180 once or twice preoperatively and repeatedly postoperatively, and in 100 postoperatively only. Preoperative levels correlated directly with surgical-pathologic state and inversely with the time of recurrence; i.e., groups of patients with more advanced stage showed higher proportion of elevated CEA levels, and patients with higher levels had recurrences earlier. Levels above 20 ng/ml were strongly suggestive of liver metastases or disseminated disease. Postoperative plasma CEA levels displayed three patterns of variation. 1) Levels fluctuating within normal range, below 3.2 ng/ml, strongly evidenced that surgery was effective, and 2) those fluctuating below 7.5 ng/ml indicated usually nonmalignant concomitant disease; in either group no more than 10 per cent of the patients had recurrences. 3) Levels rising persistently from a postoperative nadir indicated recurrence or, when the rise was dramatic, liver metastases or disseminated cancer in at least 97 per cent of the patients.Serum tumor markers in colorectal cancer staging, grading, and follow-up.Early diagnosis of colorectal cancer, a frequent neoplasia in industrialized countries, permits curative surgery. In this study we assessed the clinical role of serum tumor markers determination in diagnosing, staging, and grading colorectal cancer; the role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), CA 19-9, tissue polypeptide antigen (TPA) and CA 72-4 in colorectal cancer follow-up was also assessed. In 114 patients with colorectal cancer, the oncofetal antigen CEA was compared with the membrane-associated glycoproteins CA 19-9, CA 242, and CA 72-4 and with the cytokeratins TPA, tissue polypeptide-specific antigen (TPS) and tissue polypeptide monoclonal antigen (TPM). Overall, the most sensitive indices were TPA and TPS (67% and 70%, respectively). Tumor stage influenced the levels of CEA, CA 19-9, and TPA, but not those of TPS, while tumor grade influenced CEA and TPS, but not CA 72-4, TPA, and TPM. TPA was the most sensitive index in identifying early or well-differentiated colorectal cancers. The sensitivity was enhanced when this marker was determined in combination with CEA, in diagnosing both advanced and early colorectal tumors. Seventy-seven patients were followed up after therapy for at least 18 months. CEA was the most sensitive index of recurrence (58%); however, this sensitivity is too low to consider tumor markers useful in colorectal cancer follow-up.[Colorectal cancer: follow-up after curative resection].From Jan 1978 to Dec 1984, 128 patients had a curative resection of colorectal carcinoma. A program for early detection and surgical correction of recurrences was initiated in 88 patients with a mean age of 61 years (range 24 to 85). Seventy two patients complied with the program involving clinical examination, chest X-ray, alkaline phosphatase and CEA determinations and endoscopy at 6 month intervals. Mean follow up was 36 months (range 6 to 60). A total of 28 recurrences (32%) were detected: 4 local, 17 distant and 7 local and distant. Recurrences occurred in 46% of grade C, 19% of grade B and 0% of grade A lesions. Sixty eight% of recurrences were detected within 12 months and 93% within 36 months after surgery. Recurrences were detected by clinical examination in 71% of cases. CEA determination was sensitive (81% and specific (92%) for detection of recurrences in the remaining patients. Four patients (14%) were reoperated on with a survival of 3 to 26 months, all dying from disseminated disease. We conclude that this program did not help to improve the 5 year survival rate of colorectal carcinoma submitted to curative resection. CEA determination may be indicated at 2 month intervals during the period of increased recurrence risk.Clinical and pathologic evaluation of patients with recurrence of colorectal cancer five or more years after curative resection.This study was designed to evaluate the characteristics of recurrences that occur five or more years after curative resection for colorectal cancer.This study included a total of 352 patients who were confirmed as having recurrence after curative resection for colorectal cancer during the period from January 1995 to December 2000. Of the 352 patients, 231 had early recurrence (less than 2 years after operation), 103 had intermediate recurrence (2-5 years after operation), and 18 had late recurrence (more than 5 years after operation). The clinicopathologic findings of the patients with late recurrence were compared with those of the other two recurrence groups, with special reference to the pattern of recurrence.The rate of late recurrence was 1.2 percent. In the late recurrence group, males outnumbered females by a ratio of 3.5:1 and the mean level of preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen was 4.5 ng/ml, whereas that of the early recurrence group was 30.5 ng/ml. All the lesions in the cases with late recurrence except one lesion were located in the left colon or rectum, the tumors were small-sized and polypoid, and well-differentiated adenocarcinomas were more frequently observed. Distant metastasis, especially lung metastasis, was most frequently observed.Late recurrent colorectal cancer has some characteristics compared with early or intermediate recurrence. Although recurrence at more than five years postoperatively is not common, its possibility should be considered whenever performing follow-up, and surveillance for lung metastasis is recommended after more than five years of surgery.[Effect of serial CEA determination on diagnosis, therapy and prognosis of recurrent colorectal cancer].A rising CEA level did not indicate an early tumour recurrence in the follow-up of 660 patients with curative surgery because of colorectal carcinoma. In case of rectal carcinoma the first rise of the tumour marker preceded diagnosis of recurrence by other means 7.9 months on an average, in case of colonic carcinoma 5.1 months. The long-term survival after secondary procedure was 17.5% for patients with normal CEA value at time of reoperation and surmounted life expectancy of patients with rising tumour-marker level significantly (5.9%). The worst prognosis was found for the collective with rising CEA before diagnosis of relapse by other means, none of whom was saved by reoperation. The resectability rate of metastases was higher than that of local recurrences with nearly identical survival for both groups. Because of the long CEA lead times advances in therapy by second-look procedures are to be expected mainly for patients with pelvic recurrences after abdominoperineal extirpation.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in colonic cancer. Use in preoperative and postoperative diagnosis and prognosis.Usefulness of carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring despite normal preoperative values in node-positive colon cancer patients.The aim of our study was to determine to what extent serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring is helpful in detecting colorectal cancer recurrence in patients if their preoperative serum CEA is normal. Additional major objectives of this study were to correlate CEA immunohistochemical features of the primary tumor with serum CEA levels at the time of tumor recurrence in node-positive colorectal cancer patients with low preoperative CEA values.One hundred fourteen node-positive colorectal cancer patients with preoperative serum CEA levels of < 5.0 ng/ml undergoing clinically curative operations were studied. Primary tumors were evaluated for tissue CEA using the same monoclonal antibody as used for serum CEA determinations utilizing the avidin-biotin-peroxidase immunohistochemical technique.The exact preoperative serum CEA value did not correlate with tumor grade, immunohistochemical CEA intensity or pattern. In the 32 patients who developed recurrent cancer, the serum CEA at recurrence was greater than 5 ng/ml in 44 percent. All such patients had CEA present in their primary tumor. There was no correlation with the exact preoperative serum CEA, the intensity of the primary tissue CEA, or the localization of such CEA and subsequent serum elevation at recurrence.Serum CEA is a useful marker in the detection of recurrent colorectal cancer despite normal preoperative values.Clinical value of whole-body positron emission tomography with [18F]fluorodeoxyglucose in recurrent colorectal cancer.To assess the clinical value of whole-body positron emission tomography (PET) with [18F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) in recurrent colorectal cancer, 35 patients were studied: 15 had resectable liver metastases, one a resectable lung metastasis, eight resectable pelvic recurrence, eight a presacral mass with equivocal findings on imaging, and three increasing serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) without clinical or radiological signs of recurrent disease. PET affected management decisions in seven of 16 patients with metastatic disease. In one of eight patients with pelvic recurrence demonstrated by computed tomography (CT), PET detected unknown pulmonary metastases. In five of eight presacral masses with equivocal CT findings, PET was correct and unexpected distant metastases were detected in one of these patients. In two of three patients with increasing CEA levels and normal pelvic CT findings, pelvic recurrence was identified. Overall, whole-body PET affected management in 14 patients. PET is a valuable tool for staging local recurrence and metastatic disease.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen and liver function tests in the detection of recurrent colorectal carcinoma.The optimal laboratory evaluation for the early detection of liver metastases from colorectal cancer is controversial. This investigation was undertaken to compare the efficacy of liver function tests (LFTs) with that of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels for the early detection of liver metastases. Patients who developed liver metastases after potentially curative resections of adenocarcinoma of the colorectum between 1974 and 1988 were reviewed. The following laboratory tests were serially evaluated during the follow-up period: CEA, alkaline phosphatase (AP), serum glutamic oxaloacetic transaminase (SGOT), serum glutamic pyruvic transaminase (SGPT), and lactic dehydrogenase (LDH). These values were retrospectively assessed from the time of documented liver metastases to identify which lab value(s) were elevated initially. Ninety-two patients were available for study. Average time for the occurrence of liver metastases was 20 months (range, 3-72 months). The incidence of elevation of individual tests at the time of suspicion of liver metastasis was: CEA, 94.6 percent (P less than 0.25, chi-squared); AP, 18.5 percent; SGOT, 12.0 percent; SGPT, 5.4 percent; and LDH, 29.3 percent. When comparing CEA with a battery of LFTs at the time of suspicion of liver metastasis, CEA was elevated with normal LFTs in 64.1 percent (P less than 0.05, chi-squared), the most frequent occurrence. At least one LFT was elevated with a normal CEA in only 2.2 percent; CEA and at least one LFT were increased in 30.4 percent; and both tests were normal in only 3.3 percent. These results indicate that, of the individual laboratory tests performed, CEA elevation heralds liver metastases significantly more frequently. LDH is the liver function test most frequently elevated when liver metastases are first suspected. When CEA is directly compared with a battery of LFTs, CEA is statistically significantly more frequently elevated. In fact, suspicion of liver metastases would have been delayed by the omission of LFTs in only 2.2 percent of patients. Therefore, we conclude that LFTs should be deleted from the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients, decreasing costs without significantly decreasing accuracy.Second look in colorectal surgery.Follow-up should identify metachronous colonic neoplasms and precancers, suture line recurrences, and isolated liver or pulmonary metastases. For some sites of failure the surgical re-resection and multimodal approaches increase disease-free survival and quality of life. The aim of our study was to evaluate the role of the different follow-up plans and the carcinoembryonic antigen directed second-look surgery.One hundred-sixty patients radically resected for Dukes B or C colorectal cancer were evaluated by a follow-up plan (plasma carcinoembryonic antigen every 2 months; echography every 6 months; chest x-ray every 12 months; and colonoscopy at 1 year and then every 3-5 years).Eighty-nine recurrences were detected (55.6 percent). In 72 recurrences plasma carcinoembryonic antigen elevation was present. Eight carcinoembryonic antigen directed second-look surgeries were performed: in four patients surgical evidence of recurrence was found (two isolated liver metastases were radically resected); two patients with no surgical evidence of recurrence developed a surrenalic isolated metastases and pelvic and hepatic recurrences; two patients had a five-year disease-free survival. In the 17 symptomatic patients with no carcinoembryonic antigen elevation diffuse disease was present, not resectable for cure. Four solitary liver metastases, one metachronous colonic neoplasm, and one suture line recurrence presented a five-year survival.The authors emphasize that carcinoembryonic antigen-directed second-look surgery is not acceptable for elevated costs. Intensive follow-up plans are superflous, while the monitoring of the carcinoembryonic antigen and instrumental restaging as an indicator of solitary liver metastases and mucosal lesions are very useful.Detection of recurrences during follow-up after liver surgery for colorectal metastases: both carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and imaging are important.The follow-up of patients treated for colorectal liver metastases (CRLM) is not standardized. The accuracy of an increase in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels for finding recurrences after treatment for CRLM is compared in this retrospective cohort study with the accuracy of routine imaging modalities of liver and chest.Data from all patients in follow-up after intentionally curative treatment for CRLM from 1990 to 2010 were analyzed. All patients underwent the same follow-up schedule. The way in which recurrences became apparent (i.e., CEA increase, routine imaging, or both) was registered. The specificity and sensitivity of increases in CEA before finding recurrent disease were calculated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves. An economic evaluation of the cost per resectable tumor recurrence was performed.ROC curves showed that a significant CEA increase was defined as a 25 % increase from the previous value. Recurrences were detected in 46 % of the procedures through CEA increase concomitant with positive imaging, in 23 % through CEA increase without positive findings on routine imaging, and in 31 % through positive imaging without an increase in CEA. The resectability of recurrences did not differ between triggers. Cost per curable recurrence was <euro>2,196 for recurrences found via CEA alone and <euro>6,721 for recurrences found with imaging and CEA.In the follow-up of patients after liver surgery for CRLM, a 25 % increase in CEA serum level can accurately detect recurrences, but routine imaging is indispensable. In patients with CRLM, we advocate both CEA monitoring and imaging in the follow-up after liver surgery.[Carcino-embryonic antigen as screening protein in the follow-up of patients with surgically-treated gastrointestinal cancer (author's transl)].Carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) was determined in 206 patients with gastrointestinal cancer (131 colonic and 75 stomach) at the 2nd Department of Surgery of the University of Vienna. The value of CEA in predicting tumour recurrence and/or metastatic spread has been assessed within the framework of regular follow-up control examinations after surgery. A postoperative rise in CEA titre corresponded with cancer recurrence or metastasis both in patients with stomach (91%), as well as colonic cancer (86%), whilst low postoperative CEA values correlated with a negative clinical report only in patients with carcinome of the colon to any degree of accuracy (91%). The correspondence was much lower in patients with stomach cancer (67%).Carcinoembryonic antigen: usefulness as a postsurgical method in the detection of recurrence in Dukes stages B2 and C colorectal cancers.Sequential carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) plasma levels were obtained postoperatively in 181 patients with colorectal Dukes stages B2 and C colorectal cancers to assess their usefulness as part of a follow-up program designed to detect disease progression. In all, 1,684 determinations were obtained in patients who were, at the time, free of any clinical or radiologic evidence of disease. If individual CEA determinations are considered and if 10 ng/ml is specified as the limit between normal and elevated CEA levels, both sensitivity (45.0%) and specificity (93.4%) make determination of CEA levels an acceptable screening test in this well-defined population, especially as it also fulfills the criteria of patient acceptance, potential benefit to the patient, and low cost. Preoperative CEA levels were also determined in 93 of the 181 patients, and these results confirm the prognostic value of the slope between preoperative and postoperative CEA levels.Imaging techniques contribute to increased surgical rescue of relapse in the follow-up of colorectal cancer.This study analyzes the results of a follow-up policy in colorectal cancer at our institution and evaluates the possible benefit provided by each test performed.Six hundred nineteen patients who had radical surgery and adjuvant treatment for colorectal cancer were followed up with a protocol that included carcinoembryonic antigen testing and clinical examination every three months for the first two years, every four months in the third year, and every six months in the fourth and fifth years. Chest X-ray and colonoscopy were performed yearly for five years and abdominal ultrasound was done every six months for the first three years and yearly afterward. Abdominopelvic computerized tomography was performed yearly for the first two years in cases with rectal cancer. If relapse was detected, all operable cases underwent surgery if possible.Between 1993 and 1999, 619 patients were followed-up. Mean follow-up was 66.9 months. Two hundred eight relapses were detected, 83.6 percent in the first three years and 73 (35.1 percent) underwent surgical resection. Carcinoembryonic antigen testing detected 44.2 percent of recurrences and 31.9 percent of them were operated on. Imaging techniques detected a lower percentage of recurrences (18.7 percent) but were more often resectable: 52 percent and 60 percent of the recurrences detected by computerized tomography and chest X-ray, respectively, underwent surgery. Median overall survival of patients with resected relapse was 62 months, significantly higher than those who were not operable (12.4 months).Imaging techniques in the surveillance of resected colorectal cancer contribute to early detection of relapse with a high proportion of operable metastatic disease.Unnecessary surgery can be avoided by judicious use of PET/CT scanning in colorectal cancer patients.This study aims to determine the role of positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) in changing the management plan in patients with metastatic or recurrent colorectal cancer (CRC) and to evaluate the role of PET/CT in patients with an unexplained rise in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA).A total of 60 consecutive patients with CRC, who had PET/CT, were identified between 2008 and 2010. All patients had CT scans prior to the PET/CT. Data were collected from clinic letters, CT and PET CT reports and pathology results and cross-checked with the patient's notes.Patients were aged between 43 and 85 years [33 males, 27 females]. CEA was raised in 37 patients and normal in 23. Results of PET/CT were compared with that of CT scan and 33 out of the 60 patients (55%) had PET/CT results which were different to that of CT scan and 27 patients (45%) had similar PET/CT and CT results. PET scan appropriately altered the management in 23/60 patients (38%) and avoided unnecessary surgery in 14 patients. PET/CT had a sensitivity of 86% and specificity of 84%. In patients with an unexplained rise in CEA, PET/CT was positive in only one out of ten (10%) patients.PET/CT is valuable in deciding the management outcome in patients with metastatic or recurrent colorectal cancer. Unnecessary surgery might be avoided by careful use of PET/CT scanning in colorectal cancer patients. PET/CT might not be of value in patients with an unexplained rise in CEA.Preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen level as a prognostic indicator in colorectal cancer.We examined the relation of carcinoembryonic antigen levels to time, site and extent of recurrence in 358 patients with colorectal cancer. The recurrence rate was higher in patients with Dukes' B and Dukes' C lesions who had preoperative levels higher than 5 ng per milliliter. There was a linear inverse correlation between preoperative levels and estimated mean time to recurrence in patients with Dukes' B and C lesions, ranging from 30 months for a level of 2 to 9.8 months for a level of 70 ng per milliliter. In patients with Dukes' C lesions the median time to recurrence was 13 months if preoperative levels were higher than 5 ng per milliliter, and 28 months if they were lower. Preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen levels in patients with resectable Dukes' B and C cancer provided an additional criterion for allocating these patients to groups at high or low risk for recurrence.Prognostic significance of CEA in colorectal cancer: a statistical study.Pretreatment and serial posttreatment carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) serum levels were studied with respect to the course of disease in 222 patients with colorectal cancer. The CEA values during the subsequent six years were expressed in actuarial or cumulative plots in relation to tumour-free period, time of diagnosis of recurrence and other parameters. The pretreatment CEA value was highly significant but gave no more prognostic information than the Dukes classification. The pretreatment CEA had prognostic significance only in inoperable patients. Elevated pretreatment CEA did not exclude the possibility of curative treatment. Normalization of CEA after resection did not indicate completeness of cure. In patients with local or distant recurrences CEA occasionally rose before recurrences became clinically apparent. Positive lead time was 0-625 days. However, in about 40% of the patients clinical diagnosis of recurrence preceded a rise of CEA. Maximal negative lead time was 585 days. Statistically, recurrence without a rise of CEA was exceptional. The results strongly suggest that serial CEA determinations cannot replace physical examination and follow-up.[Clinical usefulness of the study of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) for the determination of the degree of tumor progression, prognosis and monitoring of surgical treatment of neoplasms of the large intestine].Serum carcinoembryonic antigen measurement, abdominal contrast-enhanced computed tomography, and fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in the detection of colorectal cancer recurrence: a correlative study.The aim of this study was to evaluate the correlative role of fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement and contrast-enhanced abdominal computed tomography (ceCT) in the detection of colorectal cancer (CRC) recurrence.A total of 96 patients (40 female, 56 male; mean age, 60.6  12 years) with a previous diagnosis of CRC underwent 18F-FDG PET/CT on suspicion of recurrence and were evaluated retrospectively. Inclusion criteria were accepted as the presence of increased serum CEA levels or positive findings on abdominal ceCT or both. 18F-FDG PET/CT findings were compared with histopathological findings and/or clinical follow-up data as the gold standard. Patients were divided into three groups: group 1, with increased CEA levels and normal abdominal ceCT; group 2, with normal CEA levels and positive ceCT; and group 3, with increased CEA levels and positive ceCT.Whereas sensitivities of CEA, ceCT, and 18F-FDG PET/CT in the three patient groups were calculated as 91, 67, and 96%, specificities were 13, 51, and 62%, respectively. There were 35, 14, and 46 patients in groups 1, 2, and 3, respectively. In separate analyses conducted on the groups, sensitivity of 18F-FDG PET/CT was computed as 100 and 100% and specificity as 88 and 80% for groups 1 and 2. In group 3, which comprised four patients with secondary malignancies, sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT were 94 and 16%, respectively.18F-FDG PET/CT has an additional role in the detection of CRC recurrence with a higher sensitivity compared with CEA and ceCT alone, and 18F-FDG PET/CT is especially more successful in patients with isolated elevated CEA levels or positive ceCT findings without accompanying CEA elevation.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen assay in predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, and survival after curative resection of colorectal cancer.We measured carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in peripheral and portal venous blood, and bile from patients with colorectal cancer, to determine its role in predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, and survival.The subjects were 73 patients who underwent curative surgery for colorectal cancer.The median serum, bile, and portal CEA levels were significantly lower in 5-year survivors than in patients in whom hepatic metastases or recurrent disease subsequently developed. The CEA level in portal blood and bile was a good indicator of hepatic metastases, with sensitivity of 92% and 100%, respectively. However, the accuracy of any CEA measurement for predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, or 5-year survival did not exceed 70%.None of these CEA measurements is accurate enough to be the basis of a management decision. Thus, we suggest that CEA measurement be used to assist in the prediction of a high risk of the development of hepatic secondaries and that these patients are followed up closely after curative resection.The usefulness and limitations of CEA assay in the management of colorectal cancer.We investigated the usefulness and limitations of the measurement of CEA in the evaluation of tumor resection and the detection of recurrence in colorectal cancer patients. Preoperatively, 46 of 90 patients (51.1%) had CEA values of 5.0 ng/ml or higher. The percentage of patients with elevated CEA in whom the CEA values returned to normal one month postoperatively was significantly higher in those who had undergone a curative resection than in those who had undergone a non-curative resection (p less than 0.02). Among patients with normal CEA values, the changes were nil or only slight in CEA values, one month postoperatively. Among 28 with recurrences, 24 (85.7%) had CEA values of 5.0 ng/ml or higher. All 11 with liver recurrences had values of 10.0 ng/ml or higher. In 4 with liver recurrences and in cases where CEA measurements were made, CEA values were found to be abnormal 3 to 10 months before the recurrences and a rapid elevation occurred for a short period. However, 4 out of 10 with local or lymphnode recurrences showed normal CEA values. CEA measurement was useful in detection of liver recurrences, but not so useful in detecting local or lymphnode recurrences.Carcinoembryonic antigen: 3 years' experience in a cancer clinic.Long-term studies on multiple plasma samples of 988 patients with carcinoma of entodermal origin indicate that, especially for patients with colorectal cancer, repeatedly elevated or rising carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) values are a sign of poor prognosis when found preoperatively, postoperatively or during chemotherapy. Persistently elevated CEA values in postoperative patients apparently free of disease are a useful marker for early detection of recurrence or metastases. Normal CEA values are of little or no prognostic value.Results of long-term follow-up after curative resection of Dukes A colorectal cancer.Patients with Dukes A (UICC I) colorectal cancer have a good prognosis after curative resection. It is not known, however, if the outcome is significantly different for UICC Ia and Ib patients or if patients with reduced risks of recurrences can be identified early after surgery. This is of interest, as it would permit a more cost-effective, patient-oriented, and tumor stage-oriented follow-up program. To study these questions, a prospective follow-up database, including 1375 patients after curative resection of colorectal cancer, was analyzed. A total of 296 patients with Dukes A colorectal cancer with a median follow-up of 44 months were studied. Perioperative and follow-up mortality rates were 3% and 14%, respectively. Recurrent disease developed in 10% of Dukes A patients after a disease-free interval of 16 months. Significantly more patients suffering from pT2 (UICC Ib) cancer had recurrent disease than patients with pT1 (UICC Ia) cancer (13% vs. 4%; p <0.05). Preoperative CEA levels in patients with recurrent disease were significantly higher than in long-term disease-free patients (5.3 +/- 1.8 vs. 3.5 +/- 0.6 ng/ml; p <0.05). Curative resection of recurrent disease was achieved in 38% of the patients with recurrences (4% of all patients). Survival analysis showed significantly better survival in patients with Dukes A cancer than in those at higher tumor stages (log rank, <0.0001), and only 39% of all Dukes A patients who died during follow-up had recurrent disease. Dukes A (UICC Ia and Ib) colorectal cancer was diagnosed in 22% of our patients treated for cure, and long-term survival was 86%. There were significantly fewer cases of recurrent disease after curative resection of UICC Ia (pT1N0M0) cancer, so we propose a novel, less intensive follow-up regimen for these patients, leading to a more cost-effective, patient-oriented, and tumor stage-oriented follow-up program.[Clinical evaluation of the tumor marker CA 19-9 in comparison with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in surgical pre- and postoperative diagnosis].A new tumor marker (CA 19-9) was investigated. CA 19-9 is a tumor-associated antigen which is detected by a monoclonal antibody. CA 19-9 (CIS-Centocor) was compared simultaneously with CEA (carcinoembryonic antigen) in 347 patients. 123 patients with gastrointestinal tumors showed a sensitivity of 31% for CA 19-9 (CEA 49%), combination increased sensitivity to 58%. The highest sensitivity was found in pancreas carcinoma (CA 19-9 75%, CEA 66%, combination 92%); it was lower in gastric, colon, and oesophagus carcinomas. In relapsed colorectal carcinomas sensitivity was 53% (CEA 78%, combination 85%). In cases of relapse, tumor markers may become positive even if they were not detectable before resection of the primary tumor. Specificity for CA 19-9 was 100% (CEA 84%) compared to a group of non-malignant diseases including patients with inflammations and patients with nicotin abuse (n = 102). Because of its high specificity and superior sensitivity to CEA in pancreas carcinomas CA 19-9 should be determined in primary and relapse diagnosis in combination with CEA.[CEA determination in the follow-up of colorectal cancers].CEA follow-up checks of 135 patients with colorectal carcinoma are described in a retrospective analysis. Unambiguous correlations were found to exist between clinical tumour staging and CEA findings in the context of both primary findings and recurrences and metastasation. Typical courses are described of 107 patients who received curative treatment. An assessment is made of the value of CEA determination in postoperative follow-up.FDG-PET scan in patients with clinically and/or radiologically suspicious colorectal cancer recurrence but normal CEA.Although frequently used for tumor surveillance, the sensitivity of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) to detect recurrent colorectal cancer (CRC) is not optimal. Fluorine 18-fluoro-2-deoxy-glucose-positron emission tomography (18F FDG-PET) scans promise to improve recurrent CRC detection. We aimed to review PET scans of patients with clinically and/or radiologically suspicious tumor recurrence but normal CEA.A retrospective review of an electronic database of 308 patients with CRC who had PET scans was performed. Only PET studies of patients with normal CEAs and suspected tumor recurrence who had pathological verification were selected for further analysis. Thirty-nine patients met the inclusion criteria.PET was positive in 26 patients (67%) and normal in 13 (33%). Histopathologic evidence of tumor recurrence was seen in 27 of the 39 patients (69%). When correlated with histopathology, PET was true positive in 22 patients, false positive in 4, true negative in 8 and false negative in 5. Overall, the accuracy of PET was 76.9%, negative predictive value (NPV) was 61.5%, and positive predictive value (PPV) was 84.6%. PPV value of PET for liver metastases was 88.8% compared to 73.3% for local recurrence. In two patients with confirmed recurrence, CEA became positive 2 months after PET scan indicating earlier detection of disease with PET. The false positive PET findings were mainly in the bowel and were secondary to acute/chronic inflammation and granulation tissue. In 3 patients with false negative PET, histopathology was consistent with mucinous adenocarcinoma.PET yields high PPV for recurrent CRC, particularly for liver metastases, in spite of normal CEA levels and should be considered early in the evaluation of patients with suspected tumor recurrence.Second-look operation for recurrent colorectal cancer based on carcinoembryonic antigen and imaging techniques.The usefulness of postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring and improvements in imaging techniques have renewed enthusiasm for second-look operations (SLO) as the most effective treatment for recurrent colorectal cancer by reresection following early detection. The aim of our study is to evaluate the role of CEA and imaging techniques-directed SLO.Seven hundred fifty-six patients with Dukes Stages B and C, who had undergone curative resection, were monitored postoperatively using CEA and imaging techniques. An SLO was performed on any potentially resectable recurrence, and in addition, an SLO was done when a persistently rising CEA value was detected.Recurrence developed in 18.8 percent (142/756) of patients, and 90.8 percent (129/142) of the recurrences were detected within the first three years following curative resection. When comparing carcinomas of the colon with that of the rectum, the former were associated with significantly more hepatic and intraabdominal recurrences, whereas the latter had significantly more locoregional and pulmonary recurrences. Seventy-two patients underwent SLO. Of these patients, 54.2 percent (39/72) had all of their disease resected, and 1.4 percent (1/72) had no detectable disease at the SLO. Among the 142 patients with recurrence, 71 (50 percent) patients underwent SLO. The resectable group at SLO carried a significantly better survival than the unresectable recurrence group (41.3 vs. 5.2 percent; P<0.01).Complete removal of colorectal cancer recurrences by SLO, on the basis of postoperative, follow-up CEA and imaging technique findings, results in improved survival.The miniscule benefit of serial carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring after effective curative treatment for primary colorectal cancer.Serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels have been recommended to detect asymptomatic recurrent colorectal cancer and to facilitate curative additional therapy. This study was designed to investigate the outcome of additional treatment for recurrent cancer in patients undergoing primary colorectal cancer treatment in a specialty center and subsequent relapsing with an elevation in serum CEA.Patients treated for their primary cancers at our institution whose followup included CEA monitoring and whose cancers subsequently recurred, were analyzed from a prospective database of almost 1,900 patients. CEA levels of > or = 5 ng/mL were considered elevated for purposes of treatment results. One hundred sixty-three patients were suitable for analysis. Median followup before and after recurrence was 14 months and 16 months, respectively.Fifty patients were able to undergo complete resection of their recurrence, and 26 of these patients are without evidence of recurrence at last followup. Two-thirds of recurrences were associated with an elevation of CEA; this elevation at recurrence was associated with decreased survival (p < 0.05, Kaplan Meier). Of the 109 patients with an elevation of CEA at recurrence, complete re-resection was accomplished in 26 patients. Of these, half remain cancer free. Of those with a normal CEA at recurrence, complete re-resection was feasible in 24 patients.Only 17% of patients with recurrent colorectal cancer undergoing potentially curative reresection have an elevated CEA. If we use the denominator of our patient population using an estimated relapse rate of 25-50%, the overall likelihood of CEA-directed curative re-resection confirms early estimates of less than a 5% survival advantage.[Value of CEA in the early diagnosis of colorectal cancer recurrence in the light of second-look results].Prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen levels in patients with colorectal cancer.To evaluate the prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen(CEA) levels in colorectal cancer (CRC) patients.425 CRC patients underwent curative resection at our institution. Their pre- and postoperative serum CEA level was classified into two groups according to concentration: normal CEA (<5.0 ng/ml) and abnormal CEA (> or =5.0 ng/ml).Of all patients, abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were observed in 181 (42.6%) and 48 (11.3%) patients, respectively. Abnormal preoperative serum CEA level was significantly correlated with the tumor located in the colon, the depth of tumor invasion, the status of lymph node metastasis, UICC stage, and the presence of postoperative relapse (p < 0.05). Concurrently, an abnormal postoperative serum CEA level was also prominently related to the above corresponding parameters (p < 0.05), except for the tumor location. Patients with a failed conversion of abnormal preoperative value to normal postoperative concentration were found to have the worst overall survival rate. Abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were single independent predictors for survival and postoperative relapse, respectively.The identification of abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels may be useful in the auxiliary cancer prognosis or postoperative surveillance of CRC patients.Carcinoembryonic antigen slope analysis as an early indicator for recurrence of colorectal carcinoma.We analyzed the time course of postoperative serum CEA concentrations in 229 patients with histologically confirmed colorectal carcinoma. Preoperative CEA levels were correlated with Dukes' stages, however, the preoperative CEA value was of limited value as a screening procedure. In 42 patients with tumor recurrence after radical resection, a diagnosis of relapse, based on a rise in the CEA concentration, preceded the positive clinical symptoms. Analysis of the CEA time course made it possible to differentiate local tumor recurrence and generalized metastasis, regardless of the histologic type or primary site of the tumor.Is intensive follow-up really able to improve prognosis of patients with local recurrence after curative surgery for rectal cancer?Because more than 90% of local recurrences after curative surgery for rectal cancer appear within the first 36 months after surgery, an intensive and strict follow-up program during this period could improve early diagnosis and, thus, prognosis of patients.Of the 216 patients who underwent surgery for rectal cancer, 127 entered an intensive follow-up program (median follow-up: 42 months); the clinical outcome of the remaining 89 patients was reconstructed with the help of their general practitioners.Fifty eight (26.8%) of the 216 patients who were treated with curative surgery alone developed a local recurrence; pelvic recurrences were prevalent. Eleven (30.5%) of the 36 patients who had recurrence during follow-up, and 6 of the 22 who had not undergone follow-up, had a reoperation with curative intent; the median survival was 19 months vs. 8 months, respectively (P = ns). Four (44.4%) curative reoperations were performed on the 9 asymptomatic patients and in 13 (26.5%) of the 49 cases with symptomatic local recurrences. Median survival was 15 months vs. 14 months, respectively (P = n.s). All patients except one (living after 42 months from reoperation) died within 48 months.In our study, adherence to a strict follow-up program unfortunately proved to be ineffective for improving long-term survival for patients who underwent reoperation with curative intent.The clinical validity of circulating tumor-associated antigens CEA and CA 19-9 in primary diagnosis and follow-up of patients with gastrointestinal malignancies.The clinical validity of monitoring the tumor markers carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and CA 19-9 were investigated in 602 patients with colorectal, gastric, and pancreatic carcinomas. Sensitivity and specificity of the tests were evaluated preoperatively as well as in the postoperative follow-up for early detection of disease progression and recurrence. At a 95% level of specificity as calculated from a group of 150 patients with benign diseases, the CEA test with monoclonal antibody had a preoperative sensitivity of 39% in colorectal cancer and 21% in gastric cancer. On the other hand, CA 19-9 had a sensitivity of 19% in colorectal cancer, 21% in gastric cancer, and 89% in pancreatic cancer. In the postoperative follow-up it was found that a combination of both tumor marker tests was most profitable in gastric carcinomas, yielding an increase of sensitivity from 59%-94%, showing a high degree of complementarity. The gain in sensitivity provided by the CA 19-9 test over the CEA-test in colorectal cancer was very low. The gain in sensitivity, however, provided by the CEA test over the CA 19-9 test in pancreatic carcinoma was also very low. On the basis of these results it has to be recommended that cases with pancreatic carcinoma are to be monitored most efficiently with the CA 19-9 test, whereas in cases with colorectal cancer the CEA test should be used primarily. However, in gastric cancer the combined use of CEA and CA 19-9 represents a highly valuable basis for monitoring the course of disease.Value of postoperative surveillance after radical surgery for colorectal cancer: results of a cohort study.Early detection of recurrence after curative resection for primary colorectal cancer should improve patients' prognosis. However, the usefulness of postoperative surveillance programs has not been clarified yet. The present cohort study was aimed at assessing the effectiveness of systematic follow-up in patients with colorectal cancer who were operated on for cure, regarding both rate of tumor recurrence amenable to curative-intent surgery and rate of survival.One hundred ninety-nine colorectal cancer patients who underwent radical primary surgery were followed according a well-defined postoperative surveillance program, which consisted of laboratory studies (including serum carcinoembryonic antigen assay) every three months, physical examination and abdominal ultrasound or computed tomography every six months, and chest radiograph and total colonoscopy once per year. Cohorts were defined according to patients' compliance with the proposed follow-up program. A multivariate regression model was constructed to predict survival.One hundred forty patients were considered to be compliant with the surveillance program, whereas the remaining 59 patients occasionally attended follow-up investigations or did not comply at all. Although there were no differences in the overall recurrence rate (38 vs. 41 percent; P = 0.52), curative-intent reoperation was possible in 18 patients (34 percent) of those with tumor recurrence in the compliant cohort but in only 3 patients (12 percent) in the noncompliant cohort (P = 0.05). Similarly, the probability of survival was higher in the compliant cohort, both regarding overall (63 vs. 37 percent at 5 years; P < 0.001) and cancer-related (69 vs. 49 percent at 5 years; P < 0.02) rates. Cox regression analysis disclosed that only a more advanced TNM stage (odds ratio, 8.17; 95 percent confidence interval, 1.13-59.29) and noncompliance with the postoperative surveillance program (odds ratio, 2.32; 95 percent confidence interval, 1.50-3.60) had an independent negative impact on survival.Systematic postoperative surveillance in patients with colorectal cancer who were operated on for cure increases both the rate of tumor recurrence amenable to curative-intent surgery and rate of survival.Follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer.Predictive factors of early relapse in UICC stage I-III colorectal cancer patients after curative resection.To predict the clinicopathologic factors for early relapse of UICC stage I-III colorectal cancer (CRC) patients undergoing curative resection and thus to identify a subgroup of patients who are at high risk for postoperative early relapse.Between January 2001 and June 2007, a total of 778 UICC stage I-III CRC patients who underwent a radical resection and regular follow-up were retrospectively analyzed. Of these 778 CRC patients, 521 colon cancer and 257 rectal cancer cases were analyzed, respectively, to determine the predictors of early relapse postoperatively. These 778 patients were followed-up intensively, and their outcomes were investigated retrospectively.Out of 521 colon cancer patients, postoperative relapse after primary resection was found in 142 (27.3%) patients, and 77 (54.2%) of 142 recurrent colon cancer patients were classified as postoperative early relapse. Meanwhile, among 257 rectal cancer patients, postoperative relapse was found in 68 (26.5%) patients and 44 (64.7%) of 68 recurrent rectal cancer patients were identified as postoperative early relapse. Forty-nine (63.6%) of 77 early relapsed colon cancer patients were stage III, and likewise, 26 (59.1%) of 44 early relapsed rectal cancer patients were stage III. Univariately, postoperative early relapse of colon cancer patients was significantly correlated with the presence of vascular invasion (P < 0.001), perineural invasion (P < 0.001), high postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level (P = 0.001), and type of surgery (P = 0.016). Using a Cox proportional hazards analysis, the presence of vascular invasion (P = 0.033), perineural invasion (P = 0.005), and high postoperative CEA levels (P = 0.001) were demonstrated to be independent predictors of postoperative early relapse of colon cancer patients, while in rectal cancer patients, both vascular invasion (P = 0.039) and perineural invasion (P = 0.008) were statistically significant predictors of early relapse by univariate analysis. Using a Cox proportional hazards analysis, only perineural invasion (P = 0.043) was an independent factor. Early relapse cases had significant lower overall survival rates than non-early relapse cases either in colon cancer (P < 0.001) or in rectal cancer (P = 0.0091) patients.This study suggests that vascular invasion, perineural invasion, and postoperative CEA level may be significant factors for postoperative early relapse of colon cancer; while only perineural invasion is considered to be a significant predictor in rectal cancer patients. Identification of these high-risk UICC stage I-III CRC patients of early relapse is important, and thus could help to define patients with this tumor entity for an enhanced follow-up and therapeutic program.Strict follow-up programme including CT and F-FDG-PET after curative surgery for colorectal cancer.The risk of local recurrence following curative surgery for colorectal cancer (CRC) is up to 50%. A rigorous follow-up program may increase survival. Guidelines on suitable methods for scheduled follow up examinations are needed. This study evaluates a strict follow-up program including carcinogenic embryonic antigen (CEA), chest X-ray, abdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and (18)F-FDG positron emission tomography (FDG-PET).A cohort of 132 patients, treated by surgery with curative intent for CRC, was included. Patients were followed prospectively with scheduled controls at 3, 6, 12 and 24 months after curative surgery. CEA, chest X-ray, US, CT and FDG-PET supplemented by clinical examination. The end-point was recurrence. Sensitivity and specificity was estimated 2 years after surgery.Of the 132 patients included in the study, 25 experienced recurrence, detected at scheduled controls (n = 18) and at intervals between them (n = 7). The results of CT and FDG-PET were correlated with recurrence. CT combined with FDG-PET had the highest specificity and sensitivity.A total of 72% of recurrences were detected at scheduled controls. The findings supported a strict follow-up program following curative surgery for colorectal cancer. FDG-PET combined with CT should be included in control programs.Predictive value of plasma CEA in patients with colorectal carcinoma.Two years follow-up of 46 patients with colorectal carcinoma resected "for cure" shows that of the nine patients with an elevated (less than 5 ng/ml) CEA plasma titer one to six months after surgery, only one, or 11%, had remained disease free. Of the 38 patients with normal (less than 5 ng/ml) plasma CEA, 27, or 71%, were free of disease two years after surgery. In another 85 patients presenting six months to ten years after resection "for cure" of their colorectal carcinoma, normal CEA levels were found in 73, and only five, or 6.4%, of these presented with disease progression when followed for two years; of the 12 patients that presented with CEA values less than 5 ng/ml, disease progression was evident in eight or 67%; in eight patients with CEA levels of greater than 10 ng/ml, the proportion of patients with disease progression increased to 87.5% (7/8). When a patient with a history of colorectal cancer, but seemingly free of disease, presents with levels not only repeatedly above normal (greater than 5 ng/ml) but above the levels found in some nonmalignant conditions (greater than 10 ng/ml), thorough re-examination of the patient to locate the site of possible disease progression is indicated. In 14 such patients further diagnostic methods showed local recurrences in four, metastasis limited to the liver in six, and other metastasis in four. In conclusion, in patients with colorectal carcinoma postoperative elevated CEA plasma levels are a sign of poor prognosis. Consistently elevated CEA levels (greater than 10 ng/ml) are a strong indication of disease progression.Results of CEA-initiated second-look surgery for recurrent colorectal cancer.[Usefulness of evaluation of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and soluble fragments of cytokeratin 18-th (TPS) in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer].The aim of this study is to diagnose the evaluation of concentration of CEA and TPS in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer.We measured 178 consecutive patients with histopathologically confirmed colorectal cancer: 101 men and 78 women ages 22-86 (average age 54.7). Markers' CEA nad TPS concentration were evaluated before operation and every month after operation during the first 3 months and then every 3 months during 2 years. Relapse was detected in 47 patients.In postoperative period in non-relapse group the mean (the average) concentration of CEA was 1.92+/-2.03 ng/ml and TPS 65.54+/-33.96 U/l and respectively in relapse group for CEA was 1.92+/-2.03 ng/ml and for TPS 65.54+/-33.96 U/l. The obtained results in investigated group show significantly statistical. The relapse was confirmed by using CEA concentration in 42 patients (89.4%). In case of TPS concentration relapse was confirmed in 38 patients (80.85%). The relapse was detected in 45 patients (95.74) if increase in CEA or TPS concentration was treated as a way of detecting relapse. TPS markers point out that the increase of TPS concentartion may be ahead of relapse symptoms at about 2-6 months.TPS is a useful marker in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer. The evaluation of TPS concentration allow to diagnose the recurrence of colorectal cancer earlier than by using burden markers--CEA. Common evaluation of TPS and CEA increase sensitivity in detection of relapse in patients with colorectal cancer.Correlation of single and serial CEA determinations with the clinical evolution of cancer patients.The correlation between CEA results and the clinical evolution of 56 patients with breast and colorectal cancer, was studied. In mammary cancer (41 patients) there was a correspondence of 75% between single initial CEA values and clinical state at the time of the determination. For colorectal cancer patients the correspondence was 80%. A follow up of the patients during 4 years permitted the evaluation of serial CEA results in the prognosis of the disease. Two or more consecutive CEA results with the same significance (increased or normal) correlated better than single values with the clinical evolution of the disease (93% of correspondence). Normal values in patients with active disease were indicative of favourable prognosis; the appearance of single values above normal but below three times the upper normal limit, do not justify changes in the installed therapy. Two or more consecutive increased results are indicative of present or future deterioration of the patient. Cases of non-correspondence between consecutive serial. CEA results and clinical evolution of the patient are considered as "real false results" (7%). Serial CEA determination resulted very useful in the follow up of the oncological patient in the frame of other laboratory and diagnostic means, as a part of the periodic clinical control.[Value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the diagnosis and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer].[Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in surgically treated cancer of the large intestine].Preoperative CEA value. Dukes stage and recurrence rate have been evaluated in 112 patients with large bowel cancer. Recurrence rate within 24 months was significantly higher (33% vs. 10%, p = 0.01) for preoperative CEA values of more than 5 ng/ml. In patients with moderately or poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma the recurrence rate was nearly 40% if the preoperative CEA value was elevated. Among 13 CEA-detected early recurrences, 3 (23%) have been cured by resection.Serum CA 242 and CEA detect different patients with recurrent colorectal cancer.The aim of this study was to investigate the clinical value of CA 242 and CEA in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer. Serial serum samples were available for analysis in 67 patients with subsequent recurrence, of which 36 patients had been treated for colonic and 31 patients for rectal cancer. Liver metastases were found in 32 patients, local recurrences in 18 patients, lung metastases in 11 patients and other distant metastases in 6 patients. The same serum samples were used in quantitating the serum levels of both CA 242 and CEA. At the time of clinical recurrence an elevated CA 242 level was found in 41 patients and an elevated CEA level in 49 patients. Thirty-six patients (54%) showed an elevation of both CA 242 and CEA, five patients (7%) had increased CA 242 alone and 13 patients (19%) increased CEA alone. Altogether, 54 patients (81%) showed an elevation of either or both markers at the time of clinical recurrence. Initially CA 242 alone began to rise in 14 patients (21%) and CEA alone in 16 patients (24%). The lead time was calculated from 28 patients that had four or more serum samples available during follow-up. CA 242 increased in median 5,7 months and CEA in median 3,4 months before clinical recurrence (p=0.34). CA 242 was more sensitive for lung metastases (64%) than CEA (45%), whereas CEA was superior to CA 242 in liver metastases (88% versus 72%, respectively) and in local recurrences (56% versus 39%, respectively). Both CA 242 and CEA seem to be useful in early diagnosis of a recurrence in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen and recurrent colorectal cancer.Tumor markers in patients with relapse of colorectal carcinoma.To evaluate CEA and CA19-9 in a long-term follow-up after radical surgery for colorectal cancer.A total of 1,090 patients were operated on for colorectal cancer, 716 patients underwent R0 resection, 631 patients were under further surveillance, relapse was diagnosed in 122 patients (20%), 74 patients were indicated for reoperation The resectability of the relapse was 35%. An AxSYM instrument (Abbott) was used for analysis.At the time of relapse both markers were normal in 31% of the patients. When relapse was diagnosed, in patients with normal preoperative levels, CEA and CA19-9 were below cut-off in 48% and 79%, respectively, and in those with primary elevation, they were again elevated in 78% and 64%, respectively.The surveillance based only on CEA and/or CA19-9 was cost-effective, but failed to disclose 1/3 of patients suffering from relapse; these markers must be combined with liver and chest imaging methods and colonoscopy.Pre- and postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen determinations in hepatic resection for colorectal metastases. Predictive value and implications for adjuvant treatment based on multivariate analysis.The object of this study was to evaluate the prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in the resectional treatment of colorectal hepatic metastases. The main question was whether postoperative CEA levels correlated with survival and the time to recurrence.Despite numerous investigations on prognostic factors in colorectal cancer, only sparse data are available to estimate the patient's individual risk for tumor recurrence postoperatively. It is controversial whether preoperative CEA values are of prognostic significance, and after observing the kinetics of CEA decline, elevated CEA levels postoperatively were found to be an ominous sign. CEA therefore could indicate the presence of a tumor burden after resection.One hundred sixty-six patients undergoing hepatic resection for colorectal metastases with curative intent were prospectively documented and underwent multivariate analysis for indicators of prognosis.Abnormal preoperative CEA levels were not of prognostic significance compared with values within the normal range (survival, 36 vs. 30 months; p = 0.12; disease-free survival, 12 vs. 10 months; p = 0.82). The postoperative serum CEA level, however, was the most predictive factor with regard to survival and the disease-free interval. Patients in whom CEA levels were abnormal before surgery and returned into the normal range after resection had significantly better survival times (37 vs. 23 months, p = 0.0001) and disease-free survival times (12 vs. 6.2 months, p = 0.0001) compared with patients with persistently abnormal values.Pre- and postoperative determination of the serum CEA level is mandatory to judge whether a curative resection has been performed and whether tumor has been left behind after the operation. Postoperative CEA levels also should be used as a stratification criterion in adjuvant treatment studies after hepatic resection to indicate patients with a high risk of tumor recurrence.An evaluation of postoperative follow-up tests in colon cancer patients treated for cure.Currently patients with colon cancer who are potentially cured by surgery are followed periodically with physical examinations, blood tests and imaging studies to detect tumor recurrence early, on the presumption that intervention can effect outcome. There is little information to indicate whether frequent visits to the doctor's office or frequent testing improves survival or quality of life.Ninety-eight patients with resected stage B2, B3 or C (modified Astler-Coller) colon cancer who developed recurrent disease while enrolled in prospective adjuvant trials at Mayo Clinic sponsored by the North Central Cancer Treatment Group were studied to evaluate the utility of follow-up tests to detect the first recurrence of colon cancer and the outcome following various interventions for these recurrences. These patients had a history, physical examination, complete blood count, chemistry panel and chest x-ray approximately every 3-4 months in the 1st year and then every 6-12 months thereafter for a total of 5 years. Bowel evaluation was done at 6 months, 12 months and annually thereafter. In addition, a minority of patients had carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) testing, and radioisotope liver scans at various intervals.Symptoms signaled the diagnosis of recurrent disease in 55 patients, physical examination in 4 patients, and abnormalities in chest x-ray in 18 patients. An elevated CEA was the initial abnormal test in 5 patients, abnormal liver scans in 5 patients, elevated liver function tests in 6 patients and laparotomy for other reasons in 2 patients. Hemoglobin, barium enema, and fecal blood testing were useful in 1 patient each. Thirty-one percent of recurrences were diagnosed between scheduled visits. In our series, histories, physical examinations, and chest x-rays led to the detection of 79% of the recurrences while liver function tests, liver scans and CEAs led to the detection of 16% of recurrences. Sixteen patients underwent resection for cure for their first recurrence; the diagnosis of recurrence was signaled by symptoms in 6 patients, chest x-ray in 6 patients and abnormal liver function tests, CEA, hemoglobin, and laparotomy for colostomy closure in 1 patient each.The majority of tumor recurrences were detected by symptoms, physical examinations and chest x-rays. Testing for asymptomatic tumor recurrences during the 1st follow-up year is likely to be much less fruitful for detecting resectable recurrences than testing patients in the 2nd through 4th follow-up years. Patients who had a disease recurrence in the 1st postoperative year were less likely to be candidates for curative intent surgery. Lower tumor grade at initial diagnosis correlated both with likelihood of undergoing secondary surgical resection and the chance of doing well following this. These data may be helpful for defining more appropriate follow-up test for detection of tumor recurrence in patients with resected colon cancer.Limitations of CEA monitoring as a guide to second-look surgery in colorectal cancer follow-up.Forty-two patients with localized colorectal cancer (Dukes' A, B, C stages) were treated with potentially curative surgery and controlled with a follow-up program, which included CEA monitoring, for a period ranging from 12 to 48 months (median 33 months). During this period, we observed recurrent neoplastic disease in 14 patients. A retrospective analysis of the results showed that: 1. patients with a preoperative CEA value greater than 20 ng/ml have a significantly higher risk of recurrence than the patients with CEA less than 20 ng/ml; 2. sensitivity of the CEA test was good for metastatic recurrent disease, fairly good for residual neoplastic disease, but insufficient for local recurrence; 3. test-specificity was poor, as demonstrated by the negative results of four exploratory laparotomies performed exclusively on the basis of increased CEA levels. Since the principal aim of a second-look operation is the cure of local recurrence, this type of surgery cannot be proposed only on the basis of increased CEA levels.Postoperative surveillance recommendations for early stage colon cancer based on results from the clinical outcomes of surgical therapy trial.Intensive postoperative surveillance is associated with improved survival and recommended for patients with late stage (stage IIB and III) colon cancer. We hypothesized that stage I and IIA colon cancer patients would experience similar benefits.Secondary analysis of data from the Clinical Outcomes of Surgical Therapy trial was performed by analyzing results according to TNM stage; early (stage I and IIA, 537 patients) and late (stage IIB and III, 254 patients) stage disease. Five-year recurrence rates were higher in patients with late (35.7%) versus early stage disease (9.5%). Early and late stage salvage rates, recurrence patterns and methods of first detection were compared by chi(2) test.Salvage rates for early- and late-stage disease patients with recurrence were the same (35.9% v 37%; P = .9, respectively). Median survival after second surgery after recurrence was 51.2 and 35.8 months for early- and late-stage patients, respectively. Single sites of first recurrence did not significantly differ between early and late stage, but multiple sites of recurrence occurred less often in early-stage patients (3.6% v 28.6%, for early v late, respectively; P < .001). METHODS of first detection of recurrence were not significantly different: carcinoembryonic antigen (29.1% v 37.4%), computed tomography scan (23.6% v 26.4%), chest x-ray (7.3% v 12.1%), and colonoscopy (12.7% v 8.8%), for early versus late stage disease, respectively.Patients with early-stage colon cancer have similar sites of recurrence, and receive similar benefit from postrecurrence therapy as late-stage patients; implementation of surveillance guidelines for early-stage patients is appropriate.Postsurgical surveillance of colon cancer: preliminary cost analysis of physician examination, carcinoembryonic antigen testing, chest x-ray, and colonoscopy.This study is the first to examine the relative and absolute costs of physician examination, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assessment, chest x-ray, and colonoscopy in detecting recurrent disease in patients who have undergone surgical resection for primary colon carcinoma.Of the 1356 Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group patients in Intergroup Protocol 0089 who underwent surgical resection for Dukes' B2 and C colon carcinoma, 421 patients who developed recurrent disease were reviewed. Follow-up testing was performed according to protocol guidelines, with the cost of each test equal to 1995 Medicare reimbursement. Follow-up was defined as the time to recurrence for the 421 patients in whom disease recurred (mean 18.6 months) or up to 5 years for the additional 930 patients in whom disease did not recur (mean 38.6 months). Patients were divided into three categories: nonrecurrent, recurrent but not resectable, and recurrent but resectable with curative intent. The estimated mean cost of each test in detecting group 3 (recurrent but resectable) patients was calculated.Of the 421 patients who developed recurrent disease, 96 underwent surgical resection of their disease with curative intent (group 3). For group 3 patients, the first indication of recurrent disease was CEA testing (30), chest x-ray (12), colonoscopy (14), and other (40). Of the 40 "other" patients, 24 presented with symptoms. Routine physician examination, however, failed to identify a single resectable recurrence, and the total cost for physician examination was $418,615. The detection rate for CEA testing was 2.2%, the total cost was $170,880, and the cost per recurrence was $5,696. The detection rate for chest x-ray was 0.9%, the total cost was $120,934, and the cost per recurrence was $10,078. The detection rate of colonoscopy was 1%, the total cost was $641,344, and the cost per recurrence was $45,810.CEA measurement was the most cost-effective test in detecting potentially curable recurrent disease. Physician visits were useful only in the evaluation of symptoms; a routine physician examination had no added benefit.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen, magnetic resonance imaging, and positron emission tomography-computed tomography in the evaluation of patients with suspected local recurrence of colorectal cancer.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and positron emission tomography (PET)-computed tomography (CT) in detection of local recurrence of colorectal cancer is evaluated in 71 patients, selected due to suspected relapse at CT follow-up. Recurrence was confirmed by histology in 18 cases and excluded in 25 cases. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy were as follows: 44.4%, 92.5%, 66.7%, 83.1%, and 80.3% for CEA; 88.9%, 73.6%, 53.3%, 95.1%, and 77.5% for MRI; and 94.4%, 73.6%, 54.8%, 97.5%, and 78.9% for PET-CT. A diagnostic protocol integrating CEA and dedicated imaging studies is to be advocated.[The CEA-concentration in plasma of patients with colorectal carcinoma and polyps has been determined by radioimmunoassay (RIA, Z-gel-method)].82% of the cancer patients and 52% of the patients with polyps showed CEA levels above the upper normal limit of 2,5 microgram/1. CEA-values of more than 10 microgram/1 could only be detected in patients with carcinoma. Complete removal of the tumour by surgery has been followed by a marked decrease of prior increased plasma-CEA to values in the normal range, which could not be observed in the cases with tumour residues or metastases. In the patient's follow-up recurrence or metastases could be recognized several months before clinical detection by a renewed increased of the CEA-level in plasma.First alert for recurrence during follow-up after potentially curative resection for colorectal carcinoma: CA 19-9 should be included in surveillance programs.The aim of this study was to evaluate the contribution of each examination included in the postoperative surveillance program, especially that of serum tumor markers.Patients who underwent curative surgery for colorectal carcinoma (CRC) from January 2000 to December 2006 were enrolled. The postoperative surveillance program in our department includes tumor marker (carcinoembryonic antigen [CEA] and carbohydrate antigen [CA] 19-9) measurement every 3 months for 5 years, chest radiograph or chest computed tomography (CT) every 3 months for 2 years and then every 6 months until 5 years, and abdominal CT every 3 months for 2 years and then every 6 months until 5 years. The first examination that revealed abnormality in patients who developed recurrence was analyzed.During the study period, 105 recurrences were diagnosed. There were 45 hepatic recurrences, 23 local recurrences, 20 pulmonary recurrences, 16 lymph node recurrences, and 10 peritoneal recurrences. Computed tomography, CEA, and CA 19-9 were the first abnormal examination(s) in 77, 23, and 26 patients, respectively. Tumor markers detected the recurrence earlier than did CT in 27% of patients. CEA and CA 19-9 equally contributed to detection with respect to the number of patients, while the sites of detected recurrences differed.For early detection of occult recurrence of CRC, CT was the most reliable modality. On the other hand, tumor markers were also relevant. Given the recent advances in multimodal approaches for advanced CRC, the combination of CT, CEA, and CA 19-9, which is currently not included in guidelines, should be routinely performed.[A comparative evaluation of methods for diagnosing recurrence of rectal cancer after radical surgery].As a result of a study of 173 cases of rectal cancer, applicability of bleomycin-111indium for diagnosis of tumor recurrences was shown. Assays of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a separate diagnostic procedure proved inadequate due to their low sensitivity (42.1%). Since the effectiveness of ultrasonography application in diagnosing rectal cancer was as high as 91%, it should be recommended for follow-up of radically operated patients.Assessment of serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assays in postoperative detection of recurrent colorectal cancer.Monthly serial postoperative CEA determinations, three-monthly system review plus physical examination, and a battery of six-monthly laboratory and radiologic tests were compared in order to evaluate each in detection of recurrent colorectal cancer. Twelve of the 33 patients studied prospectively developed recurrent disease. In this study CEA was found not to be a substitute for careful clinical follow-up, but if used in a serial manner it was a useful adjunct for detection of early recurrent cancer, especially intra-hepatic and retroperitoneal disease recurring in patients with elevated pretreatment CEA levels. The other laboratory and radiologic tests employed were often useful to confirm progressing disease, but they did not reveal any first evidence of recurrent disease.Value of serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations for early detection of recurrent cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) has been monitored at intervals of approximately three months in patients who had undergone potentially curative surgery for breast cancer, head and neck cancer, lung cancer, and colorectal cancer, but who were considered to be at high risk of recurrence. Monitoring of CEA in patients' serum was of no value for the early detection of tumour recurrence in either breast or head and neck cancer patients. It was of value for the early detection of lung cancer recurrence, but these patients were always beyond the scope of cure. In colorectal cancer patients, two-thirds of recurrences were heralded by a rising CEA, but only one of 15 patients had disease confined to local tissues which could be totally excised, although a further three patients had liver metastases which were apparently localized to one lobe of the liver. For colorectal cancer patients, serial CEA estimations are an effective method for the early diagnosis of recurrence, although this seldom translates into improved patient benefit.[Value and limits of the determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in postoperative evaluation of patients with colonic and rectal carcinomas].An attempt is made to define the usefulness and limitations of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) radioimmunoassay for evaluation of tumor resection and detection of tumor relapse in patients with large-bowel carcinoma. In 45 patients for whom complete tumor resection was reported, all but 5 showed a drop in CEA to normal values after surgery. The 5 patients whose CEA did not fall to below 5 ng/ml showed a subsequent rise in CEA level and later were all found to have a tumor relapse. The results indicate that an incomplete drop in circulating CEA level one month after surgery is a bad prognostic sign. Twenty-two of these patients were followed up by repeated CEA radioimmunoassay for several months after surgery; 8 showed a progressive increase in CEA levels preceding clinical diagnosis of tumor relapse by 2-10 months. The clinical history of these 8 patients is briefly described. The results demonstrate that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased CEA levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.Role of serum carcinoembryonic antigen in the detection of colorectal cancer before and after surgical resection.To determine whether serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) correlate with the presence of primary colorectal cancer (CRC), and/or recurrent CRC following radical resection.A total of 413 patients with CRC underwent radical surgery between January 1998 and December 2002 in our department and were enrolled in this study. The median follow-up period was 69 mo (range, 3-118 mo), and CRC recurrence was experienced by 90/413 (21.8%) patients. Serum levels of CEA were assayed preoperatively, and using a cutoff value of 5 ng/mL, patients were divided into two groups, those with normal serum CEA levels (e.g.,  5 ng/mL) and those with elevated CEA levels (> 5 ng/mL).The overall sensitivity of CEA for the detection of primary CRC was 37.0%. The sensitivity of CEA according to stage, was 21.4%, 38.9%, and 41.7% for stages I-III, respectively. Moreover, for stage II and stage III cases, the 5-year disease-free survival rates were reduced for patients with elevated preoperative serum CEA levels (P < 0.05). The overall sensitivity of CEA for detecting recurrent CRC was 54.4%, and sensitivity rates of 36.6%, 66.7%, and 75.0% were associated with cases of local recurrence, single metastasis, and multiple metastases, respectively. In patients with normal serum levels of CEA preoperatively, the sensitivity of CEA for detecting recurrence was reduced compared with patients having a history of elevated CEA prior to radical resection (32.6% vs 77.3%, respectively, P < 0.05).CRC patients with normal serum CEA levels prior to resection maintained these levels during CRC recurrence, especially in cases of local recurrence vs cases of metastasis.CEA and relapse after the operation of colorectal carcinoma.Relapses have an important meaning in relation to the curative surgical intervention. In RO resections according to UICC classification, the local relapses were classified as the most important factor for survival. Without any doubts the most important of these tumor-biological prognostic factors in patients with colorectal carcinoma is the carcino-embryonal antigen. Up to now, the unquestionable importance of the determination of serum levels of CEA for the detection of relapses is most often described.This study is retrospective, not randomized. Analyzed were medical records and data of patients, who underwent the surgery of colorectal carcinoma at IInd Department of Surgery, University Hospital, Faculty of Medicine, Comenius University, Bratislava, in period from January 1st, 1986 to December 31st, 1995. In our analysis we evaluate the age and gender of patients, date of the surgery and type of the surgery from the point of acuteness, as well as radicality, staging of the disease, levels of the serum CEA. Serum levels of carcino-embryonal antigen before operation were determined and evaluated. In patients, who remaind in the monitoring at our department we examine CEA in regular intervals.From our group of patients, in 28 patients the relapse of the disease was determined here. Before the first operation, the preoperative level of CEA was examined in 15 patients and in 13 patients it was not. From 15 patients with examined CEA level, 7 patients (46.7%) had increased and 9 patients (53.3%) normal level. In twenty-seven patients CEA level was examined to reveal a relapse. One patient was diagnosed during the acute surgery and CEA was not determined prior this operation. From the remaining 27 patients, CEA level was positive in 20 patients (74.1%) and 7 patients had normal levels (25.9%). From these 7 patients with normal CEA level, in 5 cases it was locoregional relapse and 2 patients have distant metastases. From all patients, in whom the relapse was determined at our department, in 13 patients locoregional relapse was detected and in 15 patients distant metastases were diagnosed.Due to the sensitivity of serum level of CEA for detection of relapses, which is higher compared to the primary tumor and also to found lead time 4 months we think the postoperative regular determination of CEA in patients after the curative resection is appropriate. Earlier determination of less progressive relapse is definitely important, although the current long-term survival after the surgery for relapses is not optimistic. Development of surgical procedures as well as alternative treatment can bring better results in less developed relapse of the disease. (Ref. 28.).Comparison of two CEA assays in primary and recurrent large bowel carcinoma with different DNA ploidy pattern.Pre-operative CEA levels were measured in 100 patients with large bowel carcinomas with different DNA ploidy pattern and serial post-operative determinations performed in the 64 who had been operated for cure. The follow-up period was 3 1/2-8 yr. All CEA measurements were performed consecutively with a RIA (Roche), and subsequently repeated in one batch with an EIA (Roche) based on a monoclonal antibody. Both assays showed a similar number of 'false-negative' CEA levels pre-operatively--varying from 69% in aneuploid (AN) Dukes' A to 8% in AN Dukes' D tumours, and from 75% in near diploid (ND) Dukes' A to 40% in ND Dukes' D tumours. The sensitivity for detecting recurrence in patients with tumours of either ploidy pattern was slightly better with EIA than with RIA. A difference between the AN and ND group was shown somewhat better with RIA, the sensitivity in the AN group being 79% and the median lead time 7 months compared to 13% and 2 months in the ND group. The corresponding figures with EIA were 71% and 7 months for the AN group and 63% and 1 1/2 months for the ND group. However, all but one of the patients with ND DNA pattern who showed recurrence-associated CEA elevation with EIA also had an elevated level pre-operatively. We conclude that all patients operated for cure should be followed by regular CEA measurements post-operatively if they had an elevated CEA level prior to operation.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)A statistical evaluation of baseline and follow-up carcinoembryonic antigen in patients with resectable colorectal carcinoma.A long-term CEA follow-up was evaluated statistically for a series of 74 patients with primary colorectal carcinoma who underwent resections for cure. Thirty-three recurrences and 29 deaths were reported among this population after a median follow-up interval of 55 months. Preoperative CEA levels correlated with the Dukes' classification. However, the preoperative level adds significant information to Dukes' classification in the prediction of recurrence. Postoperative CEA assays taken later in the clinical evaluation process carry the most prognostic information for subsequent recurrence. Using matched-pairs techniques, the authors noted that CEA often rose in anticipation of recurrence, sometimes as early as one year before recurrence. The following four follow-up CEA events were evaluated: 1) three consecutive rising CEA's 2) CEA rises 5.0 ng/ml; 3) CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml; 4) CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml two consecutive times. The follow-up CEA events examined were characterized by false positive rates ranging from 17% to 66% and true positive rates ranging from 43% to 56% in the prediction of recurrence. From follow-up CEA evaluations, further clinical investigation appeared most warranted when CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml at two consecutive follow-up evaluations, but the chances of finding any subsequent recurrent disease was near 50%. Among patients experiencing recurrences, although forewarned by CEA elevations, there was no subsequent time when patients were most likely to have recurrence of disease.Is ultrasound superior to carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement in recurrent tumor screening of patients with colorectal carcinoma?Assuming that in the postoperative recurrent tumor screening CEA levels are as important as imaging techniques in elucidating the spread or the recurrence of a tumor, we examined 61 patients with colonic carcinoma. Those patients were operated curatively and were regularly controlled by clinical examination, laboratory, sonographic, endoscopic or radiological methods. In 3 patients there was a local recurrent, in 3 other patients there was a local recurrent and metastases. 8 patients showed sonographic livermetastases only, proved by computed tomography. In 6 patients CEA-levels rose. In 2 patients with sonographically confirmed metastases of the liver, there were neither clinical nor laboratory hints for metastases and the CEA-levels were normal. No one had elevated CEA-levels before detecting metastases. Our results indicate that ultrasound of the liver can detect metastases of colonic tumors earlier than clinical or laboratory sings do. Because of its greater diagnostic security, ultrasound is superior to CEA-measurement in recurrent tumor screening.Comparison of plasma prolactin and CEA in monitoring patients with adenocarcinoma of colon and rectum.Plasma prolactin (PRL) and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) were measured by radioimmunoassay in 74 patients with adenocarcinoma of colon and rectum. The markers were correlated with disease stage, histological grade and progression/remission of disease. The circulating preoperative median PRL and CEA levels were significantly higher in colorectal cancer patients than in their respective controls. PRL was elevated in all Dukes stages and in all histological grades of the tumour whereas the rise in CEA was more pronounced in Dukes D. Out of 74 patients, 29% (21/74) developed recurrent disease and 31% (23/74) responded to the treatment. With regard to monitoring recurrence(s), the predictive value of PRL was 94% which was significantly greater than that of CEA which was only 62%. In patients who developed liver metastases PRL remained elevated whereas CEA showed more than 100-fold increase. Therefore, we feel that CEA is a better marker for monitoring patients who developed liver metastases. From our results, we suggest that PRL can be used as a better overall marker for detecting recurrence(s) in patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma.Serial levels of CA 19-9 and CEA in colonic cancer.The use of serial carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 assays was assessed by comparison with serial carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) levels on the plasmas of 53 patients with colorectal carcinoma. The patients had all undergone resection for their primary tumors and in six instances subsequent resections for hepatic metastases. Initial CA 19-9 levels were greater than or equal to 37 U/mL in 22 of the 53 patients (41%) and in 68% of the patients with metastatic disease. Similar trends of serial CA 19-9 and CEA levels were found in 79% of the 53 patients. One patient with initially normal CEA levels had elevated CA 19-9 levels from the start. In ten of the 53 patients (19%), serial CA 19-9 levels remained low despite tumor recurrence or progression, and despite increasing CEA levels above 5 ng/mL. The increasing serial CEA trends predicted recurrence in 88% and increasing CA 19-9 trends in 50% of cases, which was increased to 70% by including trends of CA 19-9 levels below 37 U/mL. Following hepatic lobectomy, both serial CEA and CA 19-9 levels decreased rapidly. Used alone, serial CA 19-9 levels did not appear to be as sensitive as standard CEA in this retrospective study of selected patients.A prospective evaluation of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in the management of colorectal carcinoma.Carcinoembryonic antigen in the diagnosis and follow-up of colorectal carcinoma.[Indications for repeat operations for recurrence of rectocolic cancer: contribution of serum carcino-embryonic antigen levels (author's transl)].Surveillance of colorectal cancer: effectiveness of early detection of intraluminal recurrences on prognosis and survival of patients treated for cure.The authors evaluate the effectiveness of routine colonoscopy and marker evaluation in diagnosis of intraluminal recurrent cancer.Chart review was conducted on 481 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer between 1980 and 1990. Clinical visits were scheduled and carcinoembryonic antigen evaluation was performed every three months, and colonoscopy was performed preoperatively, 12 to 15 months after surgical treatment, and then with intervals of 12 to 24 months or when symptoms appeared.About 10 percent of patients developed intraluminal recurrences. More than one-half of metachronous lesions arose within the first 24 months, and median time to diagnosis was 25 months. Patients with left-sited tumors in the advanced stage had a higher risk of developing recurrent intraluminal disease. Twenty-nine patients underwent a second surgical operation, of which 17 cases were radical. In this group, the five-year survival was 70.6 percent, although no nonradically treated or nonresected patients survived longer than 31 months. Twenty-two patients were asymptomatic at time of diagnosis of recurrence, and of these, 12 patients underwent radical operation; on the other hand, of the 24 symptomatic patients, only 5 were treated radically. Carcinoembryonic antigen was the first sign of recurrence in eight cases. Colonoscopy must be performed within the first 12 to 15 months after operation, whereas an interval of 24 months between examinations seems sufficient to guarantee early detection of metachronous lesions.Serial tumor marker evaluation is of help in earlier diagnosis of local recurrences. Asymptomatic patients more frequently undergo another operation for cure and thus have a better survival rate.[The pre- and postoperative monitoring of the immunological indices and tumor markers in colorectal carcinoma].The onset of immunological reaction against colorectal carcinoma is based on superficial changes in the malignant cell components following the formation of antigen structures. This explains the interest in the issue and defines the aim of the study. Over a 5-year period, in the Emergency Surgery Clinic, 86 patients with histologically diagnosed colorectal carcinoma (46 men and 40 women) are examined prior to surgery, and 107 patients (55 men and 52 women)--after the operation. The tumor markers CEA, CA 19-9, AFP and immunoglobulin IgA are tested using ELISA and RIA methods. Conventional ultrasound, scintigraphic and CT studies are carried out to detect liver metastases. The obtained results undergo statistical processing with correlation analysis and sensitivity and specificity coefficients. Among those examined preoperatively elevated CEA levels (CEA > 2.5 ng/ml) are recorded in 42 cases (48.9%), and for CA 19-9 (CA 19-9 > 37 E/ml)--in 40 (46.5%). From the patients with complicated colorectal carcinoma in the postoperative period 83 are clinically healthy (77.6%); of the latter marker-positive are 16 (19.3%), and marker-negative--67 (80.7%). Relapses and metastases are registered in 24 cases (22.4%) of which marker-positive--19 (79.2%). Liver and abdominal lymph node metastases are detected by US, scintigraphy and CT study. All three imaging methods contribute to diagnose liver metastases in 14 patients (13%). In 32 patients (18 men and 14 women) postsurgical monitoring of immunological IgA levels and tumor markers is done over period ranging from 7-10 days to 2 years postoperatively. Correlative dependences between IgA and CEA (R = +0.99), and between IgA and CA 19-9 (R = +0.97) are also documented. The sensitivity of both markers (CEA and CA 19-9) is low, varying between 38 and 51 per cent, with specificity amounting to 61-67 per cent. The paradoxically high elevation of tumor markers prior to operation shows a constant decrease at 3 months after surgery.1. The sensitivity of both markers (CEA and CA 19-9) is low (38-51%), and that is why their use in screening examinations lacks clinical relevance. 2. CEA specificity is by no means high (61-67%), and it may become positive in a number of nononcological diseases (liver cirrhosis and hepatitis, inflammation diseases of GIT and lungs). 3. Plasma CEA and CA 19-9 levels correlate well with the neoplastic process progression/regression. 4. Preoperative CEA level has a prognostic value for postsurgical relapses. 5. High IgA levels are indicators for relapses or metastases from colorectal carcinoma. 6. Tumor histological verification correlates also with the high CEA levels and with the depth of tumor infiltration into the intestinal wall. 7. The dynamic assessment of tumor markers postoperatively has a high informative value in all colorectal carcinoma patients. 8. Pre- and postoperative high CEA levels are observed in patients assigned to the poor prognosis group, and should be given adjuvant therapy.Postoperative surveillance in patients with colorectal cancer who have undergone curative resection: a prospective, multicenter, randomized, controlled trial.Although systematic postoperative surveillance of patients with colorectal cancer has been demonstrated to improve survival, it remains unknown whether a more intensive strategy provides any significant advantage. This prospective, multicenter, randomized, controlled trial was aimed at comparing the efficacy of two different surveillance strategies in terms of both survival and recurrence resectability.Patients with stage II or III colorectal cancer were allocated randomly to either a simple surveillance strategy including clinical evaluation and serum carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring, or an intensive strategy in which abdominal computed tomography or ultrasonography, chest radiograph, and colonoscopy were added.A total of 259 patients were included: 132 were observed according to the simple strategy and 127 were observed according to the intensive strategy. Both groups were similar with respect to baseline characteristics and rate and type of tumor recurrence. After a median follow-up of 48 months, there was no difference in the probability of overall survival in the whole series (hazard ratio [HR] = 0.87; 95% CI, 0.49 to 1.54; P = .62). However, the intensive strategy was associated with higher overall survival in patients with stage II tumors (HR = 0.34; 95% CI, 0.12 to 0.98; P = .045) and in those with rectal lesions (HR = 0.09; 95% CI, 0.01 to 0.81; P = .03), mainly due to higher rate of resectability for recurrent tumors. Colonoscopy was responsible for the detection of the highest proportion (44%) of resectable tumor recurrence in the intensive arm.A more intensive surveillance strategy improves the prognosis of patients with stage II colorectal cancer or those with rectal tumors. Inclusion of regular performance of colonoscopy seems justified up to the fifth year of follow-up, at least.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of large-bowel cancer.During recent years, a discussion about cost-effectiveness and importance of follow-up evaluation after curative resection of large-bowel cancer has developed. It is not known whether the determination of carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) plays a crucial role in the early detection of recurrent disease.We conducted an analysis of the prospective follow-up database of 1321 patients after curative resection of colorectal cancer in our institution between 1990 and 1998 to evaluate the role of CEA in the early detection of recurrent disease.Of the 1321 patients included in our study, 306 developed recurrent disease following curative resection (23.2%). These patients with recurrent disease were divided into: Group I. No pre-operative CEA determination/insufficient follow-up (n=47; 15.4%). Group II. No elevation of CEA with primary cancer (n=156; 51.0%): (IIa) elevation with recurrent disease (n=62); (IIb) no elevation at any time point (n=53); and (IIc) role of CEA not completely elucidated (n=41). Thirteen patients of group II underwent curative relapse surgery (8.3%). Group III. Elevated CEA with primary cancer (n=103; 33.7%): (IlIa) no increase with recurrent disease (n=21); (IIIb) increase with other symptoms of recurrent disease (n=45); and (IIIc) increased values as an early symptom of recurrent disease (n=37). Sixteen patients of group III underwent curative relapse surgery (15.5%). In patients after relapse surgery, recurrent disease developed again after a median time of 12 months (mean 17.9+/-3.8 months).Our findings indicate that 2.8% of all patients (12.1% of patients with recurrent disease) who underwent curative resection of colorectal cancer profit from follow-up CEA determinations. With careful observation of CEA kinetics, 6.2% (n=82) of all patients or 26.8% of patients with recurrent disease could profit from routine follow-up CEA determinations. In 9.5% of patients with recurrent disease, curative resection of relapse was achieved and these patients remained disease free for a median time of 12 months. Regular CEA measurements remain an important part of routine patient care after curative resection of colorectal cancer.Local recurrence following 'curative' surgery for large bowel cancer: I. The overall picture.The Large Bowel Cancer Project is a collaborative prospective study of 4228 patients with a histologically proven adenocarcinoma, of whom 2336 (55 per cent) survived a 'curative' resection. Follow-up information is available on 2220 patients (95 per cent). Subsequently, 309 (14 per cent) have developed a local recurrence confirmed by: biopsy (127; 41 per cent), clinical examination (77; 25 per cent), X-ray (15; 5 per cent), a raised CEA (2; 1 per cent), or some other method - e.g. CT scan or a confident unbiopsied laparotomy finding (88; 29 per cent). Statistically significant factors (chi2 test, P less than 0.05) associated with local recurrence are: Dukes' classification: A 4 per cent; B 13 per cent; C 18 per cent Tumour differentiation: Well 11 per cent; Moderate 14 per cent; Poor 21 per cent Obstruction: Absent 13 per cent; Present 21 per cent Perforation: Absent 13 per cent; Present 28 per cent Tumour mobility: Freely mobile 11 per cent; Others 21 per cent Operation performed (rectal and rectosigmoid tumours): Abdomino-perineal 12 per cent; Anterior resection 18 per cent; Surgeon (Consultant only): Range less than 5 per cent to greater than 20 per cent. Stratification of the above variables altered only the statistical significance pertaining to tumour differentiation (P less than 0.1, d.f. = 2). In particular, the differences between Consultant surgeons remained.The relationship between prognosis and CEA-dt after hepatic resection in patients with colorectal carcinomas.CEA-doubling time (CEA-dt) was calculated by measuring serum CEA at two voluntary points. As CEA-dt is correlated with tumour doubling time the growth rate of liver metastasis could be determined. We investigated the relationship between CEA-dt and prognosis to determine the indications for resection of liver metastasis.We examined 334 patients diagnosed with resected liver metastasis of colorectal carcinoma. Patients were divided into three categories based on CEA-dt; Group A, CEA-dt <30 days; Group B, 30 days </=cCEA-dt <80 days; and Group C, CEA-dt >/=s80 days. Clinicopathological parameters, the 3-year or 5-year survival rate and the rate of recurrence were compared among the three groups.In Group A, the survival time after hepatic resection was significantly shorter compared to the other groups. Furthermore, multiple liver metastasis showed slightly reduced CEA-dt levels compared with solitary metastasis, but even in patients with solitary liver metastasis, the rate of survival was poor. In 70% of Group A patients, recurrent tumour was recognized within 1 year of hepatic resection.When surgery for liver metastasis of colorectal cancer is considered. Group A patients should be recognized as having a poor prognosis and a high rate of recurrence after hepatic resection, and CEA-dt should be employed as a prognostic factor.The use of serial CEA determinations to predict recurrence of colon cancer and when to do a second-look operation.The concept of second-look surgery was introduced by Wangensteen 25 years ago, and 17% of patients were reported to be converted to a cancer-free state. Instead of an arbitrary time interval for reoperation, serial CEA values were used as the indicator of colon cancer recurrence and second-look operation. Twenty-two retrospective and 18 prospective patients were evaluable. There was no operative mortality. The CEA Nomogram was used to determine whether the CEA change was significant. All patient-samples were analyzed in duplicate, stored, and compared with the most recent sample; therefore, each patient served as his own control. The prospective results emphasize the importance of minimizing the time delay between a significant change in CEA values and reoperation. Equally important are the frequency of serial determinations (every one or two months), a thorough understanding of the limitations of the CEA radioimmunoassay, and the clinical condition of the patient.Serum and tissue CEA in colorectal cancer: clinical relevance.This article is an analysis of the information derived from the determination of tumor-tissue concentration of CEA in patients with colorectal cancer. To ascertain the relationship between tumor marker content with the histologic aspects and serologic levels of CEA of this neoplam.136 patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma and 41 with colorectal benign processes are analyzed and followed during an average time of 27 months. The CEA of the serum were obtained preoperatively and postoperatively and measured by radioimmunoassay (RIA). Tissular CEA levels were determined with RIA. The histological characteristics are analyzed (Dukes classification, grade of differentiation, index of atypia, microscopic vascular and lymphatic involvement.1) The cut off point of the tissular CEA with the best sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of normal mucosa is 386 ng/mg and for tumoral tissue is 1160 ng/mg. 2) There is no correlation between tissue and serologic CEA value. 3) The tissular level of CEA have a significant statistical correlation with Dukes stage (p < 0.003); other histological characteristics were no significative. 4) There are significant statistical correlations between serologic CEA and relapse but no with survival rates.1) Serologic CEA levels depend on numerous factors. 2) There aren't correlations between preoperative serologic levels and tissular CEA levels. 3) Tissular CEA do not predict what patients will have an elevated serologic CEA level in relapse.FDG-PET improves the management of patients with suspected recurrence of colorectal cancer.This study aims to assess the influence of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) detection of recurrent disease on the management of patients with colorectal cancer and suspected recurrence. One hundred and twenty patients with suspected recurrence were studied with FDG-PET. Fifty-eight patients were referred for FDG-PET because of the elevation of serum tumour markers. Thirty-one patients were referred because of inconclusive results of conventional imaging modalities. Twenty-five patients had known recurrence and were referred for pre-surgical assessment. Six patients were referred because of abdominal pain. A major management change was considered when, as a consequence of FDG-PET results, medical treatment was changed to surgical, or surgical to medical or to no treatment. A minor management change was considered when changes were made within a treatment modality. Of the 58 patients with elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), FDG-PET detected recurrence and led to a major management change in 34 (58%). Eighteen underwent curative surgery and 16 were treated with systemic therapy. Of the 31 patients evaluated because of inconclusive results of conventional imaging modalities, FDG-PET was positive for recurrence in 24 and negative in seven. A major management change took place in 14 patients (45%). Of the 25 patients evaluated to rule out other sites of disease before surgery, FDG-PET did not show any other site of recurrence in 13 (52%) and showed more lesions in the remaining patients. Major management change took place in eight patients (32%). Overall, in the 120 patients studied, FDG-PET resulted in major management changes in 58 (48%), minor changes in four (3%) and no change in 54 (45%). It can be concluded that FDG-PET has a significant impact on the management of patients with suspected recurrence of colorectal cancer. FDG-PET detection of recurrence frequently allows curative surgical intervention. The early identification of distant metastases may also facilitate the implementation of systemic treatment.Effect of 3 to 5 years of scheduled CEA and CT follow-up to detect recurrence of colorectal cancer: the FACS randomized clinical trial.Intensive follow-up after surgery for colorectal cancer is common practice but is based on limited evidence.To assess the effect of scheduled blood measurement of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and computed tomography (CT) as follow-up to detect recurrent colorectal cancer treatable with curative intent.Randomized clinical trial in 39 National Health Service hospitals in the United Kingdom; 1202 eligible participants were recruited between January 2003 and August 2009 who had undergone curative surgery for primary colorectal cancer, including adjuvant treatment if indicated, with no evidence of residual disease on investigation.Participants were randomly assigned to 1 of 4 groups: CEA only (n = 300), CT only (n = 299), CEA+CT (n = 302), or minimum follow-up (n = 301). Blood CEA was measured every 3 months for 2 years, then every 6 months for 3 years; CT scans of the chest, abdomen, and pelvis were performed every 6 months for 2 years, then annually for 3 years; and the minimum follow-up group received follow-up if symptoms occurred.The primary outcome was surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent; secondary outcomes were mortality (total and colorectal cancer), time to detection of recurrence, and survival after treatment of recurrence with curative intent.After a mean 4.4 (SD, 0.8) years of observation, cancer recurrence was detected in 199 participants (16.6%; 95% CI, 14.5%-18.7%) overall; 71 of 1202 participants (5.9%; 95% CI, 4.6%-7.2%) were treated for recurrence with curative intent, with little difference according to Dukes staging (stage A, 5.1% [13/254]; stage B, 6.1% [34/553]; stage C, 6.2% [22/354]). Surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent was 2.3% (7/301) in the minimum follow-up group, 6.7% (20/300) in the CEA group, 8% (24/299) in the CT group, and 6.6% (20/302) in the CEA+CT group. Compared with minimum follow-up, the absolute difference in the percentage of patients treated with curative intent in the CEA group was 4.4% (95% CI, 1.0%-7.9%; adjusted odds ratio [OR], 3.00; 95% CI, 1.23-7.33), in the CT group was 5.7% (95% CI, 2.2%-9.5%; adjusted OR, 3.63; 95% CI, 1.51-8.69), and in the CEA+CT group was 4.3% (95% CI, 1.0%-7.9%; adjusted OR, 3.10; 95% CI, 1.10-8.71). The number of deaths was not significantly different in the combined intensive monitoring groups (CEA, CT, and CEA+CT; 18.2% [164/901]) vs the minimum follow-up group (15.9% [48/301]; difference, 2.3%; 95% CI, -2.6% to 7.1%).Among patients who had undergone curative surgery for primary colorectal cancer, intensive imaging or CEA screening each provided an increased rate of surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent compared with minimal follow-up; there was no advantage in combining CEA and CT. If there is a survival advantage to any strategy, it is likely to be small.isrctn.org Identifier: 41458548.The role of CA-242 and CEA in surveillance following curative resection for colorectal cancer.This study was undertaken to evaluate the role of a new tumour marker, CA-242, alone or in combination with CEA in the practical management of colorectal cancer patients after potentially curative resection. A cohort of 149 patients who had undergone 'curative' surgery was followed up according to an intensive protocol in order to detect recurrent disease. Over a median tumour marker follow-up period of 24 months there were 25 recurrences in 24 patients. Both CEA and CA-242 alone detected half the local recurrences. The sensitivity of CEA was 84% for distant or mixed recurrence compared with 64% for CA-242. An abnormality of either CEA or CA-242 enabled detection of five out of six local recurrences and 17 out of 19 distant or mixed recurrences with a median lead time of 5 months for each marker. Both markers were elevated concurrently in only one local and 11 distant recurrences. While CA-242 alone is not superior to CEA, their combined use (either abnormal) has a high sensitivity (88%), specificity (78%) and negative predictive value (97%); this may be useful in reducing unnecessary investigations in follow-up programmes and as a guide to the initiation of further treatment for recurrent disease.Clinical value of carcinoembryonic antigen: diagnosis, prognosis, and follow-up of patients with cancer.Plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in nanograms per milliliter was assayed in 149 patients with benign and 567 patients with malignant disease. Elevated CEA level (greater than 5.0) was a good indicator of malignant disease but a poor screening test for cancer because of the high false-negative rate. Degree of elevation of plasma CEA level correlated with incidence of metastatic disease in patients with colorectal, gastric, and breast carcinomas, but no correlation was seen between CEA levels and status of lymph nodes in patients with localized disease. Patients with localized colorectal cancer, but elevated CEA levels before resection, had a 2.1-fold increase in the incidence of recurrence; however, this added to the prognostic value of Dukes' staging only when the CEA level remained elevated postoperatively. In 87% of patients with colorectal cancer, the CEA level was elevated at the time of recurrence, but a therapeutic value of reexploration for unexplained CEA level elevation was not confirmed.Is carcino-embryonic antigen useful in the follow-up management of patients with colorectal liver metastases?The role of carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) in monitoring early detection of recurrent or metastatic colorectal cancer, and its impact on resectability rate and patient survival remains controversial. Our objective was to determine any association between the preoperative level of CEA and prognosis, and the resectability and survival by method of diagnosis of colorectal hepatic metastases.We analyzed patients who underwent exploration for hepatic resection for metastatic colorectal cancer over a 15-year period. The patient population consisted of those patients who had undergone primary colon or rectal resection and were followed up with serial CEA levels and of patients who were followed up with physical examination, liver function tests (LFTs) or computed tomography (CT) of the abdomen and pelvis that led to the diagnosis of liver metastases. Also included in the study were patients who were diagnosed with liver metastases at the time of the primary colon or rectal resection and underwent planned hepatic resection at a later time.Three hundred and one (301) patients who underwent a total of 345 planned hepatic resections for metastatic colorectal cancer between January 1978 and December 1993 were included in this analysis. The median preoperative CEA level was 24.8 ng/mL in the resected group, 53.0 ng/mL in the incomplete resection group, and 49.1 ng/mL in the nonresected group (P = 0.02). More of the patients who had a preoperative CEA < or =30 ng/mL were in the resected group, while those who had a preoperative CEA >30 ng/mL were likely to be in the nonresected group (P = 0.002). The median survival was 25 months for patients with a preoperative CEA level < or =30 ng/mL and 17 months for patients with a preoperative CEA >30 ng/mL (P = 0.0005). The resectability rate and the survival of patients by method of diagnosing liver metastases-rising CEA versus history and physical, elevated LFTs, CT scan versus diagnosis at the time of primary resection-was not significant (P = 0.06 and P = 0.19, respectively). Given the nonstandardized retrospective nature of the study cohort and relative small groups of patients, the power to detect small differences in survival by method of diagnosis is limited. In the complete resection group of patients with unilobar liver disease (5-year survival of 28.8%) there was no difference in survival between those patients who had normal preoperative CEA and those who had elevated preoperative CEA, and approximately 90% of them had an abnormal preoperative serum CEA level.CEA is useful in the preoperative evaluation of patients with hepatic colorectal metastases for assessing prognosis and is complimentary to history and physical examination in the diagnosis of liver metastases. Patients with colorectal liver metastases and preoperative CEA < or =30 ng/mL are more likely to be resectable, and they have the longest survival.[Clinical significance of serum CEA determination in the diagnosis of colo-rectal cancer].Serum CEA levels of 581 specimens obtained from 350 colo-rectal cancer patients and 61 specimens from 54 non-tumor subjects were determined by sandwich method of CEA-EIA McAb kit supplied by the Beijing Institute of Biological Products. In patients with primary colo-rectal cancer, the serum CEA level was 15.0 +/- 52.1 ng/ml and 37.9% of patients gave a CEA level greater than 5 ng/ml. In recurrent colo-rectal cancer patients, serum CEA increased to 124.2 +/- 454.8 ng/ml with a positive rate of 78.0%. Both the CEA value and the positive rate of patients in clinically tumor-free period after surgery were 2.9 +/- 2.2 ng/ml and 16.5%, respectively. Serial follow-up CEA assays in selected cases were helpful to reflect the clinical status. Generally, CEA is useful to predict prognosis and to guide follow-up management.Usefulness of CEA, TPA, GICA, CA 72.4, and CA 195 in the Diagnosis of primary colorectal cancer and at its relapse.A protocol with tumor markers as guidelines to follow up colorectal cancer patients was designed using criteria other than those commonly reported. They included combination of several markers and their dynamic evaluation of three different levels of increase: isolated elevated value (IEV), constant level of elevation (CE), and progressive increase (PI). In a total of 90 patients, the levels of combined serum CEA-TPA and GICA were serially measured, and in 71 of them, CA 72.4 and CA 195 levels were also determined. The tumor markers were measured during the first few months after surgery, and the usefulness of combined CEA-TPA-GICA and other, possibly more favorable combinations was determined in relation to "early" detection of recurrence and development of metastases. In addition the usefulness of conventional radiologic examinations and the impact on patients survival following "early" diagnosis was evaluated. A positive correlation was found between elevated preoperative serum tumor marker levels and the stage of disease. The postoperative variation of high serum CEA values was useful in identifying micrometastases after primary tumor resection. In the "early" diagnosed 14 patients with recurrence during the postoperative follow-up period, the highest sensitivity was found for TPA (87%) and, of the marker combinations, TPA-GICA (93%) with a lead time of 4.6 +/- 5.6 and 5.4 +/- 7.8 months (mean +/- SD) respectively. In nonrelapsed patients, falsely positive results of TPA-GICA (25%) were fewer than those for TPA-CA 195 (31%) and TPA-GICA-CA72-4 (35%). However, TPA-CA 195 and TPA-GICA-CA72-4, based upon their high sensitivity in patients with metastases, seemed in keeping with the effectiveness of TPA-GICA for monitoring of postoperative patients with colorectal cancer. In patients who developed recurrences, PI was more frequently present than IEV. In patients without recurrence, the opposite occurred. CE had less frequently discriminatory capability between these two groups than IEV and PI. Routine radiographic studies were ineffective whereas liver echography with its high sensitivity revealed the first sign of recurrence. Eight (50%) of the 16 relapses (two patients relapsed twice) were suitable for surgery because only one organ with a single metastasis was involved. Three (75%) of the 4 patients with "early" diagnosis of recurrence are alive without evidence of disease 5, 18, and 20 months after the last surgery. The results of this study revealed the importance of "early" diagnosis of recurrence for improved survival of patients with colorectal cancer.Re-operation for recurrent colorectal cancer: the importance of early diagnosis for resectability and survival.Between 1978 and 1986, 179 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer were treated and 137 patients were operated a second time.82.1% of the patients showed elevated CEA levels (greater than or equal to 5 ng/ml) at the time of diagnosis. In 58.1% of the patients the CEA increase preceded the recognition of recurrence, and in 13.4% the diagnosis could be confirmed only by a second-look operation. In 46.7% of the re-operated patients a potentially curative resection of the locally recurrent or metastatic disease could be performed. The resectability was significantly lower in patients with symptomatic recurrent disease (34.5%) as compared to asymptomatic patients with CEA-directed positive imaging (52.7%) and the second-look patients (62.5%) respectively. A significant improvement in survival could be achieved especially in the second-look operated patients.[Increased carcinoembryonic antigen and absence of recurrence in monitoring colorectal cancer].Carcinoembryonic antigen has been used to monitor colorectal cancer treated patients, elevated carcinoembryonic antigen allows to predict recurrence however some serum levels is not ever a sign of disease. In a last paper 21% of the colorectal cancer patients treated surgically had not recurrent disease. The aim of the study was to follow these patients for at least one year. Thirty two patients with elevated carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels were studied. Five were excluded and 27 were followed with chest RX, computadorized tomography and colonoscopy. Carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels were measured by ELISA using Sorine Biomedica kit (normal value: 5 ng/ml). Eleven patients (41%) developed recurrence, seven had liver metastasis. The mean time among the elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen and the recurrence was 6.6 months. The recurrence was not observed in 18 patients, the carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels become normal in eight and in the eight others the carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels persisted elevated. Carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels can be elevated before the diagnosis of recurrence, mostly in liver metastasis, however, a number of patients with elevated carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels do not have a known cause.Carcinoembryonic antigen: clinical and historical aspects.To further define and determine the usefulness of CEA, 1100 CEA determinations have been made over the past two years at The Ohio State University Hospitals on patients with a variety of malignant and nonmalignant conditions. Correlation of CEA titers with history and clinical course has yielded interesting results not only in cancers of entodermally derived tissues, for which CEA has become an established adjunct in management, but also in certain other neoplasms and inflammatory states. The current total of 225 preoperative CEA determinations in colorectal carcinomas shows an 81% incidence of elevation, with postoperative titers remaining elevated in patients having only palliative surgery but falling to the negative zone after curative procedures. An excellent correlation exists between CEA levels and grade of tumor (more poorly differentiated tumors showing lower titers). Left-side colon lesions show significantly higher titers than right-side lesions. CEA values have been shown to be elevated in 90% of pancreatic carcinomas studied, in 60% of metastatic breast cancers, and in 35% of other tumors (ovary, head and neck, bladder, kidney, and prostate cancers). CEA levels in 35 ulcerative colitis patients show elevation during exacerbations (51%). During remissions titers fall toward normal, although in 31% still remaining greater than 2.5 ng/ml. In the six colectomies performed, CEA levels all fell into the negative zone postoperatively. Forty percent of adenomatous polyps showed elevated CEA titers (range 2.5-10.0) that dropped following polypectomy to the negative zone. Preoperative and postoperative CEA determinations are important in assessing the effectiveness of surgery. Serial CEA determinations are important in the follow-up period and in evaluation of the other modes of therapy (e.g., chemotherapy). These determinations of tumor antigenicity give the physician added prognostic insight into the behavior of the tumor growth. Rectal examination with guaiac determinations, sigmoidoscopy, cytology, barium enema, and a good clinical evaluation remain the primary tools for detecting colorectal disease. However, in the high-risk patient suspicious of developing cancer, CEA determinations as well as colonoscopy are now being used increasingly and provide additional highly valuable tools in the physician's armamentarium.CEA levels at recurrence and metastases; importance for detecting secondary disease.The relation of CEA plasma levels to prognostic factors was studied in 170 patients with various stages of colo-rectal cancer. Several parameters of known relevance for the prognosis were analyzed. Among the patients with involvement of regional lymph nodes at the time of the primary, 53% had a raised CEA value (greater than 5 ng/ml serum) as opposed to 21% when this was not the case (p less than 0.05%). When serosal break-through had occured, 47% of the patients had raised values compared to 21% of those with no serosal break-through (p less than 0.02%). After radical surgery, all patients who remained healthy acquired persistent low plasma CEA, giving the assay a prognostic value. Altogether 20 patients had local recurrences without distant metastases and were thus potential candidates for a re-operation for cure. 70% had raised CEA plasma values, giving the assay a better than expected usefulness in the clinical follow-up, the significance of the difference from operated and healthy patients or healthy control persons being high, p less than 0.001%. The secondary rise in CEA appeared to be unconnected with whether or not the primary tumor had been accompanied by raised plasma CEA. The localization and the histopathological differentiation of the primary tumor seemed to be of less importance for the serum CEA than the dissemination of the tumor.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen in detection of asymptomatic disseminated disease in colorectal carcinoma.Fifty one patients were studied prospectively to evaluate the role of sequential determinations of the carcino-embryonic antigen concentration in the detection of asymptomatic disseminated disease after curative resection for colorectal carcinoma. Computed tomography of the liver was performed during the immediate postoperative period in all patients. Serum concentrations of the antigen were estimated at three month intervals for a minimum of two years. Computed tomography at the time of operation detected occult hepatic metastases in 12 patients. Of the remaining 39 patients, six developed local recurrence alone, two developed disseminated disease in the absence of hepatic metastases, and one developed hepatic disease at 10 months, as detected by sequential computed tomography. Of all 13 patients with asymptomatic hepatic metastases, only eight developed an increase in serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentrations before death. The median interval between detection by computed tomography and rise in antigen concentrations was 7.5 months. The corresponding median interval from increase in concentration to death was only 5.5 months. Of the six patients who developed local recurrence alone, only two had raised concentrations of the antigen. These results suggest that increase in the serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentration occurs late in colorectal carcinoma.The utility of FDG-PET/CT as an effective tool for detecting recurrent colorectal cancer regardless of serum CEA levels.Tumor recurrence of colorectal cancers (CRC) is generally followed up by analyses of the serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels. However, recent evidence suggests that tumor recurrence can also be visualized by 18F-fluoro-deoxyglucose emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) in patients with normal CEA levels. We retrospectively evaluated the diagnostic performance of FDG-PET/CT in patients with suspected recurrence of CRC by comparing PET/CT performance in patients with normal CEA levels with PET/CT performance in patients with elevated CEA levels.A total of 235 patients with CRC who had been treated with surgery and/or chemotherapy/radiotherapy underwent PET/CT for the detection of tumor recurrence. The patients [96 females and 139 males; age (mean  SD) 59.9  12.6 years; range 18-85] were divided into 2 groups based on whether their CEA levels were normal (<5 ng/ml) (Group 1, n = 118) or elevated (>5 ng/ml) (Group 2, n = 117). All of the patients had suspected recurrence based on raised CEA levels, clinical symptoms, and/or tumor detection using other imaging modalities.Of the 235 patients, 172 (73.1 %) had disease recurrence confirmed by a pathological examination (either biopsy or surgical exploration) or clinical follow-up studies. The FDG-PET/CT study yielded a true positive in detecting recurrence in 169 (71.9 %) patients, a true negative in 53 (22.5 %) patients, a false negative in 3 (1.2 %) patients and a false positive in 10 (4.2 %) patients. CRC recurrence was detected in 64.4 % (76/118) and 88 % (103/117) patients in Group 1 and Group 2 with FDG-PET/CT, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of the FDG-PET/CT study for establishing recurrence were 100, 84, 89.4, 100 and 93.2 %, respectively, for Group 1; by contrast, these parameters were 97.1, 84.6, 98, 78.5 and 95.7 %, respectively, for Group 2. The number of patients with hepatic and extra-hepatic metastases, such as lung and abdominal lymph node metastasis, detected with FDG-PET/CT was significantly different in Group 1 than in Group 2; however, the number of patients with local recurrence and peritoneal implants detected with FDG-PET/CT was not different between the two groups.FDG-PET/CT can accurately detect tumor recurrence in patients with suspected recurrent CRC, even for patients with normal CEA levels.Modelling of serial carcinoembryonic antigen changes in colorectal cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) is a tumour marker mainly used for detection of recurrent colorectal cancer. CEA series in 295 patients, who had a macroscopic radical resection of a primary colorectal cancer were studied. A kinetic model was fitted to CEA series of individual patients. Applying the kinetic model recurrences were identified with a sensitivity of 70-80% and specificity of 80-90%. Simulations were performed in order to find the optimal sampling strategy for CEA during follow-up. Simulations showed that CEA determinations at a few weeks interval between would be optimal for early detection of recurrences.Clinical validity of tissue carcinoembryonic antigen expression as ancillary to serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentration in patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer.Although serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level is prognostic in colorectal cancer, the prognostic role of tumour CEA expression is unclear. The aim of this study is to identify the prognostic and surveillance roles of tissue CEA expression along with serum CEA concentration in patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer.Between January and December 2003, 294 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer were included in the study. Correlation of tissue CEA expression with overall survival (OS), disease-free survival (DFS) and elevated serum CEA concentration at tumour recurrence were analysed.Tissue CEA expression was positive in 215 patients (73.1%). CEA expression was an independent prognostic factor for OS [hazard ratio (HR) = 2.537, 95% confidence interval (CI) = 1.065-6.042, P = 0.035] and DFS (HR = 3.090, 95% CI = 1.405-6.795, P = 0.005). Elevation of serum CEA at tumour recurrence was significantly lower in patients without than with tissue CEA expression (14.3 vs 57.6%, P = 0.045). Moreover, when patients were grouped according to a combination of serum CEA elevation and tissue CEA expression, those with tissue CEA expression and elevated serum CEA (group 3) had significantly poorer OS and DFS (P < 0.001 each) than those without CEA expression and elevated serum CEA (group 1) and those with either tissue CEA expression or elevated serum CEA (group 2). OS (P = 0.006) and DFS (P = 0.027) were both significantly greater in group 1 than in group 2.Tissue CEA expression is a prognostic factor in patients with colorectal cancer. Analysis of tissue CEA expression may be helpful in determining the clinical utility of serial measurements of serum CEA as surveillance in patients with curatively resected colorectal cancer.[Follow up in carcinoma of the large intestine].A valid program of follow-up has always been a crucial point in the overall therapy of the colon-cancer. In this retrospective study, the authors have used as specimen 74 patients put under observation between the years 1987 and 1992. The patient have been followed throughout the diagnostic period with various methods. It has been the will of the authors, who have presented their protocol of reference, to put under comparison the various controlling methods in order to visualize their reliability, specificity and the indication of each one of them. The CEA is the most sensible haemanalysis for lifting the doubt of recidivation. As for the TAC and ultrasound it has been reserved the job of formulating a correct diagnosis; the results of both diagnostics through imagery have been more or less the same. However, the ultrasound examination have shown more false positives than the TAC. The research of the blood occult in the stool is a rapid and economic detection in the case of intramural recidivations, even if we cannot disregard the share of false positives. A high specificity for the study of intramural recidivations has been offered by the endoscopic scan particularly when associated by a brushing and biopsy.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen in relation to survival, DNA ploidy pattern, and recurrent disease in 406 colorectal carcinoma patients.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in relation to survival, flow cytometric DNA ploidy pattern, Dukes stage, and recurrent disease was prospectively evaluated in 406 patients with colorectal carcinoma. In 246 patients (61%) the carcinomas were DNA aneuploid. Increased preoperative CEA levels (> 5 micrograms/l) were found in 151 of 363 evaluable patients (42%). Dukes stage-B patients with preoperative CEA elevation showed significantly poorer prognosis than those with normal CEA values (p = 0.001). A weak but significant correlation was found between preoperative CEA level and Dukes stage (Kendall's tau = 0.25, p < 0.01). Of 50 evaluable patients with clinical recurrence and postoperative normal or normalized CEA levels, 28 (56%) had a rise in CEA before or at the time of clinical recurrence. The sensitivity of the CEA test for primary and for recurrent disease was not significantly different in the DNA aneuploid and the DNA near-diploid groups.Variation in recognition of recurrent colonic cancer by different CEA assays.Forty-six patients were followed with serial CEA determinations by two CEA assays after curative resection of a primary or recurrent colonic cancer. Thirteen have had a histologically proven recurrence, of which only six (46 percent) were predicted by both assays, while seven (54 percent) were predicted by one assay only. The assays appear complementary in indicating tumor recurrence, and preliminary findings suggest that it may be beneficial to follow patients with more than one CEA assay after resection of a primary or recurrent colonic cancer.CEA radioimmunoassay. Clinical applications in colorectal cancer.Since 1978 carcino-embryonic antigen determinations (CEA) have been used systematically in the preoperative as well as in the postoperative assessment of 139 patients operated for colorectal cancers. From these data results that CEA determination is of poor value for screening purposes, as 30% of the tumors don't produce the specific CEA antigen. High preoperative levels which normalize after operation, are equal to curative resection. The importance of CEA is emphasized in the postoperative follow-up of especially Dukes B and C lesions, where starting from normal base figures, increasing CEA levels are suggesting recurrences, long before their clinical evidence. Serial CEA determinations may show a slow rise, and in these cases a second look procedure can be considered. Clinical examination stays primordial; CEA is a good marker, and on account of the low cost, allows to be inserted in the postoperative follow-up scheme.Systematic follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer in Norway: a population-based audit of effectiveness, costs, and compliance.In this study, we analyzed the Norwegian guidelines for systematic follow-up after curative colorectal cancer surgery in a large single institution. Three hundred fourteen consecutive unselected patients undergoing curative surgery for colorectal cancer between 1996 and 1999 were studied with regard to asymptomatic curable recurrence, compliance with the program, and cost. Follow-up included carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) interval measurements, colonoscopy, ultrasonography of the liver, and radiography of the chest. In 194 (62%) of the patients, follow-up was conducted according to the Norwegian guidelines. Twenty-one patients (11%) were operated on for curable recurrence, and 18 patients (9%) were disease free after curative surgery for recurrence at evaluation. Four metachronous tumors (2%) were found. CEA interval measurement had to be made most frequently (534 tests needed) to detect one asymptomatic curable recurrence. Follow-up program did not influence cancer-specific survival. Overall compliance with the surveillance program was 66%, being lowest for colonoscopy (55%) and highest for ultrasonography of the liver (85%). The total program cost was 228,117 euro (US 280,994 dollars), translating into 20,530 euro (US 25,289 dollars) for one surviving patient after surgery for recurrence. The total diagnosis yield with regard to disease-free survival after surgery for recurrence was 9%. Compliance was moderate. Whether the continuing implementation of such program and cost are justified should be debated.Can postoperative surveillance with serial CEA immunoscintigraphy detect resectable rectal cancer recurrence and potentially improve tumor-free survival?This study was performed to determine if postoperative serial monitoring of rectal cancer patients can be performed with an immunoscintigraphic imaging test for carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). It was also of interest to assess whether this test, in combination with standard monitoring procedures used in an intensive surveillance plan, can result in the identification of surgically salvageable patients.Forty consecutive resected Dukes' B and C rectal cancer patients underwent a prospective, single-institution, surveillance trial of physical examination (including digital rectal examination), endoscopy, CT of the abdomen and pelvis, liver ultrasound, chest x-ray, blood CEA, and CEA immunoscintigraphy with arcitumomab (CEA-Scan, Immunomedics, Morris Plains, NJ) every 6 months for the first 2 years and every 12 months for the next 3 years after initial operation. Outcomes were compared with those from a similar group of 69 patients treated previously at the same institution but without CEA imaging.A total of 219 CEA imaging studies were performed without any significant adverse effects or immune responses, and resulted in lesion sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive and negative predictive values of 94.1%, 97.5%, 97.3%, 76.2%, and 99.5%, respectively. Of the 40 patients, 16 developed 22 surgically confirmed local or distant recurrences, and CEA imaging correctly disclosed 82% of these lesions pre-operatively. All of the patients found to have recurrences had at least one tumor site by CEA imaging; only 6 of 16 had elevated blood CEA titers. On a patient-basis, there was a sensitivity of 100%, a specificity of 79.2%, an accuracy of 87.5%, and positive and negative predictive values of 76.2% and 100%, respectively. The potential therapeutic benefit of serial arcitumomab imaging is suggested by the fact that 6 of 16 patients (37.5%) with recurrence underwent potentially curative second-look operations, compared with 6 of 69 (8.7%) of a comparable population studied at this institution during an earlier 6-year period, using all of the same tests except CEA imaging. None of the patients in this historic control group survived more than 21 months, although the mean survival of the six patients resected for cure in the study population was 35 months (range 11 to 69 months). During 6 years of followup, three of the six re-resected patients eventually died of cancer recurrence, two died from other causes (and were confirmed by necropsy to be tumor-free), and one patient is still free of disease in the sixth year. CEA scanning appeared to be more predictive of recurrence than blood CEA testing or other diagnostic modalities.Arcitumomab inclusion in intensive surveillance of patients with resected rectal cancer can disclose tumor recurrence at a stage that allowed surgical salvage therapy in 37.5% of the 16 patients with recurrence who had second-look surgery, and in 19% the patients were free of disease during longterm followup. This pilot study suggests that a randomized prospective trial comparing standard surveillance procedures to the use of CEA imaging added thereto should be undertaken.Cost and effectiveness of follow-up examinations in patients with colorectal cancer resected for cure in a French population-based study.The cost of follow-up examinations for patients having undergone potentially curative surgery for colorectal cancer is considerable. The aim of this study was to provide a thorough assessment of the cost and effectiveness of the follow-up tests used during the 5 years after surgical resection for colorectal cancer and its recurrences. We studied medical and economic data from the records of 256 patients registered in the Herault Tumor Registry who underwent potentially curative surgical resection in 1992. Recurrence, curative recurrence, survival, and the cost of follow-up tests were assessed respectively for at least 5 years. We analyzed the cost and effectiveness of follow-up tests in patients who received either follow-up with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring as advocated by the 1998 French consensus conference recommendations (standard follow-up) or a more minimal follow-up schedule. Nine patients died in the postoperative period. The 5-year survival rates in the standard and minimal follow-up groups were 85% and 79%, respectively (p=0.25). Cost-effectiveness ratios were 2123 in Dukes' stage A patients, 4306 in Dukes' stage B patients, and 9600 in Dukes' stage C patients. Cost-effectiveness ratios for CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography per patient alive in the standard follow-up group were 1238 and 2261.5, respectively. Cost-effectiveness ratios for CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography per patient alive in the minimal follow-up group were 1478 and 573, respectively. There were no survivors 5 years after a recurrence when the recurrence was detected by physical examination, chest X-ray, and colonoscopy in either follow-up group. Dukes' classification is a poor indicator of patient selection. The follow-up tests should only include CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of recurrence.Radioimmunoguided surgery in recurrent colorectal cancer: the role of carcinoembryonic antigen, computerized tomography, and physical examination.From January 1986 to December 1987, 32 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer had second-look radioimmunoguided surgery (RIGS system). All patients had pathologic confirmation of recurrence. The RIGS system identified 81% of recurrences, and in six patients recurrent tumor was identified only by RIGS. All patients had physical examination, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assay, and computerized tomography of the abdomen and pelvis. Detection of recurrence was based on symptoms in six, elevated CEA value in 25, and physical examination in one. The CEA was elevated preoperatively in 30 patients; two false-negative results occurred in symptomatic patients who had pelvic recurrence. The median CEA value in those with liver recurrence was 30 ng/ml (range 5.2 to 298) and for pelvic recurrence 13 ng/ml (range 1.9 to 31) (P less than .05). The overall sensitivity of CT was 41% (abdomen other than liver 37%, liver 56%, and pelvis 22%). The combination of elevated CEA, symptoms, and physical findings identified 100% of recurrences. We conclude that a rising CEA remains the most accurate indicator of recurrence. CT should not be done routinely to detect recurrent colorectal cancer unless CEA is elevated or the patient is symptomatic. In our study the intraoperative use of the RIGS system aided the surgeon in identifying occult tumors.CEA as a monitor of gastrointestinal malignancy.Ninety-four patients with carcinoma of the colon have been followed with serial determinations of plasma CEA (carcinoembryonic antigen) levels over a 3-year period using the Hansen assay. Nine hundred twelve CEA determinations have been made in these patients. Plasma CEA levels rose in 90% of the instances of clinical progression documented in these patients. In 30% of patients, this rise indicated progression 6 months or more before it was detected by standard clinical methods. Unfortunately, a few patients never developed elevated CEA levels even though disease clearly progressed. False positive results have also been encountered, with significant elevations occurring in patients who have since remained without evidence of disease for several months. Our data indicate that at least two sequential elevated CEA values, the second being higher, must be a minimal criterion for consideration of possible progression of disease. Even with this standard, we have encountered false positive results in 10% of our patients, indicating recurrence or progression where none has occurred clinically. CEA measurement is of limited usefulness for 30 days after curative surgery, because the elevation of CEA levels due to the original amount of tumor present as well as due to surgery per se may persist for this length of time in a significant number of patients. On the other hand, CEA levels have responded to chemotherapy in close correlation with observed clinical course in those patients with metastatic disease treated in this series. Initial pretherapy CEA values have so far proved to be good prognostic indicators of disease course following complete resection. With an initial CEA value of less than 2.5 ng/ml of plasma, recurrent has been rare (1/20). If the pretreatment CEA was greater than 7.0 ng/ml, it has been the rule (7/9).Carcinoembryonic antigen for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of colorectal cancer.During recent years a discussion about cost-effectiveness and importance of follow-up determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) after curative resection of large bowel cancer has developed.Between 1990 and 1998 follow-up CEA levels of 1,321 patients after curative colorectal cancer resection were prospectively collected in cooperation with family physicians, CEA determinations were made with different assays by various laboratories. The reported findings were adjusted for the different methods used.306 patients developed recurrent disease following curative cancer resection (23.2% of all patients). Regarding the role of follow-up CEA determination, they were divided into: I. no preoperative CEA determination/insufficient follow-up (N = 47); II. no elevation of CEA with primary cancer, a) elevation with recurrent disease (N = 62), b) no elevation at any time point (N = 53), c) role of CEA not completely elucidated (N = 41); III. elevated CEA levels with primary cancer, a) no increase with recurrent disease (N = 21), b) increase with other symptoms of recurrent disease (N = 45), c) increased levels as early symptom of recurrent disease (N = 37). 30 patients (9.8% of all patients with recurrent disease; 2.3% of all patients) with increased CEA levels at the time of recurrent disease underwent surgical resection with curative intention (R0 resection).Our findings indicate that up to 47% of the patients with recurrent disease and 11% of all patients (N = 144, groups IIa + IIIb + IIIc) could benefit from routine follow-up CEA determinations after curative colorectal cancer resection. Nonetheless, only 2.3% of all patients with elevated CEA levels underwent R0 resection of recurrent disease. Despite these detection and R0 resectability rates, CEA plays a crucial role in the early detection of recurrent disease and remains an important part of routine patient care after curative resection of colorectal cancer.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography as an adjunct to carcinoembryonic antigen in the management of patients with presumed recurrent colorectal cancer and nondiagnostic radiologic workup.The purpose of this study was to determine the role of fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (PET) in localizing disease in patients with colorectal cancer with radiologically occult symptomatology or increases in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level.Two hundred seventy-seven patients with colorectal cancer underwent PET scanning between November 1998 and September 2000 prompted by (1) increasing CEA level and nondiagnostic imaging or (2) symptoms with normal CEA level and nondiagnostic imaging. PET results were correlated with operative findings/histology, clinical follow-up data, and CEA level to determine PET's accuracy in determining the source of symptoms or CEA.Fifteen patients had increasing CEA levels, and 14 had abnormal PET. Two of these 14 were denied exploration because PET suggested widely metastatic disease. Nine patients underwent exploration with curative intent. In 1 patient, recurrence was not pathologically confirmed (false-positive rate, 8%). Two had disease beyond that predicted by PET, and 6 underwent complete resection and normalized their CEA levels. Four symptomatic patients with normal CEA levels and negative x-rays had abnormal PET; at exploration, 3 had no evidence of recurrence.PET imaging can often accurately localize the source of radiologically occult increases in CEA level and select that subset of patients eligible for therapeutic laparotomy. Symptomatic, PET-positive patients with normal CEA levels frequently undergo nontherapeutic laparotomy, and PET findings should be interpreted with caution in these patients.Intensive risk-adjusted follow-up with the CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 tumor marker panel and abdominal ultrasonography to diagnose operable colorectal cancer recurrences: effect on survival.Intensive risk-adjusted follow-up leads to improved resectability of tumor recurrences and better overall survival among patients who have undergone surgery for colorectal cancer.Long-term observational single-center study.University of Pisa, Pisa, Italy.One hundred eight disease-free patients who had undergone surgery for colorectal cancer were submitted to long-term follow-up with the serum CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 tumor marker (TM) panel and abdominal ultrasonography.Sensitivities and specificities of TMs, abdominal ultrasonography, and abdominal and chest computed tomography (CT); the median survival among patients operated on and those not operated on and the cumulative 5-year overall survival among the entire group.Twenty-two patients with asymptomatic colorectal cancer recurred 32 times. The CEA, TPA, CA19.9, CA72.4, and TM panel sensitivities were 46.9%, 34.4%, 9.4%, 9.4%, and 81.0%, respectively, and the mean (SD) lead times before confirmation of recurrence were 4.3 (4.8), 4.1 (4.7), 8.3 (10.9), 5.0 (7.0), and 5.3 (5.8) months, respectively. Abdominal and chest CT sensitivities were 100.0%. Among 86 patients without recurrence, specificities of the TM panel and all panel markers were 100.0%, while specificities of abdominal ultrasonography, abdominal CT, and skeletal CT were 99.9%, 99.0%, and 100.0%, respectively. The median survival after first recurrence was 16 months (range, 3-48 months) for 8 patients with recurrence who did not undergo second-line surgery. Among 14 remaining patients who underwent metastasectomy, the median survival after first recurrence was 37 months (range, 12-187 months; P = .03). Among the entire group of 108 patients, the cumulative 5-year overall survival was 88.7%.Long-term intensive risk-adjusted monitoring using the CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 TM panel and abdominal ultrasonography allows early detection of most recurrences. Patients can then undergo radical metastasectomy, with potentially improved overall survival.CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 in patients surviving colorectal cancer without recurrent disease.To establish a baseline and intraindividual fluctuations of the tumour markers CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 in patients cured from colorectal cancer, and to test the hypothesis that serum concentrations and intraindividual fluctuations do not differ from the concentrations in cancer-free individuals.Ninety patients with colorectal cancer, who had undergone surgery with curative intent, were still alive at least 5 years after surgery with no signs of recurrent disease. Serum levels of tumour markers CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 before and up to 2 years after surgery were analysed after the prospective study was terminated.The pre-operative serum levels of CEA, CA 50 and CEA 242 were elevated in 36%, 16% and 20% of the patients. They were lowered after curative surgery. A small increase of CEA levels was found after the initial post-operative decrease. The intraindividual fluctuations for CA 50 and CA 242 did not exceed 15% but in 24% of the patients the serum levels of CA 50 were high and oscillating. The patients cured from Dukes > C cancer had higher serum concentrations of CEA than patients who had a Dukes > B cancer, which were higher than in patients who had Dukes > A cancer. Concentrations of CA 242 were higher in patients cured from Dukes > A than patients cured from Dukes> B or C cancers.During the first 2 years after curative surgery for colorectal cancer the serum levels of CEA did not differ from those levels in normal cancer-free subjects. The serum levels of CEA were related to Dukes > staging whereas the levels of CA 242 were inversely related to Dukes > staging.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen and cytokeratins for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of colorectal cancer.To evaluate the efficacy of postoperative serial assay of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and cytokeratins for the detection of recurrent disease in patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma after radical surgery.Between 1993 and 2000, 120 patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma underwent radical surgery in the Department of Surgical Gastroenterology, Federal University of Sao Paulo-Escola Paulista de Medicina, Sao Paulo, Brazil. Periodic postoperative evaluation was performed by assaying markers in peripheral serum, colonoscopy and imaging examination. Presence of CEA was detected using the Delfia method with 5 microg/L threshold, and cytokeratins using the LIA-mat TPA-M Prolifigen method with 72 U/L threshold.In the first postoperative year, patients without recurrent disease had normal levels of CEA (1.5 +/- 0.9 microg/L) and monoclonal tissue polypeptide antigen-M (TPA-M, 64.4 +/- 47.8 U/L), while patients with recurrences had high levels of CEA (6.9 +/- 9.8 microg/L, P < 0.01) and TPA-M (192.2 +/- 328.8 U/L, P < 0.05). During the second postoperative year, patients without tumor recurrence had normal levels of CEA (2.0 +/- 1.8 microg/L) and TPA-M (50.8 +/- 38.4 U/L), while patients with recurrence had high levels of CEA (66.3 +/- 130.8 microg/L, P < 0.01) and TPA-M (442.7 +/- 652.8 U/L, P < 0.05). The mean follow-up time was 22.3 mo. There was recurrence in 23 cases. Five reoperations were performed without achieving radical excision. Rises in tumor marker levels preceded identification of recurrences: CEA in seven (30%) and TPA-M in eleven individuals (48%).Intensive follow-up by serial assay of CEA and cytokeratins allows early detection of colorectal neoplasm recurrence.[The value of follow-up studies after surgery of carcinoma of the large intestine].Use of CA 19-9 in the early detection of recurrences in colorectal cancer: comparison with CEA.The serum levels of CA 19-9 were determined in the follow-up of 370 patients with colorectal cancer and compared with CEA. An increase in CA 19-9 preceded clinical diagnosis of recurrence in 25% of 72 patients. The mean time between the rise in CA 19-9 and clinical diagnosis of relapse was 3.7 months (median 3). Sensitivity of CA 19-9 in the early diagnosis of recurrence was much lower than that obtained for CEA (75%). Only 1 patient had elevated CA 19-9 levels and normal CEA.Five-year follow-up after radical surgery for colorectal cancer. Results of a prospective randomized trial.To determine whether an intensified follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer can lead to improved reresectability and a better long-term survival.A prospective randomized trial of 106 patients.Oulu University Hospital, a referral center in northern Finland.A total of 106 consecutive patients who underwent radical resection for colorectal cancer, 54 of whom were randomized into a conventional follow-up group and 52 into an intensified follow-up group.After a 5-year follow-up, the time of detection of recurrence, the recurrence rates, the first method showing recurrence, the mode of recurrence, reresectability, and survival were compared between the groups.The recurrences were identified earlier in the intensified follow-up group than in the conventional follow-up group (mean +/- SD, 10 +/- 5 months vs 15 +/- 10 months). The overall recurrence rate was 41%, with 39% in the conventional group and 42% in the intensified group. Carcinoembryonic antigen determination was the most common method showing recurrence in both groups. Endoscopy and ultrasound were beneficial in the intensified follow-up group, but computed tomography failed to improve the diagnostics. The mode of recurrence did not differ between the groups. Radical resections were performed on 19% (8/43) of the patients, 14% (3/21) in the conventional group and 22% (5/22) in the intensified group. The cumulative 5-year survival was 54% in the conventional group and 59% in the intensified group.Earlier detection of recurrent colorectal cancer by intensified follow-up does not lead to either significantly increased reresectability or improved 5-year survival.A retrospective study of serial CEA determinations in the early detection of recurrent colorectal cancer.In the past five years, routine CEA determinations have been carried out on all patients after curative operation for colorectal carcinoma. These patients also underwent a clinical follow-up examination in the Oncology Outpatient Department. In 86 patients, recurrence of a tumor was confirmed. In 31 cases, a second-look operation was carried out. The CEA determinations were retrospectively analyzed in these patients and correlated with the time the recurrence of the tumor was diagnosed. These results show that of 86 patients only 15 (17.4 per cent) had pathologic CEA values before clinical symptoms of tumor recurrence. In the patient group with local recurrence, only 11 (23.9 per cent) of 46 patients had previously pathologically raised CEA values. Of 31 patients, 15 (48.4 per cent) underwent curative resection after the second-look operation. At this time, 12 patients (38.7 per cnt) still had normal CEA values, whereas only three patients (9.7 per cent) had pathologically raised CEA values. From these results, it was established that early diagnosis of tumor recurrence was very low. Therefore, one should not rely more on postoperative routine CEA determinations in the postoperative monitoring of patients following curative operations for colorectal carcinoma than on regular comprehensive follow-up examinations of these patients.Usefulness of analytical CEA doubling time and half-life time for overlooked synchronous metastases in colorectal carcinoma.Measurement of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) has been widely applied to detect recurrence, especially of colorectal carcinoma. The validity however, is still controversial. We investigated serial changes in CEA values to calculate whether the CEA doubling time and half-life time could predict metastatic progression or prognosis in colorectal carcinoma.Pre- and post-operative serial serum CEA contents were determined in 22 cases of colorectal cancer with or without metastasis. CEA values were determined by enzyme immunoassay (EIA). Patients were assigned depending upon survival time (within vs. more than 18 months after primary resection) for assessment of CEA doubling time. From the gradient of the semi-logarithmic CEA graph, the preoperative doubling time was calculated and the postoperative half-life time was estimated according to the diagnosis of metastases within 2 years after primary resection [metastasis (+) or (-)].In spite of the effect of curative re-operation of metastatic lesions or of postoperative adjuvant chemotherapy, the CEA doubling time of the groups showed a relation with prognosis (p = 0.045, Student's t-test) when the patients were divided into >18 and < or =18 months survival time. The CEA half-life time of the groups without overlooked metastases was statistically longer than those with (mean +/- SD 8.01 +/- 2.07 and 4.33 +/- 1.11, respectively, p < 0.01, one-factor ANOVA test). Clearance (k) showed a significant difference between the groups (p < 0.001, Student's t-test).The CEA doubling time appeared to be a less independent prognostic factor, whereas prolongation of the CEA half-life time might potentially suggest the existence of overlooked synchronous metastases from colorectal carcinoma.CEA as a prognostic index in colorectal cancer.The carcinoembryonic antigen, CEA, is the tumor marker most used in colorectal patients, principally during follow up after radical surgery. High serum CEA level before surgery is often associated with worse prognosis, in some studies.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen levels (CEA) and the frequency of recurrence.Eighty-three patients with colorectal cancer at Dukes stages A, B or C were evaluated retrospectively. The patients follow up was at least two years or to death. CEA was determined in serum by enzyme immunoassay (Sorin Biomedica), normal value 0.5ng/ml.Disease recurrence was observed in 32 patients (38.5%), 13 Dukes B and 19 Dukes C. Seventy five per cent of the patients with CEA higher than 10ng/ml relapsed and 80% of the patients without recurrence had normal CEA. Disease recurrence in patients with preoperative elevated CEA occurred during the first year of follow up in 56% of the patients.Although the tumor stage is today the most valuable prognostic variable in colorectal cancer, the preoperative CEA value can provide some additional information in the prognosis of the patient.Eighty-four potential second-look operations based on sequential carcinoembryonic antigen determinations and clinical investigations in patients with recurrent gastrointestinal cancer.In our study of patients with resected primary gastrointestinal cancer, slope analysis of the post-operatively increasing carcinoembryonic antigen time courses signaled relapse in about 80 percent of the patients up to 12 months before positive clinical diagnosis. In 29 patients, clinical confirmation of the relapse could be obtained only after second-look surgery. Slope analysis generally differentiated localized from metastatic disease and therefore also predicted the site of relapse. A first evaluation of 84 patients with potential cases of second-look operations provided evidence for a significant increase in survival. Recently, the evaluation of individual carcinoembryonic antigen doubling times was used to derive an individual prognosis since doubling times strongly correlated with the survival of untreated patients. On this basis, it was clearly possible to show the benefit of second-look operation, since patients with resectable recurrences exhibited longer survival times compared with patients with similar carcinoembryonic antigen doubling times without treatment. Moreover, the introduction of monoclonal antibodies with increased specificity for malignant states, has facilitated the selection of patients for second-look operation because unspecific carcinoembryonic antigen elevations are less frequent and recurrent disease can be predicted more reliably due to the higher carcinoembryonic antigen increments associated with malignant growth.CEA, TPS, CA 19-9 and CA 72-4 and the fecal occult blood test in the preoperative diagnosis and follow-up after resective surgery of colorectal cancer.In a prospective clinical study we examined the diagnostic procedures used in the preoperative diagnosis of colorectal cancer patients (n = 176) and the value of supplementation of standard diagnostic methods (clinical investigation, colonoscopy, barium enema, ultrasound, computer tomography) with a test for occult fecal blood (FOBT) and an expanded tumor marker panel (CA 19-9, TPS and CA 72-4 in addition to CEA) in the postoperative follow-up (n = 116, mean follow-up 21 months). Preoperative diagnosis based on colonoscopy/barium enema, followed by histology and the imaging methods, in most cases US and/or CT. Patients with postoperative stage Dukes D and after palliative surgery were excluded from the follow-up study (n = 43). The patients were seen every three months (clinical investigation, US, CT, tumor markers, FOBT) within the first two postoperative years and every half a year thereafter. 83 of the 116 patients (16%) developed a recurrent disease and 5 of them could be reoperated with curative intention. In addition to the 19 patients 14 simultaneously admitted patients with recurrence of colorectal cancer (total n = 33) were studied. The results of our study analyzing the sensitivity and specificity of colonoscopy, tumor, markers and the FOBT in the preoperative and postoperative phases as well as in the diagnosis of recurrent disease of colorectal cancer confirms the view that FOBT and tumor markers cannot replace endoscopic and imaging methods. However they support the concept, that diagnosis and follow-up of colorectal cancer should be based on a combination of clinical investigation and imaging methods (US, CT etc. and endoscopic and/or x-ray examination) with supplementation by FOBT and determination of tumor markers, mainly CEA. In the case a patient is asking for prognostic and recurrence information as early and as valid as possible we currently recommend the following procedure for the first two years after surgery: every three months the determination of tumor markers, FOBT as well as ultrasound of the upper abdomen and CT of the lower abdomen and every half year a total colonoscopy. The question of whether this program will also have a therapeutical relevance depends on several factors like the personal experience and concepts of the consulting surgeons and oncologists and also on the tasks and duties which are considered worthy by the patient for his further life if confronted with the diagnosis of recurrent colorectal cancer.Clinical significance of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in patients with adenocarcinoma in colon and rectum.Determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in serum has been performed in 253 patients with proved adenocarcinoma in the colon and rectum. Preoperative CEA was normal in 58.3% of the patients. A correlation between CEA level and Dukes' grading was found. There was, however, no statistically significant difference in recurrence rate between patients with normal and patients with elevated pre-operative CEA. Transient CEA elevation was seen in the follow-up period after curative resection in 21.8%. 75% of the patients with recurrence had abnormal CEA, and CEA elevation was the first sign of recurrence in 59.1%. The majority of these patients, however, had advanced disease not available for surgical treatment. In cases with local resectable tumour CEA often was normal. Only a few patients had advantage of CEA determination for diagnosis of recurrence and its routine use is therefore questioned.99Tcm-IMMU4 imaging in recurrent colorectal cancer: efficacy and impact on surgical management.The aims of this study were to evaluate the efficacy of scintigraphy with the 99Tcm-labelled anti-carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monoclonal antibody Fab' fragment (IMMU4) in the diagnosis of recurrent colorectal carcinoma and to investigate its usefulness in the intraoperative surgical management of patients undergoing re-operation because of a rising serum CEA. We evaluated 24 patients prospectively who had rising serum CEA 6-19 months after initial surgery for colorectal carcinoma. Ten patients had lesions confirmed by computed tomography, ultrasound, magnetic resonance imaging, endoscopic examination or barium enema. Fourteen patients had negative findings on one or more of the above studies, but were suspected of having occult disease from their rising serum CEA. All patients were scheduled for surgery for restaging during a "second look' procedure. Planar and single photon emission tomography (SPET) imaging was performed in all patients. All scintigraphic findings were correlated with surgical and histopathological results. The overall sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 81, 90 and 86% respectively when analysed by lesion, and 95, 60 and 88% respectively when analysed by patient. Ten of 14 (71%) patients with occult disease were correctly diagnosed as having recurrent disease. The SPET images were shown to have superior detectability (80%) compared with the planar images (35%). The surgeon judged the study to have had a neutral impact in 75% of the patients, but to have been helpful in 25%. We conclude that this antibody is potentially useful in detecting recurrent colorectal carcinoma in patients with rising serum CEA, especially when conventional imaging is negative or equivocal. It can also be helpful in altering planned surgery.Postherapeutic follow-up of colorectal cancer patients treated with curative intent.Based on published data showing that despite a curative intent treatment approximately 50% of colorectal cancer (CRC) patients will present with disease relapse, and on the results of meta-analysis which showed improved survival by using intense posttreatment follow-up programs, we aimed in the present study to evaluate the additional benefit of routine abdominal ultrasound in the follow-up program of CRC patients.We conducted a prospective study, on 107 patients diagnosed with stage III CRC. Patients follow-up included: history and physical examination, CEA determination, and abdomino-pelvic US every 3 months.Recurrent disease was observed in 36% of cases after a median follow-up interval of 24 months. The liver was the most frequent isolated site of disease recurrence (62%). Serum CEA level increased in most patients (69%) with recurrent disease. Also, a high percentage of relapses was diagnosed by routine abdominal US (62%).Our study illustrates the benefit of intense follow-up (CEA, abdominal US) after curative treatment of CRC.[Follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer: impact of positron emission tomography - computed tomography (PET/CT)].Postoperative surveillance has an important role in patient survival after curative resection of colorectal cancer.To describe the characteristics of the follow-up with positron emission tomography (PET) / computed tomography (CT)(PET/CT) and its impact in colorectal cancer (CRC) survivors after curative resection in a university hospital in Tochigi Prefecture, Japan.Consecutive review of patient's hospital charts who underwent presurgical staging with PET/CT for curative resection of colorectal cancer between April 2005 and March 2008. The follow-up data of these patients was reviewed until September 2008.Of 209 patients presurgically staged for CRC, 207 (male/female = 125/82; mean age = 65.3  11.3 years) underwent curative resection and were included in the present study. The compliance rate with the Japanese Society for Cancer of the Colon and Rectum (JSCCR) follow-up guidelines was 53%. The cumulative survival at the end of study interval was 96.4%. The test most commonly used in postoperative follow-up of CRC was the carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). PET/CT was the test that detected more patients with recurrent lesions (n = 11, positive predictive value = 23.4), including one patient with an asymptomatic curable recurrence (inguinal lymph node metastasis), also being the most effective test (2.1%). However, its high cost makes it the less cost-effective.The use of PET/CT in the postoperative follow-up after curative resection in CRC has proven to be an individualized and effective alternative in the finding of asymptomatic disease curable. Systematic CEA tests with contrast-enhanced CT as a first line of screening and PET/CT as a second line may be an alternative follow up approach after curative resection for CRC.[Value of oncologic follow-up of patients operated for colorectal cancer. A prospective study of 1000 patients].The purpose of our prospective study was to evaluate the contribution of follow-up in resected colorectal cancer.One-thousand patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma who underwent radial resection from January 1975 to January 1990 were prospectively divided into two groups: the first group (n = 442, 42%) entered a 5-year follow-up protocol and the second group (n = 558, 56%) was free to make unscheduled visits in case of symptoms.Recurrence was found in 31.5% of the patients in the first group compared with 33% in the second group. Chorioembryonic antigen was the most accurate test detecting recurrence: 77% of the cases (97% for hepatic metastasis). Surgical resection of recurrent tumors was performed in 37% of the group 1 patients (curative resection in 15%) and in 9% (curative resection in 1.5%) of the group 2 patients (p < 0.001). 5-year survival after recurrence in group 1 was 11.5% versus 1% in group 2 (p < 0.01).These results emphasize the rational for a follow-up program in patients undergoing surgery for colorectal cancer.Reoperation directed by carcinoembryonic antigen level: the importance of a thorough preoperative evaluation.Many asymptomatic patients suspected to have recurrent colorectal cancer based on an elevated carcinoembryonic antigen level will be spared unnecessary operation if strict attention is paid to their preoperative evaluation. Liver and renal function should be assessed. Unresectable extraabdominal and intraabdominal recurrence or metastases should be excluded. Patients being evaluated for recurrence after curative resection of a rectosigmoid cancer should undergo a bone scan. Having satisfactorily ensured normal results for these investigations, the surgeon should then proceed to search for an intraabdominal source of tumor recurrence.Postoperative follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer: a combined evaluation of CT scan, colonoscopy and tumour markers.The purpose of this study is to present the experience of our department regarding the importance of the systematic postoperative follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer, early diagnosis and treatment of the recurrence of the disease or a metachronous cancer.In a study that took place between October 2001 and February 2004 amongst 67 patients that were operated upon for colorectal cancer, 41 were systematically being followed up through CT scan, colonoscopy and tumour markers.In the 14th and 18th months postoperatively for 2 of the patients the CT scan showed hepatic metastasis, while the colonoscopy was negative. Regarding the tumour markers, one (CEA) was elevated in one patient while three were elevated in the others. For 2 out of the 41 patients the colonoscopy showed recurrence of the disease within one and two years respectively. The CT scan proved to be free of metastasis and the tumour markers were falling within the normal range for one of the patients while for the other CEA was elevated. Both patients underwent additional colectomy. Postoperative increase of the tumour markers was observed in 9 patients. The above patients had normal markers in the immediate postoperative period. For 4 out of the 9 patients recurrence or spread of the disease was observed while the rest of them are still being followed up.In conclusion, we believe that the systematic postoperative follow-up of the patients with colorectal cancer through CT, colonoscopy and the use of tumour markers contributes decisively to the early diagnosis and treatment of any possible recurrence of the cancer or a metachronous cancer or misdiagnosed concomitant cancer.CEA, CA 242, CA 19-9, CA 72-4 and hCGbeta in the diagnosis of recurrent colorectal cancer.The purpose of this study was to compare the utility of serum CEA, CA 19-9, CA 242, CA 72-4 and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG)beta in the follow-up of 102 surgically treated colorectal cancer patients, out of which 40 patients developed clinical recurrence.In patients with recurrent disease, serum samples were obtained at the time of clinical recurrence, and in the disease-free group, they were obtained postoperatively. The combined use of the markers was evaluated with logistic regression analysis. The sensitivities of the different tumour markers at various specificity levels were compared by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.When the five tumour markers, Dukes stage and location of the primary tumour were evaluated together in the same model, only CEA provided significant diagnostic information (p < 0.0005) in addition to the location of the primary tumour (p = 0.003). The diagnostic information provided by the other serum tumour markers was insignificant, although CA 72-4 approached borderline significance (p = 0.053). ROC curves were constructed and the difference in the values of the area under the curve (AUC) between the different serum tumour markers was determined at the time of clinical recurrence. Of the individual markers, the highest AUC was observed for CEA (AUC = 0.931). The difference in AUC values between CEA and the other tumour markers was highly significant (p < or = 0.001).CEA had the highest diagnostic accuracy in detecting recurrent colorectal cancer. Inclusion of CA 19-9, CA 242, CA 72-4 or hCGbeta in the model did not improve the accuracy, although CA 72-4 approached borderline significance (p = 0.053). Thus, CEA seems to retain its position as the surveillance marker of choice for patients surgically treated for colorectal cancer.Use of CA 19-9 in the early detection of recurrences in colorectal cancer: comparison with CEA.The serum levels of CA 19-9 were determined in the follow-up of 370 patients with colorectal cancer and compared with CEA. An increase in CA 19-9 preceded clinical diagnosis of recurrence in 25% of 72 patients. The mean time between the rise in CA 19-9 and clinical diagnosis of relapse was 3.7 months (median 3). Sensitivity of CA 19-9 in the early diagnosis of recurrence was much lower than that obtained for CEA (75%). Only 1 patient had elevated CA 19-9 levels and normal CEA.Effect of 3 to 5 years of scheduled CEA and CT follow-up to detect recurrence of colorectal cancer: the FACS randomized clinical trial.Intensive follow-up after surgery for colorectal cancer is common practice but is based on limited evidence.To assess the effect of scheduled blood measurement of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and computed tomography (CT) as follow-up to detect recurrent colorectal cancer treatable with curative intent.Randomized clinical trial in 39 National Health Service hospitals in the United Kingdom; 1202 eligible participants were recruited between January 2003 and August 2009 who had undergone curative surgery for primary colorectal cancer, including adjuvant treatment if indicated, with no evidence of residual disease on investigation.Participants were randomly assigned to 1 of 4 groups: CEA only (n = 300), CT only (n = 299), CEA+CT (n = 302), or minimum follow-up (n = 301). Blood CEA was measured every 3 months for 2 years, then every 6 months for 3 years; CT scans of the chest, abdomen, and pelvis were performed every 6 months for 2 years, then annually for 3 years; and the minimum follow-up group received follow-up if symptoms occurred.The primary outcome was surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent; secondary outcomes were mortality (total and colorectal cancer), time to detection of recurrence, and survival after treatment of recurrence with curative intent.After a mean 4.4 (SD, 0.8) years of observation, cancer recurrence was detected in 199 participants (16.6%; 95% CI, 14.5%-18.7%) overall; 71 of 1202 participants (5.9%; 95% CI, 4.6%-7.2%) were treated for recurrence with curative intent, with little difference according to Dukes staging (stage A, 5.1% [13/254]; stage B, 6.1% [34/553]; stage C, 6.2% [22/354]). Surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent was 2.3% (7/301) in the minimum follow-up group, 6.7% (20/300) in the CEA group, 8% (24/299) in the CT group, and 6.6% (20/302) in the CEA+CT group. Compared with minimum follow-up, the absolute difference in the percentage of patients treated with curative intent in the CEA group was 4.4% (95% CI, 1.0%-7.9%; adjusted odds ratio [OR], 3.00; 95% CI, 1.23-7.33), in the CT group was 5.7% (95% CI, 2.2%-9.5%; adjusted OR, 3.63; 95% CI, 1.51-8.69), and in the CEA+CT group was 4.3% (95% CI, 1.0%-7.9%; adjusted OR, 3.10; 95% CI, 1.10-8.71). The number of deaths was not significantly different in the combined intensive monitoring groups (CEA, CT, and CEA+CT; 18.2% [164/901]) vs the minimum follow-up group (15.9% [48/301]; difference, 2.3%; 95% CI, -2.6% to 7.1%).Among patients who had undergone curative surgery for primary colorectal cancer, intensive imaging or CEA screening each provided an increased rate of surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent compared with minimal follow-up; there was no advantage in combining CEA and CT. If there is a survival advantage to any strategy, it is likely to be small.isrctn.org Identifier: 41458548.18F-FDG PET/CT superior to serum CEA in detection of colorectal cancer and its recurrence.The aim of this study was to examine whether positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) can detect more cases of colorectal cancer (CRC) than serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), both at initial staging and during surveillance for recurrence. A retrospective review of 639 CRC patients imaged with PET/CT was performed. PET/CT was superior to serum CEA in detecting CRC, identifying 2.5 times as many CRC at initial staging compared to serum CEA and 1.5 times as many CRC recurrences. The current guideline recommendations of utilizing PET/CT only in the context of a rising serum CEA will miss more than one third of all CRC recurrences. Detection of resectable recurrences in colorectal cancer patients with 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography.To evaluate the usefulness of 2-[(18)F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) in the early detection of resectable recurrences of colorectal cancer (CRC) and the impacts on the clinical disease management.FDG-PET/CT was performed on patients with elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels >5 ng/mL (Group 1) or suspicious recurrences without rise in serum CEA levels (Group 2). The results were analyzed on the basis of histological data, disease progression, and/or clinical follow-up. Recurrence was defined as evidence of recurrent lesions within 6 months of the FDG-PET/CT scan. Resectable recurrences and changes in management were calculated based on medical records.In our study, 128 consecutive FDG-PET/CT analyses (n=49 in Group 1 and n=79 in Group 2) were performed on 96 recruited patients. Recurrences were proven in 63. The overall sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of FDG-PET/CT were 98.4%, 89.2%, and 93.8%, respectively, and were 100%, 88.9%, and 95.9% in Group 1 and 96.9% and 89.4% and 92.4% in Group 2, respectively. Surgical resections were performed in 38.7% (12/31) of Group 1 patients and 53.1% (17/32) of Group 2 patients. FDG-PET/CT induced changes in planned management in 48.4% (62/128) of all patients, which included 63.3% (31/49) of Group 1 patients and 39.2% (31/79) of Group 2 patients (p=0.008). After a follow-up, 3.4% (1/29) of patients who underwent surgical resection of recurrent lesions and 34.3% (11/34) patients who did not undergo resection died at the end of study (p=0.004).The surgical resection of limited recurrent disease, as determined by FDG-PET/CT, improves the survival of CRC patients. FDG-PET/CT should be performed not only in patients with elevated serum CEA levels, but also in those in whom recurrences are suspected to improve the early detection of resectable disease.Clinical validity of tissue carcinoembryonic antigen expression as ancillary to serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentration in patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer.Although serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level is prognostic in colorectal cancer, the prognostic role of tumour CEA expression is unclear. The aim of this study is to identify the prognostic and surveillance roles of tissue CEA expression along with serum CEA concentration in patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer.Between January and December 2003, 294 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer were included in the study. Correlation of tissue CEA expression with overall survival (OS), disease-free survival (DFS) and elevated serum CEA concentration at tumour recurrence were analysed.Tissue CEA expression was positive in 215 patients (73.1%). CEA expression was an independent prognostic factor for OS [hazard ratio (HR) = 2.537, 95% confidence interval (CI) = 1.065-6.042, P = 0.035] and DFS (HR = 3.090, 95% CI = 1.405-6.795, P = 0.005). Elevation of serum CEA at tumour recurrence was significantly lower in patients without than with tissue CEA expression (14.3 vs 57.6%, P = 0.045). Moreover, when patients were grouped according to a combination of serum CEA elevation and tissue CEA expression, those with tissue CEA expression and elevated serum CEA (group 3) had significantly poorer OS and DFS (P < 0.001 each) than those without CEA expression and elevated serum CEA (group 1) and those with either tissue CEA expression or elevated serum CEA (group 2). OS (P = 0.006) and DFS (P = 0.027) were both significantly greater in group 1 than in group 2.Tissue CEA expression is a prognostic factor in patients with colorectal cancer. Analysis of tissue CEA expression may be helpful in determining the clinical utility of serial measurements of serum CEA as surveillance in patients with curatively resected colorectal cancer.Detection of recurrences during follow-up after liver surgery for colorectal metastases: both carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and imaging are important.The follow-up of patients treated for colorectal liver metastases (CRLM) is not standardized. The accuracy of an increase in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels for finding recurrences after treatment for CRLM is compared in this retrospective cohort study with the accuracy of routine imaging modalities of liver and chest.Data from all patients in follow-up after intentionally curative treatment for CRLM from 1990 to 2010 were analyzed. All patients underwent the same follow-up schedule. The way in which recurrences became apparent (i.e., CEA increase, routine imaging, or both) was registered. The specificity and sensitivity of increases in CEA before finding recurrent disease were calculated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves. An economic evaluation of the cost per resectable tumor recurrence was performed.ROC curves showed that a significant CEA increase was defined as a 25 % increase from the previous value. Recurrences were detected in 46 % of the procedures through CEA increase concomitant with positive imaging, in 23 % through CEA increase without positive findings on routine imaging, and in 31 % through positive imaging without an increase in CEA. The resectability of recurrences did not differ between triggers. Cost per curable recurrence was <euro>2,196 for recurrences found via CEA alone and <euro>6,721 for recurrences found with imaging and CEA.In the follow-up of patients after liver surgery for CRLM, a 25 % increase in CEA serum level can accurately detect recurrences, but routine imaging is indispensable. In patients with CRLM, we advocate both CEA monitoring and imaging in the follow-up after liver surgery.Utility of low dose (18)F-FDG PET-CT in patients with suspected colorectal carcinoma recurrence in conventional diagnostic methods.To evaluate the efficacy of (18)F-FDG PET-CT in the diagnosis of recurrence of colorectal cancer (CRC) in patients with elevated values of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and/or signs of recurrence in the multidetector CT (MDCT), and to demonstrate that good results can be obtained applying the ALARA principles.A retrospective study of 54 patients with suspected CRC, who underwent an (18)F-FDG PET-CT, administering a mean dose of 222 MBq (6 mCi) of (18)F-FDG, from 07/2007 to 01/2011 was carried out. Seven patients were excluded, thus studying 47 (27 males, 20 females, mean age 63 years). Recurrence was confirmed by histopathology study in 14 cases and by clinical evolution in 33. The patients were divided into 4 groups. A: patients with elevation of CEA and suspected recurrence in the MDCT. B: elevation of CEA, without suspicious lesions in the MDCT. C: normal levels of CEA and positive MDCT. D: normal levels of CEA and uncertain MDCT.We found sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and overall accuracy of 91%, 69%, 89%, 75% and 85% respectively. For group A, we found 100% sensitivity, in group B, 75% sensitivity with 100% specificity%, for C, sensitivity was 89% with 71% specificity. Finally, in group D, sensitivity was 100% and specificity 60%, respectively.Applying a low dose, the (18)F-FDG PET-CT has high diagnostic performance in patients with suspicion of CRC, approaching in a higher grade the ALARA criteria.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen measurement, abdominal contrast-enhanced computed tomography, and fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in the detection of colorectal cancer recurrence: a correlative study.The aim of this study was to evaluate the correlative role of fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement and contrast-enhanced abdominal computed tomography (ceCT) in the detection of colorectal cancer (CRC) recurrence.A total of 96 patients (40 female, 56 male; mean age, 60.6  12 years) with a previous diagnosis of CRC underwent 18F-FDG PET/CT on suspicion of recurrence and were evaluated retrospectively. Inclusion criteria were accepted as the presence of increased serum CEA levels or positive findings on abdominal ceCT or both. 18F-FDG PET/CT findings were compared with histopathological findings and/or clinical follow-up data as the gold standard. Patients were divided into three groups: group 1, with increased CEA levels and normal abdominal ceCT; group 2, with normal CEA levels and positive ceCT; and group 3, with increased CEA levels and positive ceCT.Whereas sensitivities of CEA, ceCT, and 18F-FDG PET/CT in the three patient groups were calculated as 91, 67, and 96%, specificities were 13, 51, and 62%, respectively. There were 35, 14, and 46 patients in groups 1, 2, and 3, respectively. In separate analyses conducted on the groups, sensitivity of 18F-FDG PET/CT was computed as 100 and 100% and specificity as 88 and 80% for groups 1 and 2. In group 3, which comprised four patients with secondary malignancies, sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT were 94 and 16%, respectively.18F-FDG PET/CT has an additional role in the detection of CRC recurrence with a higher sensitivity compared with CEA and ceCT alone, and 18F-FDG PET/CT is especially more successful in patients with isolated elevated CEA levels or positive ceCT findings without accompanying CEA elevation.The utility of FDG-PET/CT as an effective tool for detecting recurrent colorectal cancer regardless of serum CEA levels.Tumor recurrence of colorectal cancers (CRC) is generally followed up by analyses of the serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels. However, recent evidence suggests that tumor recurrence can also be visualized by 18F-fluoro-deoxyglucose emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) in patients with normal CEA levels. We retrospectively evaluated the diagnostic performance of FDG-PET/CT in patients with suspected recurrence of CRC by comparing PET/CT performance in patients with normal CEA levels with PET/CT performance in patients with elevated CEA levels.A total of 235 patients with CRC who had been treated with surgery and/or chemotherapy/radiotherapy underwent PET/CT for the detection of tumor recurrence. The patients [96 females and 139 males; age (mean  SD) 59.9  12.6 years; range 18-85] were divided into 2 groups based on whether their CEA levels were normal (<5 ng/ml) (Group 1, n = 118) or elevated (>5 ng/ml) (Group 2, n = 117). All of the patients had suspected recurrence based on raised CEA levels, clinical symptoms, and/or tumor detection using other imaging modalities.Of the 235 patients, 172 (73.1 %) had disease recurrence confirmed by a pathological examination (either biopsy or surgical exploration) or clinical follow-up studies. The FDG-PET/CT study yielded a true positive in detecting recurrence in 169 (71.9 %) patients, a true negative in 53 (22.5 %) patients, a false negative in 3 (1.2 %) patients and a false positive in 10 (4.2 %) patients. CRC recurrence was detected in 64.4 % (76/118) and 88 % (103/117) patients in Group 1 and Group 2 with FDG-PET/CT, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of the FDG-PET/CT study for establishing recurrence were 100, 84, 89.4, 100 and 93.2 %, respectively, for Group 1; by contrast, these parameters were 97.1, 84.6, 98, 78.5 and 95.7 %, respectively, for Group 2. The number of patients with hepatic and extra-hepatic metastases, such as lung and abdominal lymph node metastasis, detected with FDG-PET/CT was significantly different in Group 1 than in Group 2; however, the number of patients with local recurrence and peritoneal implants detected with FDG-PET/CT was not different between the two groups.FDG-PET/CT can accurately detect tumor recurrence in patients with suspected recurrent CRC, even for patients with normal CEA levels.Role of serum carcinoembryonic antigen in the detection of colorectal cancer before and after surgical resection.To determine whether serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) correlate with the presence of primary colorectal cancer (CRC), and/or recurrent CRC following radical resection.A total of 413 patients with CRC underwent radical surgery between January 1998 and December 2002 in our department and were enrolled in this study. The median follow-up period was 69 mo (range, 3-118 mo), and CRC recurrence was experienced by 90/413 (21.8%) patients. Serum levels of CEA were assayed preoperatively, and using a cutoff value of 5 ng/mL, patients were divided into two groups, those with normal serum CEA levels (e.g.,  5 ng/mL) and those with elevated CEA levels (> 5 ng/mL).The overall sensitivity of CEA for the detection of primary CRC was 37.0%. The sensitivity of CEA according to stage, was 21.4%, 38.9%, and 41.7% for stages I-III, respectively. Moreover, for stage II and stage III cases, the 5-year disease-free survival rates were reduced for patients with elevated preoperative serum CEA levels (P < 0.05). The overall sensitivity of CEA for detecting recurrent CRC was 54.4%, and sensitivity rates of 36.6%, 66.7%, and 75.0% were associated with cases of local recurrence, single metastasis, and multiple metastases, respectively. In patients with normal serum levels of CEA preoperatively, the sensitivity of CEA for detecting recurrence was reduced compared with patients having a history of elevated CEA prior to radical resection (32.6% vs 77.3%, respectively, P < 0.05).CRC patients with normal serum CEA levels prior to resection maintained these levels during CRC recurrence, especially in cases of local recurrence vs cases of metastasis.Unnecessary surgery can be avoided by judicious use of PET/CT scanning in colorectal cancer patients.This study aims to determine the role of positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) in changing the management plan in patients with metastatic or recurrent colorectal cancer (CRC) and to evaluate the role of PET/CT in patients with an unexplained rise in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA).A total of 60 consecutive patients with CRC, who had PET/CT, were identified between 2008 and 2010. All patients had CT scans prior to the PET/CT. Data were collected from clinic letters, CT and PET CT reports and pathology results and cross-checked with the patient's notes.Patients were aged between 43 and 85 years [33 males, 27 females]. CEA was raised in 37 patients and normal in 23. Results of PET/CT were compared with that of CT scan and 33 out of the 60 patients (55%) had PET/CT results which were different to that of CT scan and 27 patients (45%) had similar PET/CT and CT results. PET scan appropriately altered the management in 23/60 patients (38%) and avoided unnecessary surgery in 14 patients. PET/CT had a sensitivity of 86% and specificity of 84%. In patients with an unexplained rise in CEA, PET/CT was positive in only one out of ten (10%) patients.PET/CT is valuable in deciding the management outcome in patients with metastatic or recurrent colorectal cancer. Unnecessary surgery might be avoided by careful use of PET/CT scanning in colorectal cancer patients. PET/CT might not be of value in patients with an unexplained rise in CEA.Postherapeutic follow-up of colorectal cancer patients treated with curative intent.Based on published data showing that despite a curative intent treatment approximately 50% of colorectal cancer (CRC) patients will present with disease relapse, and on the results of meta-analysis which showed improved survival by using intense posttreatment follow-up programs, we aimed in the present study to evaluate the additional benefit of routine abdominal ultrasound in the follow-up program of CRC patients.We conducted a prospective study, on 107 patients diagnosed with stage III CRC. Patients follow-up included: history and physical examination, CEA determination, and abdomino-pelvic US every 3 months.Recurrent disease was observed in 36% of cases after a median follow-up interval of 24 months. The liver was the most frequent isolated site of disease recurrence (62%). Serum CEA level increased in most patients (69%) with recurrent disease. Also, a high percentage of relapses was diagnosed by routine abdominal US (62%).Our study illustrates the benefit of intense follow-up (CEA, abdominal US) after curative treatment of CRC.Cost-effectiveness analysis of postoperative surveillance protocols following radical surgery for colorectal cancer.Up to 30-50% of patients who undergo radical surgery for colorectal cancer (CRC) develop tumor relapse. The aim of this study was to assess various surveillance protocols utilized in a tertiary referral hospital in Northern Italy.Data concerning 373 consecutive patients who underwent radical surgery for CRC between 1990 and 2006 and whose data had been entered into a prospective database were considered eligible for this study. The overall costs and the percentages of recurrence following the various surveillance protocols were calculated.One hundred two (27.35%) of the patients suffered a recurrence after a mean of 17.6 (95% CI 13.9-21.1) months. The combination of physical examination, colonoscopy, thorax-abdominal computed tomography (CT) scan, and serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) dosage was found to be the most cost/effective one to monitor stages I and II colon cancer; while physical examination, rigid sigmoidoscopy, thorax-abdominal CT scan, and serum CEA dosage were found to be the most cost/effective surveillance to monitor stages III and IV of colon cancer and rectal cancer.Adherence to follow-up guidelines and early detection are vital factors affecting the curability of relapsed cancer in CRC patients who undergo surgery. The first five years after surgery was found to be the most risky period for recurrence. Cost/effectiveness analysis indicate that follow-up protocols should be tailored to the risk of recurrence with the aim of identifying relapse when the disease is at an asymptomatic, presumably more curable stage.Usefulness of CEA concentration measurement and classic colonoscopy in follow-up after radical treatment of colorectal cancer.There is always a certain rate of recurrence after radical treatment for cancer and to get on it an early detection of disease set back is crucial.Medical data of patients operated on for primarily detected colorectal cancer in years 1993-2002 was retrospectively reviewed. Usefulness of follow-up means such as physical examination, or CEA and endoscopic surveillance was analyzed. All mentioned above were applied to scheduled follow-up (in 3, 6 and 12 month intervals following an operation and annually after that by the year 5).Complete and reliable data was obtained from 340 out of 502 follow-up intended subjects (67.7%). Elevated CEA was the most frequent predictor of recurrence within non-symptomatic subjects meeting follow-up appointments (60%). The cancer set back diagnosed by means of either physical or endoscopic examinations was the case only in one out of five patients (20.75% and 18.87% respectively). Clinical onset of recurrence making patients meet an unscheduled appointment was found increasing relative risk of nothing-but-palliative option either for them with local set back, or meta-static spread. Relative risk of onset of meta-chronous colonic cancer was significantly higher in patients being affected by synchronous advanced adenoma at time of surgery compared to those with one-fold changes.CEA scheduled follow-up after treatment for colorectal cancer CRC seems adequate to provide a good outcome of treatment for recurrent tumors. CRC patients presenting with synchronous advanced adenomas at time of surgery are probably to be under more intensive endoscopic surveillance.Accuracy of monitoring serum carcinoembryonic antigen levels in postoperative stage III colorectal cancer patients is limited to only the first postoperative year.The aim of the present study was to determine the accuracy of yearly postoperative monitoring of serum tumor markers to either detect or rule out recurrence in colorectal cancer patients.A total of 127 colorectal cancer patients who underwent curative surgery were enrolled. The serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9) levels were assayed, and radiological examinations were performed routinely for 5 years after surgery or until recurrence was detected. Yearly recurrence rates (number of recurrences/number of patients assessed in a given year), sensitivities, specificities, and likelihood ratios were calculated. Post-test probabilities were calculated from these values.Recurrences tended to show almost the same frequencies in the first and second year after surgery (20 of 127 patients and 18 of 107 patients, respectively). However, the post-test probability of recurrence in patients with positive and negative serum CEA levels was significantly lower in the second year than in the first year (test positive: 40.0% and 76.0%; test negative: 9.3% and 0.5%, respectively).Measuring CEA can help to identify patients likely to demonstrate recurrence with high accuracy only within the first year after surgery. Another examination, such as imaging, is therefore necessary for monitoring patients at 2 or more years after surgery.18F-FDG PET-CT in evaluation of postoperative colorectal cancer patients with rising CEA level.Accurate imaging of patients with possible recurrent colorectal cancer (CRC) is vital, as it is now clear that curative surgery is still possible for a proportion of patients with metastatic disease. Follow-up is usually performed with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level, computerized tomography (CT) and other conventional imaging techniques, but in the last few years, functional imaging using integrated positron emission tomography and CT (PET/CT) is being used increasingly to identify recurrent disease.To evaluate the usefulness of integrated PET/CT in the follow-up of postoperative CRC patients with rising CEA level.Seventy-three histopathologically proven patients with postoperative CRC having undergone CT of chest and abdomen were subjected to PET/CT imaging. Whole-body PET/CT imaging (base of skull to mid thigh region) was performed in all patients. These patients were grouped into various categories depending on CEA level.Of the total 73 patients, 22 had CEA levels within normal limits (<3 ng/ml). Among the remaining 51 patients, CT showed recurrence in 23 (45%) patients, whereas PET/CT was positive in 36 (71%) patients. In group 1 (CEA 3-5 ng/ml), CT was positive in four of 13 (30%) patients and PET/CT was positive in seven of 13 (53%) patients, in group 2 (CEA 5-10 ng/ml) CT was positive in three of nine (33%) patients and PET/CT was positive in six of nine (67%) patients, in group 3 (CEA 10-20 ng/ml) CT was positive in five of 11 (45%) patients and PET/CT was positive in seven of 11(63%) patients, in group 4 (CEA 20-50 ng/ml) CT was positive in five of nine (55%) patients and PET/CT was positive in seven of nine (77%) patients and in group 5 (CEA >50 ng/ml) CT was positive in six of nine (67%) patients and PET/CT was positive in nine of nine (100%) patients. Among 23 patients in whom both CT and PET/CT were positive, PET/CT showed extra lesions in 17 (73%) patients and changed the management in 11 (47%) patients. PET was negative in four patients with positive findings on CT, thereby changing the management. Of the total of 51 patients, PET/CT changed the management in 28 (55%) patients.This study shows an overall detection rate of 71% for PET/CT compared with 55% for CT in postoperative CRC patients with increasing CEA. PET/CT changes the management in half of the patients, highlighting the superior role of fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT scan over CT scan.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen, magnetic resonance imaging, and positron emission tomography-computed tomography in the evaluation of patients with suspected local recurrence of colorectal cancer.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and positron emission tomography (PET)-computed tomography (CT) in detection of local recurrence of colorectal cancer is evaluated in 71 patients, selected due to suspected relapse at CT follow-up. Recurrence was confirmed by histology in 18 cases and excluded in 25 cases. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy were as follows: 44.4%, 92.5%, 66.7%, 83.1%, and 80.3% for CEA; 88.9%, 73.6%, 53.3%, 95.1%, and 77.5% for MRI; and 94.4%, 73.6%, 54.8%, 97.5%, and 78.9% for PET-CT. A diagnostic protocol integrating CEA and dedicated imaging studies is to be advocated.[Follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer: impact of positron emission tomography - computed tomography (PET/CT)].Postoperative surveillance has an important role in patient survival after curative resection of colorectal cancer.To describe the characteristics of the follow-up with positron emission tomography (PET) / computed tomography (CT)(PET/CT) and its impact in colorectal cancer (CRC) survivors after curative resection in a university hospital in Tochigi Prefecture, Japan.Consecutive review of patient's hospital charts who underwent presurgical staging with PET/CT for curative resection of colorectal cancer between April 2005 and March 2008. The follow-up data of these patients was reviewed until September 2008.Of 209 patients presurgically staged for CRC, 207 (male/female = 125/82; mean age = 65.3  11.3 years) underwent curative resection and were included in the present study. The compliance rate with the Japanese Society for Cancer of the Colon and Rectum (JSCCR) follow-up guidelines was 53%. The cumulative survival at the end of study interval was 96.4%. The test most commonly used in postoperative follow-up of CRC was the carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). PET/CT was the test that detected more patients with recurrent lesions (n = 11, positive predictive value = 23.4), including one patient with an asymptomatic curable recurrence (inguinal lymph node metastasis), also being the most effective test (2.1%). However, its high cost makes it the less cost-effective.The use of PET/CT in the postoperative follow-up after curative resection in CRC has proven to be an individualized and effective alternative in the finding of asymptomatic disease curable. Systematic CEA tests with contrast-enhanced CT as a first line of screening and PET/CT as a second line may be an alternative follow up approach after curative resection for CRC.Intensive risk-adjusted follow-up with the CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 tumor marker panel and abdominal ultrasonography to diagnose operable colorectal cancer recurrences: effect on survival.Intensive risk-adjusted follow-up leads to improved resectability of tumor recurrences and better overall survival among patients who have undergone surgery for colorectal cancer.Long-term observational single-center study.University of Pisa, Pisa, Italy.One hundred eight disease-free patients who had undergone surgery for colorectal cancer were submitted to long-term follow-up with the serum CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 tumor marker (TM) panel and abdominal ultrasonography.Sensitivities and specificities of TMs, abdominal ultrasonography, and abdominal and chest computed tomography (CT); the median survival among patients operated on and those not operated on and the cumulative 5-year overall survival among the entire group.Twenty-two patients with asymptomatic colorectal cancer recurred 32 times. The CEA, TPA, CA19.9, CA72.4, and TM panel sensitivities were 46.9%, 34.4%, 9.4%, 9.4%, and 81.0%, respectively, and the mean (SD) lead times before confirmation of recurrence were 4.3 (4.8), 4.1 (4.7), 8.3 (10.9), 5.0 (7.0), and 5.3 (5.8) months, respectively. Abdominal and chest CT sensitivities were 100.0%. Among 86 patients without recurrence, specificities of the TM panel and all panel markers were 100.0%, while specificities of abdominal ultrasonography, abdominal CT, and skeletal CT were 99.9%, 99.0%, and 100.0%, respectively. The median survival after first recurrence was 16 months (range, 3-48 months) for 8 patients with recurrence who did not undergo second-line surgery. Among 14 remaining patients who underwent metastasectomy, the median survival after first recurrence was 37 months (range, 12-187 months; P = .03). Among the entire group of 108 patients, the cumulative 5-year overall survival was 88.7%.Long-term intensive risk-adjusted monitoring using the CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 TM panel and abdominal ultrasonography allows early detection of most recurrences. Patients can then undergo radical metastasectomy, with potentially improved overall survival.Surveillance with serial serum carcinoembryonic levels detect colorectal cancer recurrences in patients who are initial nonsecretors.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels, elevated in a subgroup of patients with colorectal cancer (CRC) at presentation, are serially followed as part of recommended surveillance after initial resection. The value of following serial CEA levels in patients who initially present with less than or normal levels of CEA (nonsecretors) is controversial. This study sought to determine the use of follow-up CEA levels in nonsecretors. A retrospective review was performed of patients with resected Stage I, II, and III CRC. We excluded patients who did not have a pretreatment CEA level, at least two follow-up CEA levels, or in whom CEA levels did not normalize after resection. The patients were grouped by initial CEA values: CEA 5 ng/mL or less (nonsecretors) and CEA 5 + ng/mL: (secretors). We identified 186 patients with CRC; 146 were initial nonsecretors. We identified 22 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer; 6 were secretors and 16 patients were nonsecretors. In the secretors group, CEA was elevated with recurrence in four (66%) of the patients. In the nonsecretors, CEA was elevated with recurrence in eight (50%) of the patients. In summary, many recurrences of CRC are marked by an elevation of CEA regardless of whether the patients initially presented as secretors or nonsecretors.Does serum carcinoembryonic antigen elevation in patients with postoperative stage II colorectal cancer indicate recurrence? Comparison with stage III.The aim of this study was to determine the accuracy of postoperative monitoring of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) to detect or rule out recurrence in patients with stage II colorectal cancer (CRC) by comparing results with stage III.A total of 303 patients with CRC who underwent curative surgery were enrolled. Serum CEA was assayed, and radiological examination was performed routinely for 5 years after surgery. Yearly recurrence rates, sensitivities, specificities, likelihood ratios, and posttest probabilities were calculated.Sensitivity and specificity of CEA monitoring in stage II patients are almost same as those in stage III. Whereas recurrences occurred early in stage III, they occurred almost as frequently in both early and late stage II. The obtained posttest probability of recurrence in stage II patients with CEA elevation was significantly lower (only 30% or less) than those in stage III (approximately 80%).Elevation of CEA in patients with stage II CRC does not represent recurrence with high probability. One of the reasons for the unreliability of CEA monitoring was its high false-positive rate. Another tumor marker with a lower false-positive rate is necessary to follow-up stage II CRC patients.Clinical significance of CEA and CA19-9 in postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancer.We evaluated the efficiency of CEA and CA19-9 as tools for diagnosing recurrence in the postoperative surveillance of colorectal cancer.A total of 227 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer between 1999 and 2003 at our hospital received complete follow-up according to the schedule determined prospectively. Using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, performance of postoperative values of CEA or CA19-9 for detecting recurrence was assessed.The sensitivity (1.000) and specificity (0.978) of the postoperative values of CEA in the high preoperative CEA group were very high. Even in the normal preoperative CEA group, the area under the curve (AUC) of the ROC curve of CEA (0.740, 95% confidence interval [95% CI], 0.628-0.852) was significantly larger than 0.5 (P < 0.001). The postoperative values of CA19-9 showed high sensitivity (0.833) and specificity (0.900) in the high preoperative CA19-9 group, while the AUC of the ROC curve of the normal preoperative group was as small as 0.510 (95% CI, 0.376-0.644). In the high preoperative CA19-9 group, however, there was no significant difference between the AUC of CA19-9 (0.904, 95% CI, 0.786-1.000) and that of CEA (0.869, 95% CI, 0.744-0.994) (P = 0.334).The measurement of CEA is an efficient way to detect recurrence. The efficiency of measuring CA19-9 for the purpose of detecting recurrence is low, especially in patients with a normal level of preoperative CA19-9. Even in patients with a high preoperative level of CA19-9, CEA might be able to fill the role of CA19-9.Lead time of carcinoembryonic antigen elevation in the postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancer did not affect the survival rate after recurrence.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the early detection of recurrence during the postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancer remains unclear. We hypothesize that the tumor with longer lead time of CEA elevation to the definite recurrence may have a better prognosis because of its slower growth rate and closer observation.From 1995 to 2003, 4,841 consecutive patients who received curative resection of localized colorectal adenocarcinoma were enrolled from a prospective database. The patients with persisting CEA elevation after operation had been already excluded. Postoperative follow-up, including physical examination, imaging, and CEA test, were performed according to a surveillance program. A CEA >/=5 ng/mL was defined as elevated. The definition of the CEA lead time was the period between CEA elevation and detection of recurrence. All statistical analyses were performed by SPSS package for Windows (Microsoft, Redmond, WA, USA).The postoperative median follow-up time for the 4,841 patients was 68 months. A total of 999 patients (20.6%) had CEA elevation and recurrence. Among these patients, recurrence was confirmed in 727 patients (72.8%)before, at the same time, or within 3 months of CEA elevation and thus had a short lead time of CEA elevation (SLT group). In 272 patients (27.2%), recurrence was confirmed after more than 3 months of CEA elevation and thus had a longer lead time of CEA elevation (LLT group). The recurrence pattern showed similarities in these two groups. A total of 193 patients (193/999, 19.3%) received a second radical operation, and 806 patients (80.7%) were inoperable. The re-resection rate between the SLT group (146 patients, 20.1%) and the LLT group (47 patients, 17.3%) was not significantly different. The overall survival rate after recurrence showed no difference between these two groups (P = 0.123).Most cases of recurrence were detected at nearly the same time when the CEA level was elevated. Therefore, a more sensitive test is needed for early detection. The relationship between the lead time of CEA and the clinical outcome was not statistically significant. A more aggressive approach to the patient who has CEA elevation and is highly suspect of recurrence may be needed.First alert for recurrence during follow-up after potentially curative resection for colorectal carcinoma: CA 19-9 should be included in surveillance programs.The aim of this study was to evaluate the contribution of each examination included in the postoperative surveillance program, especially that of serum tumor markers.Patients who underwent curative surgery for colorectal carcinoma (CRC) from January 2000 to December 2006 were enrolled. The postoperative surveillance program in our department includes tumor marker (carcinoembryonic antigen [CEA] and carbohydrate antigen [CA] 19-9) measurement every 3 months for 5 years, chest radiograph or chest computed tomography (CT) every 3 months for 2 years and then every 6 months until 5 years, and abdominal CT every 3 months for 2 years and then every 6 months until 5 years. The first examination that revealed abnormality in patients who developed recurrence was analyzed.During the study period, 105 recurrences were diagnosed. There were 45 hepatic recurrences, 23 local recurrences, 20 pulmonary recurrences, 16 lymph node recurrences, and 10 peritoneal recurrences. Computed tomography, CEA, and CA 19-9 were the first abnormal examination(s) in 77, 23, and 26 patients, respectively. Tumor markers detected the recurrence earlier than did CT in 27% of patients. CEA and CA 19-9 equally contributed to detection with respect to the number of patients, while the sites of detected recurrences differed.For early detection of occult recurrence of CRC, CT was the most reliable modality. On the other hand, tumor markers were also relevant. Given the recent advances in multimodal approaches for advanced CRC, the combination of CT, CEA, and CA 19-9, which is currently not included in guidelines, should be routinely performed.Strict follow-up programme including CT and F-FDG-PET after curative surgery for colorectal cancer.The risk of local recurrence following curative surgery for colorectal cancer (CRC) is up to 50%. A rigorous follow-up program may increase survival. Guidelines on suitable methods for scheduled follow up examinations are needed. This study evaluates a strict follow-up program including carcinogenic embryonic antigen (CEA), chest X-ray, abdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and (18)F-FDG positron emission tomography (FDG-PET).A cohort of 132 patients, treated by surgery with curative intent for CRC, was included. Patients were followed prospectively with scheduled controls at 3, 6, 12 and 24 months after curative surgery. CEA, chest X-ray, US, CT and FDG-PET supplemented by clinical examination. The end-point was recurrence. Sensitivity and specificity was estimated 2 years after surgery.Of the 132 patients included in the study, 25 experienced recurrence, detected at scheduled controls (n = 18) and at intervals between them (n = 7). The results of CT and FDG-PET were correlated with recurrence. CT combined with FDG-PET had the highest specificity and sensitivity.A total of 72% of recurrences were detected at scheduled controls. The findings supported a strict follow-up program following curative surgery for colorectal cancer. FDG-PET combined with CT should be included in control programs.Predictive factors of early relapse in UICC stage I-III colorectal cancer patients after curative resection.To predict the clinicopathologic factors for early relapse of UICC stage I-III colorectal cancer (CRC) patients undergoing curative resection and thus to identify a subgroup of patients who are at high risk for postoperative early relapse.Between January 2001 and June 2007, a total of 778 UICC stage I-III CRC patients who underwent a radical resection and regular follow-up were retrospectively analyzed. Of these 778 CRC patients, 521 colon cancer and 257 rectal cancer cases were analyzed, respectively, to determine the predictors of early relapse postoperatively. These 778 patients were followed-up intensively, and their outcomes were investigated retrospectively.Out of 521 colon cancer patients, postoperative relapse after primary resection was found in 142 (27.3%) patients, and 77 (54.2%) of 142 recurrent colon cancer patients were classified as postoperative early relapse. Meanwhile, among 257 rectal cancer patients, postoperative relapse was found in 68 (26.5%) patients and 44 (64.7%) of 68 recurrent rectal cancer patients were identified as postoperative early relapse. Forty-nine (63.6%) of 77 early relapsed colon cancer patients were stage III, and likewise, 26 (59.1%) of 44 early relapsed rectal cancer patients were stage III. Univariately, postoperative early relapse of colon cancer patients was significantly correlated with the presence of vascular invasion (P < 0.001), perineural invasion (P < 0.001), high postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level (P = 0.001), and type of surgery (P = 0.016). Using a Cox proportional hazards analysis, the presence of vascular invasion (P = 0.033), perineural invasion (P = 0.005), and high postoperative CEA levels (P = 0.001) were demonstrated to be independent predictors of postoperative early relapse of colon cancer patients, while in rectal cancer patients, both vascular invasion (P = 0.039) and perineural invasion (P = 0.008) were statistically significant predictors of early relapse by univariate analysis. Using a Cox proportional hazards analysis, only perineural invasion (P = 0.043) was an independent factor. Early relapse cases had significant lower overall survival rates than non-early relapse cases either in colon cancer (P < 0.001) or in rectal cancer (P = 0.0091) patients.This study suggests that vascular invasion, perineural invasion, and postoperative CEA level may be significant factors for postoperative early relapse of colon cancer; while only perineural invasion is considered to be a significant predictor in rectal cancer patients. Identification of these high-risk UICC stage I-III CRC patients of early relapse is important, and thus could help to define patients with this tumor entity for an enhanced follow-up and therapeutic program.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring after curative resection for colorectal cancer: clinical significance of the preoperative level.We evaluated preoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a prognostic factor for colorectal cancer and determined when surveillance of this marker was useful.Serum CEA was measured preoperatively in 1,263 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer at 3-month intervals for the first 2 postoperative years and at 6-month intervals thereafter. Mean follow-up was 48 months (range 1-156 months).The 5-year disease-free survival was less in patients with a high preoperative serum CEA level (P<0.0001). Among patients with a tumor recurrence, 38.5% had high follow-up serum CEA levels. The number of patients with high postoperative serum CEA levels exceeded the number of patients with high preoperative levels. High preoperative and follow-up serum CEA levels were independent prognostic factors for tumor recurrence (P=0.003 and P<0.001, respectively). In patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels, CEA surveillance had a 92.3% positive predictive value (PPV) and a 96.1% negative predictive value (NPV). The mean interval between postoperative serum CEA elevation and the diagnosis of a tumor recurrence [diagnostic interval (DI)] was 2.5 months (range 5-17 months). The DI was 0 in 18.8% of patients with a tumor recurrence.High serum CEA levels preoperatively and at follow-up are prognostic factors for colorectal cancer. Postoperative serum CEA surveillance is used most effectively when patients have high preoperative serum CEA levels. Considering the DI of 0 in 18.8% of the patients, the current CEA surveillance schedule might be changed.Serum p53 antibody as tumor marker for follow-up of colorectal cancer after curative resection.No large-scale studies have examined the use of serial measurements of serum p53 antibodies (s-p53Abs) combined with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurements during the follow-up of colorectal cancer (CRC) patients after curative resection.A highly specific enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was used to analyze s-p53Abs levels in 305 CRC patients before and after curative resection at a single institution. Agreement between recurrence and serial s-p53Ab and CEA measurements was evaluated by diagnostic accuracy odds ratio (DOR), kappa, and area under receiver operating characteristic curve (AUC).Among 305 patients, 76 (25%) patients had disease recurrence during follow-up. None of the 168 s-p53Ab seronegative patients (s-p53Ab < 10 U/microL) without recurrence had an abnormal s-p53Ab test during follow-up. Among the remaining low-level (10 U/microL <or= s-p53Ab <or= 76 U/microL, n = 103) and high-level (s-p53Ab titer > 76 U/microL, n = 34) seropositive patients, recurrence defined by s-p53Ab tests resulted in a DOR of 4.3 and infinity, a kappa of 0.35 and 1.00, and an AUC of 0.633 [95% confidence interval (CI), 0.495 to 0.772; P = 0.047], and 1.0 (95% CI, 1.000 to 1.000; P < 0.0001), respectively. Recurrence defined by CEA tests had an AUC of 0.781 (95% CI, 0.654 to 0.909) for low-level and 0.796 (95% CI, 0.611 to 0.982) for high-level seropositive patients.Agreement between clinical recurrence and serial s-p53Ab test was dependent upon preoperative s-p53Ab level. Serial s-p53Ab testing outperformed CEA testing when predicting clinical recurrence in colorectal cancer patients with an abnormal preoperative s-p53Ab level.Postoperative surveillance recommendations for early stage colon cancer based on results from the clinical outcomes of surgical therapy trial.Intensive postoperative surveillance is associated with improved survival and recommended for patients with late stage (stage IIB and III) colon cancer. We hypothesized that stage I and IIA colon cancer patients would experience similar benefits.Secondary analysis of data from the Clinical Outcomes of Surgical Therapy trial was performed by analyzing results according to TNM stage; early (stage I and IIA, 537 patients) and late (stage IIB and III, 254 patients) stage disease. Five-year recurrence rates were higher in patients with late (35.7%) versus early stage disease (9.5%). Early and late stage salvage rates, recurrence patterns and methods of first detection were compared by chi(2) test.Salvage rates for early- and late-stage disease patients with recurrence were the same (35.9% v 37%; P = .9, respectively). Median survival after second surgery after recurrence was 51.2 and 35.8 months for early- and late-stage patients, respectively. Single sites of first recurrence did not significantly differ between early and late stage, but multiple sites of recurrence occurred less often in early-stage patients (3.6% v 28.6%, for early v late, respectively; P < .001). METHODS of first detection of recurrence were not significantly different: carcinoembryonic antigen (29.1% v 37.4%), computed tomography scan (23.6% v 26.4%), chest x-ray (7.3% v 12.1%), and colonoscopy (12.7% v 8.8%), for early versus late stage disease, respectively.Patients with early-stage colon cancer have similar sites of recurrence, and receive similar benefit from postrecurrence therapy as late-stage patients; implementation of surveillance guidelines for early-stage patients is appropriate.Persistent high postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen in colorectal cancer patients--is it important?Evaluation of pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels together has seldom been assessed for the prognosis of colorectal cancer (CRC).To concurrently evaluate pre- and postoperative CEA as factors of relapse and survival.The study consisted of 114 patients who had undergone surgery from February 2002 to June 2006 for CRC. All patients were classified into four groups according to their pre- and postoperative CEA levels. Data obtained for clinicopathologic parameters, lymph node metastasis, stage, recurrence, and CEA levels were analyzed to determine their association with survival. Multivariate analysis by the Cox proportional hazard regression model was performed to identify the independent prognostic factors associated with survival.Postoperative serum CEA levels remained high in Group 3 (n = 32). Nineteen patients (59.3%) demonstrated a detectable cause for persistent high CEA levels, while the reasons for those in the other thirteen patients (40.6%) remained obscure. Abnormal preoperative CEA levels significantly correlated with the depth of tumor invasion, lymph node metastasis, TNM stage, and recurrence (p < 0.05). Abnormal postoperative CEA levels were significantly related to the depth of tumor invasion, TNM stage, and postoperative relapse (p<0.05). Patients in Group 3 demonstrated the worst survival rate. Abnormal postoperative CEA levels, lymph node metastasis, and location of the tumor were independent prognostic factors for survival.The survival of patients with high postoperative CEA levels due to unknown reasons may be extended if they are exhaustively tested with sensitive diagnostic methods and treated at an early stage.Negative serum carcinoembryonic antigen has insufficient accuracy for excluding recurrence from patients with Dukes C colorectal cancer: analysis with likelihood ratio and posttest probability in a follow-up study.This study was designed to determine the efficacy of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring for screening patients with colorectal cancer by using posttest probability of recurrence.For this study, 348 (preoperative serum CEA level elevated: CEA+, n = 119; or normal: CEA-, n = 229) patients who had undergone potentially curative surgery for colorectal cancer were enrolled. After five-year follow-up with measurements of serum CEA levels and imaging workup, posttest probabilities of recurrence were calculated.Recurrence was observed in 39 percent of CEA+ patients and 30 percent in CEA- patients, and CEA levels were elevated in 33.3 percent of CEA+ patients and 17.5 percent of CEA- patients. With obtained sensitivity (68.4 percent, CEA+; 41 percent, CEA-), specificity (83 percent, CEA+; 91 percent, CEA-) and likelihood ratio (test positive: 4.0, CEA+; 4.4, CEA-; and test negative: 0.38, CEA+; 0.66, CEA-), posttest probability given the presence of CEA elevation in the CEA+ and CEA- was 72.2 and 65.5 percent, respectively, and that given the absence of CEA elevation was 20 and 22.2 percent, respectively.Whereas postoperative CEA elevation indicates recurrence with high probability, a normal postoperative CEA is not useful for excluding the probability of recurrence.Different roles of tumor marker monitoring after curative resections of gastric and colorectal cancers.We previously demonstrated that false-positive findings for tumor markers are frequently observed, and that the sensitivity of marker monitoring for early detection of the recurrence is low after curative resection of gastric cancer. The aim of this study was to investigate whether such characters are specific to gastric cancer. Serum carcinoembryonic antigen and/or carbohydrate antigen 19-9 were periodically assessed in 258 patients who underwent curative gastrectomy for gastric cancer (n = 161) or curative resection for colorectal cancer (n = 97). The frequency of false-positive findings for the tumor markers, the sensitivity of the marker monitoring for detection of the recurrence, and the characteristics of such cases were compared between these two cancer groups. During the median follow-up period of 30 months, recurrence developed in 14% of gastric cancer and 23% of colorectal cancer patients. A false positive with the tumor marker was frequently observed in patients after gastrectomy compared with after colorectal surgery. The sensitivity of the marker monitoring regarding early detection of recurrence was higher in patients with colorectal cancer than those with gastric cancer, especially in cases of advanced stage. As a result, the accuracy of marker monitoring for the detection of recurrence was higher in patients after the resection of colorectal cancer than that of gastric cancer. Surgeons and oncologists should thus be aware that the role of the tumor marker monitoring after a curative operation differs between patients with gastric and colorectal cancers.Tumor markers in patients with relapse of colorectal carcinoma.To evaluate CEA and CA19-9 in a long-term follow-up after radical surgery for colorectal cancer.A total of 1,090 patients were operated on for colorectal cancer, 716 patients underwent R0 resection, 631 patients were under further surveillance, relapse was diagnosed in 122 patients (20%), 74 patients were indicated for reoperation The resectability of the relapse was 35%. An AxSYM instrument (Abbott) was used for analysis.At the time of relapse both markers were normal in 31% of the patients. When relapse was diagnosed, in patients with normal preoperative levels, CEA and CA19-9 were below cut-off in 48% and 79%, respectively, and in those with primary elevation, they were again elevated in 78% and 64%, respectively.The surveillance based only on CEA and/or CA19-9 was cost-effective, but failed to disclose 1/3 of patients suffering from relapse; these markers must be combined with liver and chest imaging methods and colonoscopy.A small rise in CEA is sensitive for recurrence after surgery for colorectal cancer.Rise in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) above normal limits can indicate recurrent colorectal cancer. The aim of this study was to evaluate whether a small rise in CEA, even within normal limits was a sensitive indicator of recurrence.150 patients aged 22-87 years were followed up for a mean of 27 months after colorectal surgery with CEA 3 and 6 monthly computerized tomography. We analysed whether a rise in CEA > 1 ng/ml correlated with recurrence of metastases.Forty-six of 139 patients in final analysis had recurrent disease. A rise in CEA > 1 had a predictive value of 74% for recurrence or metastases (sensitivity 80%, specificity 86%). These findings were similar whether or not the CEA was normal preoperatively.If CEA is measured after surgery for colorectal cancer, a rise of >1 in the patient's postoperative value is predictive for recurrence or metastases with an overall sensitivity of 80% and specificity of 86%. Previous studies have recognized the role of large rises in CEA in predicting recurrence but this study shows that small changes in CEA may be significant even if these levels would be traditionally within 'normal' limits.Clinical and pathologic evaluation of patients with recurrence of colorectal cancer five or more years after curative resection.This study was designed to evaluate the characteristics of recurrences that occur five or more years after curative resection for colorectal cancer.This study included a total of 352 patients who were confirmed as having recurrence after curative resection for colorectal cancer during the period from January 1995 to December 2000. Of the 352 patients, 231 had early recurrence (less than 2 years after operation), 103 had intermediate recurrence (2-5 years after operation), and 18 had late recurrence (more than 5 years after operation). The clinicopathologic findings of the patients with late recurrence were compared with those of the other two recurrence groups, with special reference to the pattern of recurrence.The rate of late recurrence was 1.2 percent. In the late recurrence group, males outnumbered females by a ratio of 3.5:1 and the mean level of preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen was 4.5 ng/ml, whereas that of the early recurrence group was 30.5 ng/ml. All the lesions in the cases with late recurrence except one lesion were located in the left colon or rectum, the tumors were small-sized and polypoid, and well-differentiated adenocarcinomas were more frequently observed. Distant metastasis, especially lung metastasis, was most frequently observed.Late recurrent colorectal cancer has some characteristics compared with early or intermediate recurrence. Although recurrence at more than five years postoperatively is not common, its possibility should be considered whenever performing follow-up, and surveillance for lung metastasis is recommended after more than five years of surgery.FDG-PET scan in patients with clinically and/or radiologically suspicious colorectal cancer recurrence but normal CEA.Although frequently used for tumor surveillance, the sensitivity of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) to detect recurrent colorectal cancer (CRC) is not optimal. Fluorine 18-fluoro-2-deoxy-glucose-positron emission tomography (18F FDG-PET) scans promise to improve recurrent CRC detection. We aimed to review PET scans of patients with clinically and/or radiologically suspicious tumor recurrence but normal CEA.A retrospective review of an electronic database of 308 patients with CRC who had PET scans was performed. Only PET studies of patients with normal CEAs and suspected tumor recurrence who had pathological verification were selected for further analysis. Thirty-nine patients met the inclusion criteria.PET was positive in 26 patients (67%) and normal in 13 (33%). Histopathologic evidence of tumor recurrence was seen in 27 of the 39 patients (69%). When correlated with histopathology, PET was true positive in 22 patients, false positive in 4, true negative in 8 and false negative in 5. Overall, the accuracy of PET was 76.9%, negative predictive value (NPV) was 61.5%, and positive predictive value (PPV) was 84.6%. PPV value of PET for liver metastases was 88.8% compared to 73.3% for local recurrence. In two patients with confirmed recurrence, CEA became positive 2 months after PET scan indicating earlier detection of disease with PET. The false positive PET findings were mainly in the bowel and were secondary to acute/chronic inflammation and granulation tissue. In 3 patients with false negative PET, histopathology was consistent with mucinous adenocarcinoma.PET yields high PPV for recurrent CRC, particularly for liver metastases, in spite of normal CEA levels and should be considered early in the evaluation of patients with suspected tumor recurrence.Prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen levels in patients with colorectal cancer.To evaluate the prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen(CEA) levels in colorectal cancer (CRC) patients.425 CRC patients underwent curative resection at our institution. Their pre- and postoperative serum CEA level was classified into two groups according to concentration: normal CEA (<5.0 ng/ml) and abnormal CEA (> or =5.0 ng/ml).Of all patients, abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were observed in 181 (42.6%) and 48 (11.3%) patients, respectively. Abnormal preoperative serum CEA level was significantly correlated with the tumor located in the colon, the depth of tumor invasion, the status of lymph node metastasis, UICC stage, and the presence of postoperative relapse (p < 0.05). Concurrently, an abnormal postoperative serum CEA level was also prominently related to the above corresponding parameters (p < 0.05), except for the tumor location. Patients with a failed conversion of abnormal preoperative value to normal postoperative concentration were found to have the worst overall survival rate. Abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were single independent predictors for survival and postoperative relapse, respectively.The identification of abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels may be useful in the auxiliary cancer prognosis or postoperative surveillance of CRC patients.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement during follow-up for rectal carcinoma is useful even if normal levels exist before surgery. A retrospective study of CEA values in the TME trial.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a marker in the follow-up after curative resection of colorectal carcinoma (CRC) is often omitted from follow-up despite guideline recommendations. One reason is the assumption that when a normal CEA value exists before curative resection of CRC, it will neither rise during follow-up. This study investigates this relationship.Data were derived from a study initiated to evaluate treatment regimes for rectal carcinoma (Dutch TME trial, n=1861) from which 954 were eligible for analysis. Recurrent disease occurred in 272 of these patients (29.5%). The pre-operative CEA value was compared to CEA values during follow-up, using threshold values of 2.5 and 5.0 ng/ml.Normal pre-operative CEA values were present in 63% (CEA<5.0) and 39% (CEA<2.5) of patients with recurrent disease. Patients with a normal pre-operative CEA and recurrent disease had elevated CEA values during follow-up in 41% (CEA<5.0), 50% (CEA<2.5) and in 60% with both threshold values when the last measurement was done within 3 months before recurrent disease was diagnosed.A normal pre-operative CEA is common in patients with rectal carcinoma. CEA does rise due to recurrent disease in at least 50% of patients with normal pre-operative values. Serial post-operative CEA testing cannot be discarded based on a normal pre-operative serum CEA.Diagnostic accuracy of serum-carcinoembryonic antigen in recurrent colorectal cancer: a receiver operating characteristic curve analysis.Serial measurements of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) are frequently used in the follow-up after colorectal cancer (CRC), but its usefulness remains debatable. Choosing the appropriate cut-off point is crucial to the diagnostic accuracy (DA) of continuous test variables. Receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) analysis is the appropriate statistical method for this purpose, but has not been applied in previous studies.One hundred ninety-four consecutive patients surgically treated with curative intent for CRC between July 1996 and June 1999 had systematic follow-up for five years. Follow-up included imaging, coloscopy and serial CEA measurements. Complete data including CEA measurements were available from 153 patients. ROC analysis of CEA was done with regard to detection of recurrent disease.Depending on the chosen cut-off value of CEA, DA varied widely within the normal range (CEA <or=10 U/ml). CEA >4 U/ml provided the highest sensitivity (0.78) and specificity (0.91), compared to a sensitivity and specificity at the upper normal range (CEA = 10 U/ml) of 0.51 and 0.99, respectively. Thirty-three patients (24%) developed recurrence. Among 11 (5%) asymptomatic patients diagnosed by elevated CEA levels, only two patients (1.5%) were amenable to secondary curative surgery. A threefold increase of CEA in an individual patient had the same DA as the best cut-off value (>4 U/ml).Diagnostic accuracy of CEA in follow-up after curative surgery for CRC is influenced by the chosen cut-off value. A threefold increase of CEA may indicate recurrent disease. The value of serial measurement of CEA was limited.Multivariate analysis of prognostic determinants for colorectal cancer patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels: prognostic value of postoperative serum CEA levels.High preoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels have been well investigated and found to be associated with poor prognosis in patients with colorectal cancer (CRC). However, it has been observed that the outcome varies after curative resection, along with postoperative serum CEA levels; some patients continue to have high postoperative serum CEA levels while postoperative CEA levels return to normal in others. The purpose of this study was to determine the prognostic significance of postoperative serum CEA levels in CRC patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels. Between January 2002 and December 2004, 423 CRC patients underwent operation in our hospital; 181 (42.8%) had high preoperative serum CEA levels and were enrolled in this study. Among the 181 patients, 165 patients had curative resection; the remaining 16 had stage IV disease, so they underwent palliative surgery and were subsequently excluded from analysis. Pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were measured and analyzed. All patients had curative resection and were divided into two groups according to postoperative serum CEA levels: one group comprised patients with postoperative serum CEA > or = 5 ng/mL (n = 80) and the other group comprised patients with postoperative serum CEA levels < 5 ng/mL (n = 85). Postoperative serum CEA levels were significantly related to location of primary tumors (p = 0.042), lymph node metastases (p = 0.009), TNM stage (p = 0.001), and postoperative relapse (p = 0.004). The results of multivariate analysis showed that both lymph node metastases and high postoperative serum CEA levels (> or = 5 ng/mL) were independent prognostic factors for CRC patients after curative resection. Postoperative serum CEA levels can be a single independent prognostic determinant in CRC patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels. Intensive follow-up and adjuvant therapy may be necessary in CRC patients who continue to have high postoperative serum CEA levels even after curative resection.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen assay in predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, and survival after curative resection of colorectal cancer.We measured carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in peripheral and portal venous blood, and bile from patients with colorectal cancer, to determine its role in predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, and survival.The subjects were 73 patients who underwent curative surgery for colorectal cancer.The median serum, bile, and portal CEA levels were significantly lower in 5-year survivors than in patients in whom hepatic metastases or recurrent disease subsequently developed. The CEA level in portal blood and bile was a good indicator of hepatic metastases, with sensitivity of 92% and 100%, respectively. However, the accuracy of any CEA measurement for predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, or 5-year survival did not exceed 70%.None of these CEA measurements is accurate enough to be the basis of a management decision. Thus, we suggest that CEA measurement be used to assist in the prediction of a high risk of the development of hepatic secondaries and that these patients are followed up closely after curative resection.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen and cytokeratins for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of colorectal cancer.To evaluate the efficacy of postoperative serial assay of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and cytokeratins for the detection of recurrent disease in patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma after radical surgery.Between 1993 and 2000, 120 patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma underwent radical surgery in the Department of Surgical Gastroenterology, Federal University of Sao Paulo-Escola Paulista de Medicina, Sao Paulo, Brazil. Periodic postoperative evaluation was performed by assaying markers in peripheral serum, colonoscopy and imaging examination. Presence of CEA was detected using the Delfia method with 5 microg/L threshold, and cytokeratins using the LIA-mat TPA-M Prolifigen method with 72 U/L threshold.In the first postoperative year, patients without recurrent disease had normal levels of CEA (1.5 +/- 0.9 microg/L) and monoclonal tissue polypeptide antigen-M (TPA-M, 64.4 +/- 47.8 U/L), while patients with recurrences had high levels of CEA (6.9 +/- 9.8 microg/L, P < 0.01) and TPA-M (192.2 +/- 328.8 U/L, P < 0.05). During the second postoperative year, patients without tumor recurrence had normal levels of CEA (2.0 +/- 1.8 microg/L) and TPA-M (50.8 +/- 38.4 U/L), while patients with recurrence had high levels of CEA (66.3 +/- 130.8 microg/L, P < 0.01) and TPA-M (442.7 +/- 652.8 U/L, P < 0.05). The mean follow-up time was 22.3 mo. There was recurrence in 23 cases. Five reoperations were performed without achieving radical excision. Rises in tumor marker levels preceded identification of recurrences: CEA in seven (30%) and TPA-M in eleven individuals (48%).Intensive follow-up by serial assay of CEA and cytokeratins allows early detection of colorectal neoplasm recurrence.Imaging techniques contribute to increased surgical rescue of relapse in the follow-up of colorectal cancer.This study analyzes the results of a follow-up policy in colorectal cancer at our institution and evaluates the possible benefit provided by each test performed.Six hundred nineteen patients who had radical surgery and adjuvant treatment for colorectal cancer were followed up with a protocol that included carcinoembryonic antigen testing and clinical examination every three months for the first two years, every four months in the third year, and every six months in the fourth and fifth years. Chest X-ray and colonoscopy were performed yearly for five years and abdominal ultrasound was done every six months for the first three years and yearly afterward. Abdominopelvic computerized tomography was performed yearly for the first two years in cases with rectal cancer. If relapse was detected, all operable cases underwent surgery if possible.Between 1993 and 1999, 619 patients were followed-up. Mean follow-up was 66.9 months. Two hundred eight relapses were detected, 83.6 percent in the first three years and 73 (35.1 percent) underwent surgical resection. Carcinoembryonic antigen testing detected 44.2 percent of recurrences and 31.9 percent of them were operated on. Imaging techniques detected a lower percentage of recurrences (18.7 percent) but were more often resectable: 52 percent and 60 percent of the recurrences detected by computerized tomography and chest X-ray, respectively, underwent surgery. Median overall survival of patients with resected relapse was 62 months, significantly higher than those who were not operable (12.4 months).Imaging techniques in the surveillance of resected colorectal cancer contribute to early detection of relapse with a high proportion of operable metastatic disease.Postoperative surveillance in patients with colorectal cancer who have undergone curative resection: a prospective, multicenter, randomized, controlled trial.Although systematic postoperative surveillance of patients with colorectal cancer has been demonstrated to improve survival, it remains unknown whether a more intensive strategy provides any significant advantage. This prospective, multicenter, randomized, controlled trial was aimed at comparing the efficacy of two different surveillance strategies in terms of both survival and recurrence resectability.Patients with stage II or III colorectal cancer were allocated randomly to either a simple surveillance strategy including clinical evaluation and serum carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring, or an intensive strategy in which abdominal computed tomography or ultrasonography, chest radiograph, and colonoscopy were added.A total of 259 patients were included: 132 were observed according to the simple strategy and 127 were observed according to the intensive strategy. Both groups were similar with respect to baseline characteristics and rate and type of tumor recurrence. After a median follow-up of 48 months, there was no difference in the probability of overall survival in the whole series (hazard ratio [HR] = 0.87; 95% CI, 0.49 to 1.54; P = .62). However, the intensive strategy was associated with higher overall survival in patients with stage II tumors (HR = 0.34; 95% CI, 0.12 to 0.98; P = .045) and in those with rectal lesions (HR = 0.09; 95% CI, 0.01 to 0.81; P = .03), mainly due to higher rate of resectability for recurrent tumors. Colonoscopy was responsible for the detection of the highest proportion (44%) of resectable tumor recurrence in the intensive arm.A more intensive surveillance strategy improves the prognosis of patients with stage II colorectal cancer or those with rectal tumors. Inclusion of regular performance of colonoscopy seems justified up to the fifth year of follow-up, at least.[Usefulness of evaluation of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and soluble fragments of cytokeratin 18-th (TPS) in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer].The aim of this study is to diagnose the evaluation of concentration of CEA and TPS in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer.We measured 178 consecutive patients with histopathologically confirmed colorectal cancer: 101 men and 78 women ages 22-86 (average age 54.7). Markers' CEA nad TPS concentration were evaluated before operation and every month after operation during the first 3 months and then every 3 months during 2 years. Relapse was detected in 47 patients.In postoperative period in non-relapse group the mean (the average) concentration of CEA was 1.92+/-2.03 ng/ml and TPS 65.54+/-33.96 U/l and respectively in relapse group for CEA was 1.92+/-2.03 ng/ml and for TPS 65.54+/-33.96 U/l. The obtained results in investigated group show significantly statistical. The relapse was confirmed by using CEA concentration in 42 patients (89.4%). In case of TPS concentration relapse was confirmed in 38 patients (80.85%). The relapse was detected in 45 patients (95.74) if increase in CEA or TPS concentration was treated as a way of detecting relapse. TPS markers point out that the increase of TPS concentartion may be ahead of relapse symptoms at about 2-6 months.TPS is a useful marker in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer. The evaluation of TPS concentration allow to diagnose the recurrence of colorectal cancer earlier than by using burden markers--CEA. Common evaluation of TPS and CEA increase sensitivity in detection of relapse in patients with colorectal cancer.Systematic follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer in Norway: a population-based audit of effectiveness, costs, and compliance.In this study, we analyzed the Norwegian guidelines for systematic follow-up after curative colorectal cancer surgery in a large single institution. Three hundred fourteen consecutive unselected patients undergoing curative surgery for colorectal cancer between 1996 and 1999 were studied with regard to asymptomatic curable recurrence, compliance with the program, and cost. Follow-up included carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) interval measurements, colonoscopy, ultrasonography of the liver, and radiography of the chest. In 194 (62%) of the patients, follow-up was conducted according to the Norwegian guidelines. Twenty-one patients (11%) were operated on for curable recurrence, and 18 patients (9%) were disease free after curative surgery for recurrence at evaluation. Four metachronous tumors (2%) were found. CEA interval measurement had to be made most frequently (534 tests needed) to detect one asymptomatic curable recurrence. Follow-up program did not influence cancer-specific survival. Overall compliance with the surveillance program was 66%, being lowest for colonoscopy (55%) and highest for ultrasonography of the liver (85%). The total program cost was 228,117 euro (US 280,994 dollars), translating into 20,530 euro (US 25,289 dollars) for one surviving patient after surgery for recurrence. The total diagnosis yield with regard to disease-free survival after surgery for recurrence was 9%. Compliance was moderate. Whether the continuing implementation of such program and cost are justified should be debated.Postoperative follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer: a combined evaluation of CT scan, colonoscopy and tumour markers.The purpose of this study is to present the experience of our department regarding the importance of the systematic postoperative follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer, early diagnosis and treatment of the recurrence of the disease or a metachronous cancer.In a study that took place between October 2001 and February 2004 amongst 67 patients that were operated upon for colorectal cancer, 41 were systematically being followed up through CT scan, colonoscopy and tumour markers.In the 14th and 18th months postoperatively for 2 of the patients the CT scan showed hepatic metastasis, while the colonoscopy was negative. Regarding the tumour markers, one (CEA) was elevated in one patient while three were elevated in the others. For 2 out of the 41 patients the colonoscopy showed recurrence of the disease within one and two years respectively. The CT scan proved to be free of metastasis and the tumour markers were falling within the normal range for one of the patients while for the other CEA was elevated. Both patients underwent additional colectomy. Postoperative increase of the tumour markers was observed in 9 patients. The above patients had normal markers in the immediate postoperative period. For 4 out of the 9 patients recurrence or spread of the disease was observed while the rest of them are still being followed up.In conclusion, we believe that the systematic postoperative follow-up of the patients with colorectal cancer through CT, colonoscopy and the use of tumour markers contributes decisively to the early diagnosis and treatment of any possible recurrence of the cancer or a metachronous cancer or misdiagnosed concomitant cancer.Cost and effectiveness of follow-up examinations in patients with colorectal cancer resected for cure in a French population-based study.The cost of follow-up examinations for patients having undergone potentially curative surgery for colorectal cancer is considerable. The aim of this study was to provide a thorough assessment of the cost and effectiveness of the follow-up tests used during the 5 years after surgical resection for colorectal cancer and its recurrences. We studied medical and economic data from the records of 256 patients registered in the Herault Tumor Registry who underwent potentially curative surgical resection in 1992. Recurrence, curative recurrence, survival, and the cost of follow-up tests were assessed respectively for at least 5 years. We analyzed the cost and effectiveness of follow-up tests in patients who received either follow-up with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring as advocated by the 1998 French consensus conference recommendations (standard follow-up) or a more minimal follow-up schedule. Nine patients died in the postoperative period. The 5-year survival rates in the standard and minimal follow-up groups were 85% and 79%, respectively (p=0.25). Cost-effectiveness ratios were 2123 in Dukes' stage A patients, 4306 in Dukes' stage B patients, and 9600 in Dukes' stage C patients. Cost-effectiveness ratios for CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography per patient alive in the standard follow-up group were 1238 and 2261.5, respectively. Cost-effectiveness ratios for CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography per patient alive in the minimal follow-up group were 1478 and 573, respectively. There were no survivors 5 years after a recurrence when the recurrence was detected by physical examination, chest X-ray, and colonoscopy in either follow-up group. Dukes' classification is a poor indicator of patient selection. The follow-up tests should only include CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of recurrence.Follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer.Individual cutoff levels of carcinoembryonic antigen and CA 242 indicate recurrence of colorectal cancer with high sensitivity.This study was designed to identify the sensitivity and specificity associated with recurrent colorectal cancer, principally hepatic metastases, with individual cutoff levels of carcinoembryonic antigen; identify the corresponding data for CA 50 and CA 242; compare these findings with standard cutoff levels, clinical examinations, and patients' personal health assessments; and identify the time between increasing serum levels and detection of actual relapses, particularly hepatic metastases.A prospective study was performed that included 132 patients with colorectal cancer who underwent surgery with curative intent and who were followed up for a minimum of 5 years. Serum samples were obtained the first two years after surgery. Marker serum levels were analyzed with the commercial Delfia test kit.During the sampling period, carcinoembryonic antigen levels were very high or above the individual cutoff level in 21 of 24 cases with recurrent disease. All eight hepatic metastases detected during the sampling period were indicated by carcinoembryonic antigen 0 to 19 months earlier. In the 3rd postoperative year, nine patients with recurrence were identified, and in eight of them, carcinoembryonic antigen rose above the individual cutoff level 23 months before diagnosis. The overall sensitivity and specificity associated with recurrent disease with individual cutoff levels were 79 and 64 percent for carcinoembryonic antigen, 46 and 77 percent for CA 50, and 63 and 76 percent for CA 242, respectively, which was higher than for any other method compared.With individual cutoff levels, both carcinoembryonic antigen and CA 242 had high sensitivity and acceptable specificity for indicating recurrent colorectal cancer. Because most (29/33) patients with recurrent disease identified within 3 years after surgery and all 8 with hepatic metastases identified during the sampling period were indicated by carcinoembryonic antigen with the individual cutoff, that method was established as the best for postoperative surveillance.CEA and relapse after the operation of colorectal carcinoma.Relapses have an important meaning in relation to the curative surgical intervention. In RO resections according to UICC classification, the local relapses were classified as the most important factor for survival. Without any doubts the most important of these tumor-biological prognostic factors in patients with colorectal carcinoma is the carcino-embryonal antigen. Up to now, the unquestionable importance of the determination of serum levels of CEA for the detection of relapses is most often described.This study is retrospective, not randomized. Analyzed were medical records and data of patients, who underwent the surgery of colorectal carcinoma at IInd Department of Surgery, University Hospital, Faculty of Medicine, Comenius University, Bratislava, in period from January 1st, 1986 to December 31st, 1995. In our analysis we evaluate the age and gender of patients, date of the surgery and type of the surgery from the point of acuteness, as well as radicality, staging of the disease, levels of the serum CEA. Serum levels of carcino-embryonal antigen before operation were determined and evaluated. In patients, who remaind in the monitoring at our department we examine CEA in regular intervals.From our group of patients, in 28 patients the relapse of the disease was determined here. Before the first operation, the preoperative level of CEA was examined in 15 patients and in 13 patients it was not. From 15 patients with examined CEA level, 7 patients (46.7%) had increased and 9 patients (53.3%) normal level. In twenty-seven patients CEA level was examined to reveal a relapse. One patient was diagnosed during the acute surgery and CEA was not determined prior this operation. From the remaining 27 patients, CEA level was positive in 20 patients (74.1%) and 7 patients had normal levels (25.9%). From these 7 patients with normal CEA level, in 5 cases it was locoregional relapse and 2 patients have distant metastases. From all patients, in whom the relapse was determined at our department, in 13 patients locoregional relapse was detected and in 15 patients distant metastases were diagnosed.Due to the sensitivity of serum level of CEA for detection of relapses, which is higher compared to the primary tumor and also to found lead time 4 months we think the postoperative regular determination of CEA in patients after the curative resection is appropriate. Earlier determination of less progressive relapse is definitely important, although the current long-term survival after the surgery for relapses is not optimistic. Development of surgical procedures as well as alternative treatment can bring better results in less developed relapse of the disease. (Ref. 28.).FDG-PET improves the management of patients with suspected recurrence of colorectal cancer.This study aims to assess the influence of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) detection of recurrent disease on the management of patients with colorectal cancer and suspected recurrence. One hundred and twenty patients with suspected recurrence were studied with FDG-PET. Fifty-eight patients were referred for FDG-PET because of the elevation of serum tumour markers. Thirty-one patients were referred because of inconclusive results of conventional imaging modalities. Twenty-five patients had known recurrence and were referred for pre-surgical assessment. Six patients were referred because of abdominal pain. A major management change was considered when, as a consequence of FDG-PET results, medical treatment was changed to surgical, or surgical to medical or to no treatment. A minor management change was considered when changes were made within a treatment modality. Of the 58 patients with elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), FDG-PET detected recurrence and led to a major management change in 34 (58%). Eighteen underwent curative surgery and 16 were treated with systemic therapy. Of the 31 patients evaluated because of inconclusive results of conventional imaging modalities, FDG-PET was positive for recurrence in 24 and negative in seven. A major management change took place in 14 patients (45%). Of the 25 patients evaluated to rule out other sites of disease before surgery, FDG-PET did not show any other site of recurrence in 13 (52%) and showed more lesions in the remaining patients. Major management change took place in eight patients (32%). Overall, in the 120 patients studied, FDG-PET resulted in major management changes in 58 (48%), minor changes in four (3%) and no change in 54 (45%). It can be concluded that FDG-PET has a significant impact on the management of patients with suspected recurrence of colorectal cancer. FDG-PET detection of recurrence frequently allows curative surgical intervention. The early identification of distant metastases may also facilitate the implementation of systemic treatment.Results of long-term follow-up after curative resection of Dukes A colorectal cancer.Patients with Dukes A (UICC I) colorectal cancer have a good prognosis after curative resection. It is not known, however, if the outcome is significantly different for UICC Ia and Ib patients or if patients with reduced risks of recurrences can be identified early after surgery. This is of interest, as it would permit a more cost-effective, patient-oriented, and tumor stage-oriented follow-up program. To study these questions, a prospective follow-up database, including 1375 patients after curative resection of colorectal cancer, was analyzed. A total of 296 patients with Dukes A colorectal cancer with a median follow-up of 44 months were studied. Perioperative and follow-up mortality rates were 3% and 14%, respectively. Recurrent disease developed in 10% of Dukes A patients after a disease-free interval of 16 months. Significantly more patients suffering from pT2 (UICC Ib) cancer had recurrent disease than patients with pT1 (UICC Ia) cancer (13% vs. 4%; p <0.05). Preoperative CEA levels in patients with recurrent disease were significantly higher than in long-term disease-free patients (5.3 +/- 1.8 vs. 3.5 +/- 0.6 ng/ml; p <0.05). Curative resection of recurrent disease was achieved in 38% of the patients with recurrences (4% of all patients). Survival analysis showed significantly better survival in patients with Dukes A cancer than in those at higher tumor stages (log rank, <0.0001), and only 39% of all Dukes A patients who died during follow-up had recurrent disease. Dukes A (UICC Ia and Ib) colorectal cancer was diagnosed in 22% of our patients treated for cure, and long-term survival was 86%. There were significantly fewer cases of recurrent disease after curative resection of UICC Ia (pT1N0M0) cancer, so we propose a novel, less intensive follow-up regimen for these patients, leading to a more cost-effective, patient-oriented, and tumor stage-oriented follow-up program.Usefulness of analytical CEA doubling time and half-life time for overlooked synchronous metastases in colorectal carcinoma.Measurement of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) has been widely applied to detect recurrence, especially of colorectal carcinoma. The validity however, is still controversial. We investigated serial changes in CEA values to calculate whether the CEA doubling time and half-life time could predict metastatic progression or prognosis in colorectal carcinoma.Pre- and post-operative serial serum CEA contents were determined in 22 cases of colorectal cancer with or without metastasis. CEA values were determined by enzyme immunoassay (EIA). Patients were assigned depending upon survival time (within vs. more than 18 months after primary resection) for assessment of CEA doubling time. From the gradient of the semi-logarithmic CEA graph, the preoperative doubling time was calculated and the postoperative half-life time was estimated according to the diagnosis of metastases within 2 years after primary resection [metastasis (+) or (-)].In spite of the effect of curative re-operation of metastatic lesions or of postoperative adjuvant chemotherapy, the CEA doubling time of the groups showed a relation with prognosis (p = 0.045, Student's t-test) when the patients were divided into >18 and < or =18 months survival time. The CEA half-life time of the groups without overlooked metastases was statistically longer than those with (mean +/- SD 8.01 +/- 2.07 and 4.33 +/- 1.11, respectively, p < 0.01, one-factor ANOVA test). Clearance (k) showed a significant difference between the groups (p < 0.001, Student's t-test).The CEA doubling time appeared to be a less independent prognostic factor, whereas prolongation of the CEA half-life time might potentially suggest the existence of overlooked synchronous metastases from colorectal carcinoma.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography as an adjunct to carcinoembryonic antigen in the management of patients with presumed recurrent colorectal cancer and nondiagnostic radiologic workup.The purpose of this study was to determine the role of fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (PET) in localizing disease in patients with colorectal cancer with radiologically occult symptomatology or increases in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level.Two hundred seventy-seven patients with colorectal cancer underwent PET scanning between November 1998 and September 2000 prompted by (1) increasing CEA level and nondiagnostic imaging or (2) symptoms with normal CEA level and nondiagnostic imaging. PET results were correlated with operative findings/histology, clinical follow-up data, and CEA level to determine PET's accuracy in determining the source of symptoms or CEA.Fifteen patients had increasing CEA levels, and 14 had abnormal PET. Two of these 14 were denied exploration because PET suggested widely metastatic disease. Nine patients underwent exploration with curative intent. In 1 patient, recurrence was not pathologically confirmed (false-positive rate, 8%). Two had disease beyond that predicted by PET, and 6 underwent complete resection and normalized their CEA levels. Four symptomatic patients with normal CEA levels and negative x-rays had abnormal PET; at exploration, 3 had no evidence of recurrence.PET imaging can often accurately localize the source of radiologically occult increases in CEA level and select that subset of patients eligible for therapeutic laparotomy. Symptomatic, PET-positive patients with normal CEA levels frequently undergo nontherapeutic laparotomy, and PET findings should be interpreted with caution in these patients.CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 in patients surviving colorectal cancer without recurrent disease.To establish a baseline and intraindividual fluctuations of the tumour markers CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 in patients cured from colorectal cancer, and to test the hypothesis that serum concentrations and intraindividual fluctuations do not differ from the concentrations in cancer-free individuals.Ninety patients with colorectal cancer, who had undergone surgery with curative intent, were still alive at least 5 years after surgery with no signs of recurrent disease. Serum levels of tumour markers CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 before and up to 2 years after surgery were analysed after the prospective study was terminated.The pre-operative serum levels of CEA, CA 50 and CEA 242 were elevated in 36%, 16% and 20% of the patients. They were lowered after curative surgery. A small increase of CEA levels was found after the initial post-operative decrease. The intraindividual fluctuations for CA 50 and CA 242 did not exceed 15% but in 24% of the patients the serum levels of CA 50 were high and oscillating. The patients cured from Dukes > C cancer had higher serum concentrations of CEA than patients who had a Dukes > B cancer, which were higher than in patients who had Dukes > A cancer. Concentrations of CA 242 were higher in patients cured from Dukes > A than patients cured from Dukes> B or C cancers.During the first 2 years after curative surgery for colorectal cancer the serum levels of CEA did not differ from those levels in normal cancer-free subjects. The serum levels of CEA were related to Dukes > staging whereas the levels of CA 242 were inversely related to Dukes > staging.Carcinoembryonic antigen for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of colorectal cancer.During recent years a discussion about cost-effectiveness and importance of follow-up determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) after curative resection of large bowel cancer has developed.Between 1990 and 1998 follow-up CEA levels of 1,321 patients after curative colorectal cancer resection were prospectively collected in cooperation with family physicians, CEA determinations were made with different assays by various laboratories. The reported findings were adjusted for the different methods used.306 patients developed recurrent disease following curative cancer resection (23.2% of all patients). Regarding the role of follow-up CEA determination, they were divided into: I. no preoperative CEA determination/insufficient follow-up (N = 47); II. no elevation of CEA with primary cancer, a) elevation with recurrent disease (N = 62), b) no elevation at any time point (N = 53), c) role of CEA not completely elucidated (N = 41); III. elevated CEA levels with primary cancer, a) no increase with recurrent disease (N = 21), b) increase with other symptoms of recurrent disease (N = 45), c) increased levels as early symptom of recurrent disease (N = 37). 30 patients (9.8% of all patients with recurrent disease; 2.3% of all patients) with increased CEA levels at the time of recurrent disease underwent surgical resection with curative intention (R0 resection).Our findings indicate that up to 47% of the patients with recurrent disease and 11% of all patients (N = 144, groups IIa + IIIb + IIIc) could benefit from routine follow-up CEA determinations after curative colorectal cancer resection. Nonetheless, only 2.3% of all patients with elevated CEA levels underwent R0 resection of recurrent disease. Despite these detection and R0 resectability rates, CEA plays a crucial role in the early detection of recurrent disease and remains an important part of routine patient care after curative resection of colorectal cancer.Can postoperative surveillance with serial CEA immunoscintigraphy detect resectable rectal cancer recurrence and potentially improve tumor-free survival?This study was performed to determine if postoperative serial monitoring of rectal cancer patients can be performed with an immunoscintigraphic imaging test for carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). It was also of interest to assess whether this test, in combination with standard monitoring procedures used in an intensive surveillance plan, can result in the identification of surgically salvageable patients.Forty consecutive resected Dukes' B and C rectal cancer patients underwent a prospective, single-institution, surveillance trial of physical examination (including digital rectal examination), endoscopy, CT of the abdomen and pelvis, liver ultrasound, chest x-ray, blood CEA, and CEA immunoscintigraphy with arcitumomab (CEA-Scan, Immunomedics, Morris Plains, NJ) every 6 months for the first 2 years and every 12 months for the next 3 years after initial operation. Outcomes were compared with those from a similar group of 69 patients treated previously at the same institution but without CEA imaging.A total of 219 CEA imaging studies were performed without any significant adverse effects or immune responses, and resulted in lesion sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive and negative predictive values of 94.1%, 97.5%, 97.3%, 76.2%, and 99.5%, respectively. Of the 40 patients, 16 developed 22 surgically confirmed local or distant recurrences, and CEA imaging correctly disclosed 82% of these lesions pre-operatively. All of the patients found to have recurrences had at least one tumor site by CEA imaging; only 6 of 16 had elevated blood CEA titers. On a patient-basis, there was a sensitivity of 100%, a specificity of 79.2%, an accuracy of 87.5%, and positive and negative predictive values of 76.2% and 100%, respectively. The potential therapeutic benefit of serial arcitumomab imaging is suggested by the fact that 6 of 16 patients (37.5%) with recurrence underwent potentially curative second-look operations, compared with 6 of 69 (8.7%) of a comparable population studied at this institution during an earlier 6-year period, using all of the same tests except CEA imaging. None of the patients in this historic control group survived more than 21 months, although the mean survival of the six patients resected for cure in the study population was 35 months (range 11 to 69 months). During 6 years of followup, three of the six re-resected patients eventually died of cancer recurrence, two died from other causes (and were confirmed by necropsy to be tumor-free), and one patient is still free of disease in the sixth year. CEA scanning appeared to be more predictive of recurrence than blood CEA testing or other diagnostic modalities.Arcitumomab inclusion in intensive surveillance of patients with resected rectal cancer can disclose tumor recurrence at a stage that allowed surgical salvage therapy in 37.5% of the 16 patients with recurrence who had second-look surgery, and in 19% the patients were free of disease during longterm followup. This pilot study suggests that a randomized prospective trial comparing standard surveillance procedures to the use of CEA imaging added thereto should be undertaken.Is (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in recurrent colorectal cancer a contribution to surgical decision making?Accuracy of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) and contribution to surgical decision making in recurrent or metastatic colorectal cancer were evaluated.One hundred whole-body PET tests in colorectal cancer patients (1994 to 1998) were compared with computed tomography (CT), liver ultrasonography, and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) test. Mean follow-up was 12 months.Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of FDG-PET for malignant findings were, respectively, 98%, 90% and 95%; for 87 CT scans, 91%, 72%, and 82%; for 98 CEA tests, 76%, 90%, and 82%; for detection of liver metastases with PET, 100%, 99%, and 99%; and for 68 ultrasound tests, 87%, 96%, and 93%. PET accuracy for local recurrence was 96%. Additional information was provided by PET in 86% of cases (abdomen, thorax, liver). PET influenced surgical decisions in 61% of cases.FDG-PET adds relevant accuracy to the conventional staging of patients with colorectal cancer and may cost-effectively help to select the appropriate treatment.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of large-bowel cancer.During recent years, a discussion about cost-effectiveness and importance of follow-up evaluation after curative resection of large-bowel cancer has developed. It is not known whether the determination of carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) plays a crucial role in the early detection of recurrent disease.We conducted an analysis of the prospective follow-up database of 1321 patients after curative resection of colorectal cancer in our institution between 1990 and 1998 to evaluate the role of CEA in the early detection of recurrent disease.Of the 1321 patients included in our study, 306 developed recurrent disease following curative resection (23.2%). These patients with recurrent disease were divided into: Group I. No pre-operative CEA determination/insufficient follow-up (n=47; 15.4%). Group II. No elevation of CEA with primary cancer (n=156; 51.0%): (IIa) elevation with recurrent disease (n=62); (IIb) no elevation at any time point (n=53); and (IIc) role of CEA not completely elucidated (n=41). Thirteen patients of group II underwent curative relapse surgery (8.3%). Group III. Elevated CEA with primary cancer (n=103; 33.7%): (IlIa) no increase with recurrent disease (n=21); (IIIb) increase with other symptoms of recurrent disease (n=45); and (IIIc) increased values as an early symptom of recurrent disease (n=37). Sixteen patients of group III underwent curative relapse surgery (15.5%). In patients after relapse surgery, recurrent disease developed again after a median time of 12 months (mean 17.9+/-3.8 months).Our findings indicate that 2.8% of all patients (12.1% of patients with recurrent disease) who underwent curative resection of colorectal cancer profit from follow-up CEA determinations. With careful observation of CEA kinetics, 6.2% (n=82) of all patients or 26.8% of patients with recurrent disease could profit from routine follow-up CEA determinations. In 9.5% of patients with recurrent disease, curative resection of relapse was achieved and these patients remained disease free for a median time of 12 months. Regular CEA measurements remain an important part of routine patient care after curative resection of colorectal cancer.Is intensive follow-up really able to improve prognosis of patients with local recurrence after curative surgery for rectal cancer?Because more than 90% of local recurrences after curative surgery for rectal cancer appear within the first 36 months after surgery, an intensive and strict follow-up program during this period could improve early diagnosis and, thus, prognosis of patients.Of the 216 patients who underwent surgery for rectal cancer, 127 entered an intensive follow-up program (median follow-up: 42 months); the clinical outcome of the remaining 89 patients was reconstructed with the help of their general practitioners.Fifty eight (26.8%) of the 216 patients who were treated with curative surgery alone developed a local recurrence; pelvic recurrences were prevalent. Eleven (30.5%) of the 36 patients who had recurrence during follow-up, and 6 of the 22 who had not undergone follow-up, had a reoperation with curative intent; the median survival was 19 months vs. 8 months, respectively (P = ns). Four (44.4%) curative reoperations were performed on the 9 asymptomatic patients and in 13 (26.5%) of the 49 cases with symptomatic local recurrences. Median survival was 15 months vs. 14 months, respectively (P = n.s). All patients except one (living after 42 months from reoperation) died within 48 months.In our study, adherence to a strict follow-up program unfortunately proved to be ineffective for improving long-term survival for patients who underwent reoperation with curative intent.CEA, TPS, CA 19-9 and CA 72-4 and the fecal occult blood test in the preoperative diagnosis and follow-up after resective surgery of colorectal cancer.In a prospective clinical study we examined the diagnostic procedures used in the preoperative diagnosis of colorectal cancer patients (n = 176) and the value of supplementation of standard diagnostic methods (clinical investigation, colonoscopy, barium enema, ultrasound, computer tomography) with a test for occult fecal blood (FOBT) and an expanded tumor marker panel (CA 19-9, TPS and CA 72-4 in addition to CEA) in the postoperative follow-up (n = 116, mean follow-up 21 months). Preoperative diagnosis based on colonoscopy/barium enema, followed by histology and the imaging methods, in most cases US and/or CT. Patients with postoperative stage Dukes D and after palliative surgery were excluded from the follow-up study (n = 43). The patients were seen every three months (clinical investigation, US, CT, tumor markers, FOBT) within the first two postoperative years and every half a year thereafter. 83 of the 116 patients (16%) developed a recurrent disease and 5 of them could be reoperated with curative intention. In addition to the 19 patients 14 simultaneously admitted patients with recurrence of colorectal cancer (total n = 33) were studied. The results of our study analyzing the sensitivity and specificity of colonoscopy, tumor, markers and the FOBT in the preoperative and postoperative phases as well as in the diagnosis of recurrent disease of colorectal cancer confirms the view that FOBT and tumor markers cannot replace endoscopic and imaging methods. However they support the concept, that diagnosis and follow-up of colorectal cancer should be based on a combination of clinical investigation and imaging methods (US, CT etc. and endoscopic and/or x-ray examination) with supplementation by FOBT and determination of tumor markers, mainly CEA. In the case a patient is asking for prognostic and recurrence information as early and as valid as possible we currently recommend the following procedure for the first two years after surgery: every three months the determination of tumor markers, FOBT as well as ultrasound of the upper abdomen and CT of the lower abdomen and every half year a total colonoscopy. The question of whether this program will also have a therapeutical relevance depends on several factors like the personal experience and concepts of the consulting surgeons and oncologists and also on the tasks and duties which are considered worthy by the patient for his further life if confronted with the diagnosis of recurrent colorectal cancer.Should carcinoembryonic antigen be used in the management of patients with colorectal cancer?The contribution of carcinoembryonic antigen carcinoembryionic antigen for the effective management of colorectal cancer patients remains a controversial issue. The aim of this study is to attempt to get some valid answers to its function in the diagnosis, prognosis, and overall management of colorectal cancer patients.A retrospective review of colorectal cancer patients managed and prospectively registered by the authors between 1985 and 1998 was performed. Serum carcinoembryionic antigen levels were determined preoperatively in 209 patients with primary colorectal cancer and postoperatively in 196 patients who had undergone curative resection of their tumors, according to a fixed schedule. A maximum value of 5 ng/ml was accepted as being normal. With the exception of endoscopy, all other diagnostic techniques were only used after an abnormal carcinoembryionic antigen result (a raised value found twice consecutively).carcinoembryionic antigen preoperative values were raised only in 40 percent of patients and were related to disease stage, with the highest values found in patients with Stage IV disease. However, an elevated preoperative carcinoembryionic antigen value had a very marked prognostic importance, with a statistically significant difference in survival curves (Kaplan-Meier); the same was valid for curatively resected patients (Stages I, II, and III) and for Stages II and III patients considered separately. Multivariate analysis using the Cox proportional hazards technique confirmed these results, showing preoperative carcinoembryionic antigen to have an independent prognostic value, with a relative risk of recurrence of 3.74 for patients with raised preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen levels. In postoperative follow-up, carcinoembryionic antigen elevation was found to be a very accurate marker of recurrence (sensitivity, 77 percent; specificity, 98 percent), mainly in liver metastasis (sensitivity, 100 percent), and the best marker of asymptomatic recurrence (63 percent of cases). However, carcinoembryionic antigen's impact on overall survival was negligible because of the poor results of surgical treatment of recurrences.Preoperative carcinoembryionic antigen is a very important prognostic indicator and should be considered in future trials. Postoperative carcinoembryionic antigen elevation is a very sensitive marker of recurrence and even of asymptomatic recurrence, but its impact on overall survival does not seem to be relevant. Nevertheless, carcinoembryionic antigen should continue to be used in colorectal cancer patients until better methods of diagnosis and treatment of recurrence are developed.The relationship between prognosis and CEA-dt after hepatic resection in patients with colorectal carcinomas.CEA-doubling time (CEA-dt) was calculated by measuring serum CEA at two voluntary points. As CEA-dt is correlated with tumour doubling time the growth rate of liver metastasis could be determined. We investigated the relationship between CEA-dt and prognosis to determine the indications for resection of liver metastasis.We examined 334 patients diagnosed with resected liver metastasis of colorectal carcinoma. Patients were divided into three categories based on CEA-dt; Group A, CEA-dt <30 days; Group B, 30 days </=cCEA-dt <80 days; and Group C, CEA-dt >/=s80 days. Clinicopathological parameters, the 3-year or 5-year survival rate and the rate of recurrence were compared among the three groups.In Group A, the survival time after hepatic resection was significantly shorter compared to the other groups. Furthermore, multiple liver metastasis showed slightly reduced CEA-dt levels compared with solitary metastasis, but even in patients with solitary liver metastasis, the rate of survival was poor. In 70% of Group A patients, recurrent tumour was recognized within 1 year of hepatic resection.When surgery for liver metastasis of colorectal cancer is considered. Group A patients should be recognized as having a poor prognosis and a high rate of recurrence after hepatic resection, and CEA-dt should be employed as a prognostic factor.Carcinoembryonic antigen: its value in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer.We examined the value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring for detecting treatable recurrence of colorectal carcinoma. CEA assays were undertaken in 193 patients over a 2-year period. The levels in 34 patients were raised in one or more assays above the laboratory-defined upper limit of normal; 31 cases were reviewed retrospectively. In 10% of patients there were Dukes' A lesions at the initial resection, in 39% Dukes' B, and in 52% Dukes' C1 or C2. Tumours were rectal in 61%. Median follow-up was 3 years (range, 16 years-2 months). In 23 of 31 (74%) there were symptoms or signs of recurrent disease prior to or simultaneously with an observed rise in CEA; in 8 the CEA rise preceded the onset of symptoms or the appearance of signs. Of the 31 cases 26 underwent investigation for recurrent disease, but in only 6 of these was the investigation driven by the observed rise in CEA rather than the onset of symptoms or presence of signs. Three of these six were false-positive results (50%), one has been lost to follow-up, and two had confirmed recurrence. Neither of the two with recurrence had operable disease. One of the two had no further treatment, and one underwent laparotomy at which multiple peritoneal seedlings were found. In both of the two cases going to laparotomy, one of which was prompted by a high CEA, widely disseminated disease was found. Over a 2-year period, serial CEA measurement thus yielded no patient benefit.Is carcino-embryonic antigen useful in the follow-up management of patients with colorectal liver metastases?The role of carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) in monitoring early detection of recurrent or metastatic colorectal cancer, and its impact on resectability rate and patient survival remains controversial. Our objective was to determine any association between the preoperative level of CEA and prognosis, and the resectability and survival by method of diagnosis of colorectal hepatic metastases.We analyzed patients who underwent exploration for hepatic resection for metastatic colorectal cancer over a 15-year period. The patient population consisted of those patients who had undergone primary colon or rectal resection and were followed up with serial CEA levels and of patients who were followed up with physical examination, liver function tests (LFTs) or computed tomography (CT) of the abdomen and pelvis that led to the diagnosis of liver metastases. Also included in the study were patients who were diagnosed with liver metastases at the time of the primary colon or rectal resection and underwent planned hepatic resection at a later time.Three hundred and one (301) patients who underwent a total of 345 planned hepatic resections for metastatic colorectal cancer between January 1978 and December 1993 were included in this analysis. The median preoperative CEA level was 24.8 ng/mL in the resected group, 53.0 ng/mL in the incomplete resection group, and 49.1 ng/mL in the nonresected group (P = 0.02). More of the patients who had a preoperative CEA < or =30 ng/mL were in the resected group, while those who had a preoperative CEA >30 ng/mL were likely to be in the nonresected group (P = 0.002). The median survival was 25 months for patients with a preoperative CEA level < or =30 ng/mL and 17 months for patients with a preoperative CEA >30 ng/mL (P = 0.0005). The resectability rate and the survival of patients by method of diagnosing liver metastases-rising CEA versus history and physical, elevated LFTs, CT scan versus diagnosis at the time of primary resection-was not significant (P = 0.06 and P = 0.19, respectively). Given the nonstandardized retrospective nature of the study cohort and relative small groups of patients, the power to detect small differences in survival by method of diagnosis is limited. In the complete resection group of patients with unilobar liver disease (5-year survival of 28.8%) there was no difference in survival between those patients who had normal preoperative CEA and those who had elevated preoperative CEA, and approximately 90% of them had an abnormal preoperative serum CEA level.CEA is useful in the preoperative evaluation of patients with hepatic colorectal metastases for assessing prognosis and is complimentary to history and physical examination in the diagnosis of liver metastases. Patients with colorectal liver metastases and preoperative CEA < or =30 ng/mL are more likely to be resectable, and they have the longest survival.[The pre- and postoperative monitoring of the immunological indices and tumor markers in colorectal carcinoma].The onset of immunological reaction against colorectal carcinoma is based on superficial changes in the malignant cell components following the formation of antigen structures. This explains the interest in the issue and defines the aim of the study. Over a 5-year period, in the Emergency Surgery Clinic, 86 patients with histologically diagnosed colorectal carcinoma (46 men and 40 women) are examined prior to surgery, and 107 patients (55 men and 52 women)--after the operation. The tumor markers CEA, CA 19-9, AFP and immunoglobulin IgA are tested using ELISA and RIA methods. Conventional ultrasound, scintigraphic and CT studies are carried out to detect liver metastases. The obtained results undergo statistical processing with correlation analysis and sensitivity and specificity coefficients. Among those examined preoperatively elevated CEA levels (CEA > 2.5 ng/ml) are recorded in 42 cases (48.9%), and for CA 19-9 (CA 19-9 > 37 E/ml)--in 40 (46.5%). From the patients with complicated colorectal carcinoma in the postoperative period 83 are clinically healthy (77.6%); of the latter marker-positive are 16 (19.3%), and marker-negative--67 (80.7%). Relapses and metastases are registered in 24 cases (22.4%) of which marker-positive--19 (79.2%). Liver and abdominal lymph node metastases are detected by US, scintigraphy and CT study. All three imaging methods contribute to diagnose liver metastases in 14 patients (13%). In 32 patients (18 men and 14 women) postsurgical monitoring of immunological IgA levels and tumor markers is done over period ranging from 7-10 days to 2 years postoperatively. Correlative dependences between IgA and CEA (R = +0.99), and between IgA and CA 19-9 (R = +0.97) are also documented. The sensitivity of both markers (CEA and CA 19-9) is low, varying between 38 and 51 per cent, with specificity amounting to 61-67 per cent. The paradoxically high elevation of tumor markers prior to operation shows a constant decrease at 3 months after surgery.1. The sensitivity of both markers (CEA and CA 19-9) is low (38-51%), and that is why their use in screening examinations lacks clinical relevance. 2. CEA specificity is by no means high (61-67%), and it may become positive in a number of nononcological diseases (liver cirrhosis and hepatitis, inflammation diseases of GIT and lungs). 3. Plasma CEA and CA 19-9 levels correlate well with the neoplastic process progression/regression. 4. Preoperative CEA level has a prognostic value for postsurgical relapses. 5. High IgA levels are indicators for relapses or metastases from colorectal carcinoma. 6. Tumor histological verification correlates also with the high CEA levels and with the depth of tumor infiltration into the intestinal wall. 7. The dynamic assessment of tumor markers postoperatively has a high informative value in all colorectal carcinoma patients. 8. Pre- and postoperative high CEA levels are observed in patients assigned to the poor prognosis group, and should be given adjuvant therapy.Monitoring carcinoembryonic antigen in colorectal cancer: is it still useful?The results of a study conducted to determine the usefulness of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring in the follow-up of patients with resected colorectal cancer are reported herein. The subjects of this study were 125 patients in whom CEA had been determined preoperatively and 239 patients in whom CEA had been monitored postoperatively. The results revealed increased preoperative CEA in only 24% of the subjects, and that this increment was correlated with subsequent more advanced tumor stage and a higher recurrence rate (P < 0.01). The postoperative CEA level exceeded the threshold in 71% of the patients affected by recurrence, 94.4% of whom developed liver metastases and 50%, nonhepatic recurrence. This marker showed elevated sensitivity for liver metastases (99%), whereas the sensitivity was lower for nonhepatic recurrence of the disease (94%). Thus, we concluded that CEA monitoring can be useful for preoperative colorectal tumor grading, even if its validity in the early diagnosis of recurrence is problematic, especially in terms of radical repeated surgery and survival.[Increased carcinoembryonic antigen and absence of recurrence in monitoring colorectal cancer].Carcinoembryonic antigen has been used to monitor colorectal cancer treated patients, elevated carcinoembryonic antigen allows to predict recurrence however some serum levels is not ever a sign of disease. In a last paper 21% of the colorectal cancer patients treated surgically had not recurrent disease. The aim of the study was to follow these patients for at least one year. Thirty two patients with elevated carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels were studied. Five were excluded and 27 were followed with chest RX, computadorized tomography and colonoscopy. Carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels were measured by ELISA using Sorine Biomedica kit (normal value: 5 ng/ml). Eleven patients (41%) developed recurrence, seven had liver metastasis. The mean time among the elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen and the recurrence was 6.6 months. The recurrence was not observed in 18 patients, the carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels become normal in eight and in the eight others the carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels persisted elevated. Carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels can be elevated before the diagnosis of recurrence, mostly in liver metastasis, however, a number of patients with elevated carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels do not have a known cause.Serum and tissue CEA in colorectal cancer: clinical relevance.This article is an analysis of the information derived from the determination of tumor-tissue concentration of CEA in patients with colorectal cancer. To ascertain the relationship between tumor marker content with the histologic aspects and serologic levels of CEA of this neoplam.136 patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma and 41 with colorectal benign processes are analyzed and followed during an average time of 27 months. The CEA of the serum were obtained preoperatively and postoperatively and measured by radioimmunoassay (RIA). Tissular CEA levels were determined with RIA. The histological characteristics are analyzed (Dukes classification, grade of differentiation, index of atypia, microscopic vascular and lymphatic involvement.1) The cut off point of the tissular CEA with the best sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of normal mucosa is 386 ng/mg and for tumoral tissue is 1160 ng/mg. 2) There is no correlation between tissue and serologic CEA value. 3) The tissular level of CEA have a significant statistical correlation with Dukes stage (p < 0.003); other histological characteristics were no significative. 4) There are significant statistical correlations between serologic CEA and relapse but no with survival rates.1) Serologic CEA levels depend on numerous factors. 2) There aren't correlations between preoperative serologic levels and tissular CEA levels. 3) Tissular CEA do not predict what patients will have an elevated serologic CEA level in relapse.Postsurgical surveillance of colon cancer: preliminary cost analysis of physician examination, carcinoembryonic antigen testing, chest x-ray, and colonoscopy.This study is the first to examine the relative and absolute costs of physician examination, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assessment, chest x-ray, and colonoscopy in detecting recurrent disease in patients who have undergone surgical resection for primary colon carcinoma.Of the 1356 Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group patients in Intergroup Protocol 0089 who underwent surgical resection for Dukes' B2 and C colon carcinoma, 421 patients who developed recurrent disease were reviewed. Follow-up testing was performed according to protocol guidelines, with the cost of each test equal to 1995 Medicare reimbursement. Follow-up was defined as the time to recurrence for the 421 patients in whom disease recurred (mean 18.6 months) or up to 5 years for the additional 930 patients in whom disease did not recur (mean 38.6 months). Patients were divided into three categories: nonrecurrent, recurrent but not resectable, and recurrent but resectable with curative intent. The estimated mean cost of each test in detecting group 3 (recurrent but resectable) patients was calculated.Of the 421 patients who developed recurrent disease, 96 underwent surgical resection of their disease with curative intent (group 3). For group 3 patients, the first indication of recurrent disease was CEA testing (30), chest x-ray (12), colonoscopy (14), and other (40). Of the 40 "other" patients, 24 presented with symptoms. Routine physician examination, however, failed to identify a single resectable recurrence, and the total cost for physician examination was $418,615. The detection rate for CEA testing was 2.2%, the total cost was $170,880, and the cost per recurrence was $5,696. The detection rate for chest x-ray was 0.9%, the total cost was $120,934, and the cost per recurrence was $10,078. The detection rate of colonoscopy was 1%, the total cost was $641,344, and the cost per recurrence was $45,810.CEA measurement was the most cost-effective test in detecting potentially curable recurrent disease. Physician visits were useful only in the evaluation of symptoms; a routine physician examination had no added benefit.Value of postoperative surveillance after radical surgery for colorectal cancer: results of a cohort study.Early detection of recurrence after curative resection for primary colorectal cancer should improve patients' prognosis. However, the usefulness of postoperative surveillance programs has not been clarified yet. The present cohort study was aimed at assessing the effectiveness of systematic follow-up in patients with colorectal cancer who were operated on for cure, regarding both rate of tumor recurrence amenable to curative-intent surgery and rate of survival.One hundred ninety-nine colorectal cancer patients who underwent radical primary surgery were followed according a well-defined postoperative surveillance program, which consisted of laboratory studies (including serum carcinoembryonic antigen assay) every three months, physical examination and abdominal ultrasound or computed tomography every six months, and chest radiograph and total colonoscopy once per year. Cohorts were defined according to patients' compliance with the proposed follow-up program. A multivariate regression model was constructed to predict survival.One hundred forty patients were considered to be compliant with the surveillance program, whereas the remaining 59 patients occasionally attended follow-up investigations or did not comply at all. Although there were no differences in the overall recurrence rate (38 vs. 41 percent; P = 0.52), curative-intent reoperation was possible in 18 patients (34 percent) of those with tumor recurrence in the compliant cohort but in only 3 patients (12 percent) in the noncompliant cohort (P = 0.05). Similarly, the probability of survival was higher in the compliant cohort, both regarding overall (63 vs. 37 percent at 5 years; P < 0.001) and cancer-related (69 vs. 49 percent at 5 years; P < 0.02) rates. Cox regression analysis disclosed that only a more advanced TNM stage (odds ratio, 8.17; 95 percent confidence interval, 1.13-59.29) and noncompliance with the postoperative surveillance program (odds ratio, 2.32; 95 percent confidence interval, 1.50-3.60) had an independent negative impact on survival.Systematic postoperative surveillance in patients with colorectal cancer who were operated on for cure increases both the rate of tumor recurrence amenable to curative-intent surgery and rate of survival.CEA as a prognostic index in colorectal cancer.The carcinoembryonic antigen, CEA, is the tumor marker most used in colorectal patients, principally during follow up after radical surgery. High serum CEA level before surgery is often associated with worse prognosis, in some studies.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen levels (CEA) and the frequency of recurrence.Eighty-three patients with colorectal cancer at Dukes stages A, B or C were evaluated retrospectively. The patients follow up was at least two years or to death. CEA was determined in serum by enzyme immunoassay (Sorin Biomedica), normal value 0.5ng/ml.Disease recurrence was observed in 32 patients (38.5%), 13 Dukes B and 19 Dukes C. Seventy five per cent of the patients with CEA higher than 10ng/ml relapsed and 80% of the patients without recurrence had normal CEA. Disease recurrence in patients with preoperative elevated CEA occurred during the first year of follow up in 56% of the patients.Although the tumor stage is today the most valuable prognostic variable in colorectal cancer, the preoperative CEA value can provide some additional information in the prognosis of the patient.[Value of oncologic follow-up of patients operated for colorectal cancer. A prospective study of 1000 patients].The purpose of our prospective study was to evaluate the contribution of follow-up in resected colorectal cancer.One-thousand patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma who underwent radial resection from January 1975 to January 1990 were prospectively divided into two groups: the first group (n = 442, 42%) entered a 5-year follow-up protocol and the second group (n = 558, 56%) was free to make unscheduled visits in case of symptoms.Recurrence was found in 31.5% of the patients in the first group compared with 33% in the second group. Chorioembryonic antigen was the most accurate test detecting recurrence: 77% of the cases (97% for hepatic metastasis). Surgical resection of recurrent tumors was performed in 37% of the group 1 patients (curative resection in 15%) and in 9% (curative resection in 1.5%) of the group 2 patients (p < 0.001). 5-year survival after recurrence in group 1 was 11.5% versus 1% in group 2 (p < 0.01).These results emphasize the rational for a follow-up program in patients undergoing surgery for colorectal cancer.An evaluation of postoperative follow-up tests in colon cancer patients treated for cure.Currently patients with colon cancer who are potentially cured by surgery are followed periodically with physical examinations, blood tests and imaging studies to detect tumor recurrence early, on the presumption that intervention can effect outcome. There is little information to indicate whether frequent visits to the doctor's office or frequent testing improves survival or quality of life.Ninety-eight patients with resected stage B2, B3 or C (modified Astler-Coller) colon cancer who developed recurrent disease while enrolled in prospective adjuvant trials at Mayo Clinic sponsored by the North Central Cancer Treatment Group were studied to evaluate the utility of follow-up tests to detect the first recurrence of colon cancer and the outcome following various interventions for these recurrences. These patients had a history, physical examination, complete blood count, chemistry panel and chest x-ray approximately every 3-4 months in the 1st year and then every 6-12 months thereafter for a total of 5 years. Bowel evaluation was done at 6 months, 12 months and annually thereafter. In addition, a minority of patients had carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) testing, and radioisotope liver scans at various intervals.Symptoms signaled the diagnosis of recurrent disease in 55 patients, physical examination in 4 patients, and abnormalities in chest x-ray in 18 patients. An elevated CEA was the initial abnormal test in 5 patients, abnormal liver scans in 5 patients, elevated liver function tests in 6 patients and laparotomy for other reasons in 2 patients. Hemoglobin, barium enema, and fecal blood testing were useful in 1 patient each. Thirty-one percent of recurrences were diagnosed between scheduled visits. In our series, histories, physical examinations, and chest x-rays led to the detection of 79% of the recurrences while liver function tests, liver scans and CEAs led to the detection of 16% of recurrences. Sixteen patients underwent resection for cure for their first recurrence; the diagnosis of recurrence was signaled by symptoms in 6 patients, chest x-ray in 6 patients and abnormal liver function tests, CEA, hemoglobin, and laparotomy for colostomy closure in 1 patient each.The majority of tumor recurrences were detected by symptoms, physical examinations and chest x-rays. Testing for asymptomatic tumor recurrences during the 1st follow-up year is likely to be much less fruitful for detecting resectable recurrences than testing patients in the 2nd through 4th follow-up years. Patients who had a disease recurrence in the 1st postoperative year were less likely to be candidates for curative intent surgery. Lower tumor grade at initial diagnosis correlated both with likelihood of undergoing secondary surgical resection and the chance of doing well following this. These data may be helpful for defining more appropriate follow-up test for detection of tumor recurrence in patients with resected colon cancer.The miniscule benefit of serial carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring after effective curative treatment for primary colorectal cancer.Serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels have been recommended to detect asymptomatic recurrent colorectal cancer and to facilitate curative additional therapy. This study was designed to investigate the outcome of additional treatment for recurrent cancer in patients undergoing primary colorectal cancer treatment in a specialty center and subsequent relapsing with an elevation in serum CEA.Patients treated for their primary cancers at our institution whose followup included CEA monitoring and whose cancers subsequently recurred, were analyzed from a prospective database of almost 1,900 patients. CEA levels of > or = 5 ng/mL were considered elevated for purposes of treatment results. One hundred sixty-three patients were suitable for analysis. Median followup before and after recurrence was 14 months and 16 months, respectively.Fifty patients were able to undergo complete resection of their recurrence, and 26 of these patients are without evidence of recurrence at last followup. Two-thirds of recurrences were associated with an elevation of CEA; this elevation at recurrence was associated with decreased survival (p < 0.05, Kaplan Meier). Of the 109 patients with an elevation of CEA at recurrence, complete re-resection was accomplished in 26 patients. Of these, half remain cancer free. Of those with a normal CEA at recurrence, complete re-resection was feasible in 24 patients.Only 17% of patients with recurrent colorectal cancer undergoing potentially curative reresection have an elevated CEA. If we use the denominator of our patient population using an estimated relapse rate of 25-50%, the overall likelihood of CEA-directed curative re-resection confirms early estimates of less than a 5% survival advantage.Evaluation of serum carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring in the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients with metastatic lymph nodes and a normal preoperative serum level.The value of serial serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assay in the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients with metastatic lymph nodes and normal (< or = 5 ng/ml) preoperative CEA levels, was examined in this study. Thirty-eight patients were studied and compared with 22 patients with elevated CEA levels. The overall sensitivity of CEA for the diagnosis of recurrence was 36%. Postoperative CEA was strongly influenced by the site of recurrence. CEA monitoring showed the best results in patients who developed hepatic metastases (sensitivity 60%, specificity 94%, positive predictive value 60%, and negative predictive value 94%), and was ineffective for the detection of locoregional or pulmonary metastases. The results indicate that elevation of CEA in the postoperative course of these patients is an indicator of the presence of hepatic metastases. Postoperative CEA monitoring should not be omitted in Dukes C patients with normal preoperative levels, and is more reliable for the detection of liver metastases.Significance of postoperative serum level of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and actual half life of CEA in colorectal cancer patients.The postoperative levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and the actual half life (T1/2) of CEA were evaluated to ascertain their potency in predicting the recurrence of colorectal cancer after curative surgery in patients who had an abnormally high level of preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA, > or = 5 ng/ml). Ninety-four patients who underwent curative surgery were enrolled and 24 patients (25.5%) had recurrence during the follow-up period (median: 30 months, range: 2-69 months). T1/2 of CEA for all patients ranged from 1.2 days to 88.1 days, with a median of 4.4 days. T1/2 of CEA (mean +/- standard deviation) was 11.7 +/- 17.9 days in recurrent patients, whereas it was 6.2 +/- 4.9 days in patients without recurrence (p = 0.0224). The patients' age, gender, size of the tumor, location of the tumor, pre-, and postoperative CEA level, pathologic type of the tumor and Dukes stage had no significance in recurrence. The 1-year, 2-year, and 5-year disease-free survival rates were 95.1%, 81.1%, and 73.8% in patients with postoperative CEA levels less than 5 ng/ml (n = 62), respectively, and 71.4%, 64.8%, and 64.8% in patients with postoperative CEA levels higher than or equal to 5 ng/ml (n = 32), respectively (p = 0.04). Patients were divided into Group S (T1/2 of CEA < 4.4 days, n = 43) and Group L (T1/2 of CEA > or = 4.4 days, n = 51). The 1-year, 2-year, and 5-year disease-free survival rates were 95.3%, 85.1%, and 77.7% in Group S, respectively, and 80%, 67.5%, and 64.1% in Group L, respectively (p = 0.0261). In conclusion, the disease-free survival of colorectal cancer patients was prolonged in patients who had a short T1/2 of CEA or a low level of postoperative CEA. In high-risk colorectal cancer patients with an abnormally high level of preoperative CEA, recurrence may be predicted by checking an early postoperative CEA level and/or by a simple calculation of the actual half life of CEA.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring in curative surgery for recurrent colorectal carcinoma.This study is designed to review a carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA)-driven postoperative protocol designed to identify patients suitable for curative reresection when recurrent colorectal cancer is identified.A total of 285 patients who were operated on for colon or rectal carcinoma between 1981 and 1985 were evaluated (with CEA levels) every two months for the first two years, every three months for the third year, every six months for years 4 and 5, and annually thereafter. CEA levels above 5 microg were considered abnormal and were evaluated with diagnostic imaging and/or endoscopy.Follow-up was available for 280 patients (98.2 percent). Distribution of patients by Astler-Coller was: A, 14 percent; B1, 20 percent; B2, 39 percent; C1, 5 percent; C2, 21 percent. There were 62 of 280 patients (22 percent) who developed elevated CEA levels, with 44 patients who demonstrated clinical or radiographic evidence of recurrence. Eleven patients were selected for surgery with curative intent (4 hepatic resections, 1 pulmonary wedge resection, 2 abdominoperineal resections, 2 segmental bowel resections, and 2 cranial metastasectomies). Three of 11 patients (27 percent) benefited and have disease-free survivals greater than 60 months. Of the 223 patients without elevated CEA, 22 (9.9 percent) had recurrent cancer without any survivors. Overall, 3 of 285 patients (1.1 percent) were cured as a result of CEA follow-up.CEA-driven surgery is useful in selected patients and can produce long-term survivors.Surveillance of colorectal cancer: effectiveness of early detection of intraluminal recurrences on prognosis and survival of patients treated for cure.The authors evaluate the effectiveness of routine colonoscopy and marker evaluation in diagnosis of intraluminal recurrent cancer.Chart review was conducted on 481 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer between 1980 and 1990. Clinical visits were scheduled and carcinoembryonic antigen evaluation was performed every three months, and colonoscopy was performed preoperatively, 12 to 15 months after surgical treatment, and then with intervals of 12 to 24 months or when symptoms appeared.About 10 percent of patients developed intraluminal recurrences. More than one-half of metachronous lesions arose within the first 24 months, and median time to diagnosis was 25 months. Patients with left-sited tumors in the advanced stage had a higher risk of developing recurrent intraluminal disease. Twenty-nine patients underwent a second surgical operation, of which 17 cases were radical. In this group, the five-year survival was 70.6 percent, although no nonradically treated or nonresected patients survived longer than 31 months. Twenty-two patients were asymptomatic at time of diagnosis of recurrence, and of these, 12 patients underwent radical operation; on the other hand, of the 24 symptomatic patients, only 5 were treated radically. Carcinoembryonic antigen was the first sign of recurrence in eight cases. Colonoscopy must be performed within the first 12 to 15 months after operation, whereas an interval of 24 months between examinations seems sufficient to guarantee early detection of metachronous lesions.Serial tumor marker evaluation is of help in earlier diagnosis of local recurrences. Asymptomatic patients more frequently undergo another operation for cure and thus have a better survival rate.99Tcm-IMMU4 imaging in recurrent colorectal cancer: efficacy and impact on surgical management.The aims of this study were to evaluate the efficacy of scintigraphy with the 99Tcm-labelled anti-carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monoclonal antibody Fab' fragment (IMMU4) in the diagnosis of recurrent colorectal carcinoma and to investigate its usefulness in the intraoperative surgical management of patients undergoing re-operation because of a rising serum CEA. We evaluated 24 patients prospectively who had rising serum CEA 6-19 months after initial surgery for colorectal carcinoma. Ten patients had lesions confirmed by computed tomography, ultrasound, magnetic resonance imaging, endoscopic examination or barium enema. Fourteen patients had negative findings on one or more of the above studies, but were suspected of having occult disease from their rising serum CEA. All patients were scheduled for surgery for restaging during a "second look' procedure. Planar and single photon emission tomography (SPET) imaging was performed in all patients. All scintigraphic findings were correlated with surgical and histopathological results. The overall sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 81, 90 and 86% respectively when analysed by lesion, and 95, 60 and 88% respectively when analysed by patient. Ten of 14 (71%) patients with occult disease were correctly diagnosed as having recurrent disease. The SPET images were shown to have superior detectability (80%) compared with the planar images (35%). The surgeon judged the study to have had a neutral impact in 75% of the patients, but to have been helpful in 25%. We conclude that this antibody is potentially useful in detecting recurrent colorectal carcinoma in patients with rising serum CEA, especially when conventional imaging is negative or equivocal. It can also be helpful in altering planned surgery.[Follow up in carcinoma of the large intestine].A valid program of follow-up has always been a crucial point in the overall therapy of the colon-cancer. In this retrospective study, the authors have used as specimen 74 patients put under observation between the years 1987 and 1992. The patient have been followed throughout the diagnostic period with various methods. It has been the will of the authors, who have presented their protocol of reference, to put under comparison the various controlling methods in order to visualize their reliability, specificity and the indication of each one of them. The CEA is the most sensible haemanalysis for lifting the doubt of recidivation. As for the TAC and ultrasound it has been reserved the job of formulating a correct diagnosis; the results of both diagnostics through imagery have been more or less the same. However, the ultrasound examination have shown more false positives than the TAC. The research of the blood occult in the stool is a rapid and economic detection in the case of intramural recidivations, even if we cannot disregard the share of false positives. A high specificity for the study of intramural recidivations has been offered by the endoscopic scan particularly when associated by a brushing and biopsy.Serum tumor markers in colorectal cancer staging, grading, and follow-up.Early diagnosis of colorectal cancer, a frequent neoplasia in industrialized countries, permits curative surgery. In this study we assessed the clinical role of serum tumor markers determination in diagnosing, staging, and grading colorectal cancer; the role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), CA 19-9, tissue polypeptide antigen (TPA) and CA 72-4 in colorectal cancer follow-up was also assessed. In 114 patients with colorectal cancer, the oncofetal antigen CEA was compared with the membrane-associated glycoproteins CA 19-9, CA 242, and CA 72-4 and with the cytokeratins TPA, tissue polypeptide-specific antigen (TPS) and tissue polypeptide monoclonal antigen (TPM). Overall, the most sensitive indices were TPA and TPS (67% and 70%, respectively). Tumor stage influenced the levels of CEA, CA 19-9, and TPA, but not those of TPS, while tumor grade influenced CEA and TPS, but not CA 72-4, TPA, and TPM. TPA was the most sensitive index in identifying early or well-differentiated colorectal cancers. The sensitivity was enhanced when this marker was determined in combination with CEA, in diagnosing both advanced and early colorectal tumors. Seventy-seven patients were followed up after therapy for at least 18 months. CEA was the most sensitive index of recurrence (58%); however, this sensitivity is too low to consider tumor markers useful in colorectal cancer follow-up.Serum CA 242 and CEA detect different patients with recurrent colorectal cancer.The aim of this study was to investigate the clinical value of CA 242 and CEA in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer. Serial serum samples were available for analysis in 67 patients with subsequent recurrence, of which 36 patients had been treated for colonic and 31 patients for rectal cancer. Liver metastases were found in 32 patients, local recurrences in 18 patients, lung metastases in 11 patients and other distant metastases in 6 patients. The same serum samples were used in quantitating the serum levels of both CA 242 and CEA. At the time of clinical recurrence an elevated CA 242 level was found in 41 patients and an elevated CEA level in 49 patients. Thirty-six patients (54%) showed an elevation of both CA 242 and CEA, five patients (7%) had increased CA 242 alone and 13 patients (19%) increased CEA alone. Altogether, 54 patients (81%) showed an elevation of either or both markers at the time of clinical recurrence. Initially CA 242 alone began to rise in 14 patients (21%) and CEA alone in 16 patients (24%). The lead time was calculated from 28 patients that had four or more serum samples available during follow-up. CA 242 increased in median 5,7 months and CEA in median 3,4 months before clinical recurrence (p=0.34). CA 242 was more sensitive for lung metastases (64%) than CEA (45%), whereas CEA was superior to CA 242 in liver metastases (88% versus 72%, respectively) and in local recurrences (56% versus 39%, respectively). Both CA 242 and CEA seem to be useful in early diagnosis of a recurrence in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer.Second-look operation for recurrent colorectal cancer based on carcinoembryonic antigen and imaging techniques.The usefulness of postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring and improvements in imaging techniques have renewed enthusiasm for second-look operations (SLO) as the most effective treatment for recurrent colorectal cancer by reresection following early detection. The aim of our study is to evaluate the role of CEA and imaging techniques-directed SLO.Seven hundred fifty-six patients with Dukes Stages B and C, who had undergone curative resection, were monitored postoperatively using CEA and imaging techniques. An SLO was performed on any potentially resectable recurrence, and in addition, an SLO was done when a persistently rising CEA value was detected.Recurrence developed in 18.8 percent (142/756) of patients, and 90.8 percent (129/142) of the recurrences were detected within the first three years following curative resection. When comparing carcinomas of the colon with that of the rectum, the former were associated with significantly more hepatic and intraabdominal recurrences, whereas the latter had significantly more locoregional and pulmonary recurrences. Seventy-two patients underwent SLO. Of these patients, 54.2 percent (39/72) had all of their disease resected, and 1.4 percent (1/72) had no detectable disease at the SLO. Among the 142 patients with recurrence, 71 (50 percent) patients underwent SLO. The resectable group at SLO carried a significantly better survival than the unresectable recurrence group (41.3 vs. 5.2 percent; P<0.01).Complete removal of colorectal cancer recurrences by SLO, on the basis of postoperative, follow-up CEA and imaging technique findings, results in improved survival.Follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal carcinoma. Randomized comparison with no follow-up.This study investigated the value of intense follow-up compared with no follow-up after curative surgery of cancer in the colon or rectum.One hundred seven patients were randomized to no follow-up (control group; n = 54) or intense follow-up (follow-up group; n = 53) after surgery and early postoperative colonoscopy. Patients in the follow-up group were followed at frequent intervals with clinical examination, rigid proctosigmoidoscopy, colonoscopy, computed tomography of the pelvis (in patients operated with abdominoperineal resection), pulmonary x-ray, liver function tests, and determinations of carcinoembryonic antigen and fecal hemoglobin. Follow-up ranged from 5.5 to 8.8 years after primary surgery.Tumor recurred in 18 patients (33 percent) in the control group and in 17 patients (32 percent) in the follow-up group. Reresection with curative intent was performed in three patients in the control group and in five patients (four of whom were asymptomatic) in the follow-up group. In the follow-up group two asymptomatic patients with elevated carcinoembryonic antigen levels were disease-free three and five and one-half years after reresection and were the only patients apparently cured by reresection. No patient underwent surgery for metastatic disease in the liver or lungs. Symptomatic metachronous carcinoma was detected in one patient (control group) after three years. Five-year survival rate was 67 percent in the control group and 75 percent in the follow-up group (P > 0.05); the corresponding cancer-specific survival rates were 71 percent and 78 percent, respectively.Intense follow-up after resection of colorectal cancer did not prolong survival in this study.Usefulness of CEA, TPA, GICA, CA 72.4, and CA 195 in the Diagnosis of primary colorectal cancer and at its relapse.A protocol with tumor markers as guidelines to follow up colorectal cancer patients was designed using criteria other than those commonly reported. They included combination of several markers and their dynamic evaluation of three different levels of increase: isolated elevated value (IEV), constant level of elevation (CE), and progressive increase (PI). In a total of 90 patients, the levels of combined serum CEA-TPA and GICA were serially measured, and in 71 of them, CA 72.4 and CA 195 levels were also determined. The tumor markers were measured during the first few months after surgery, and the usefulness of combined CEA-TPA-GICA and other, possibly more favorable combinations was determined in relation to "early" detection of recurrence and development of metastases. In addition the usefulness of conventional radiologic examinations and the impact on patients survival following "early" diagnosis was evaluated. A positive correlation was found between elevated preoperative serum tumor marker levels and the stage of disease. The postoperative variation of high serum CEA values was useful in identifying micrometastases after primary tumor resection. In the "early" diagnosed 14 patients with recurrence during the postoperative follow-up period, the highest sensitivity was found for TPA (87%) and, of the marker combinations, TPA-GICA (93%) with a lead time of 4.6 +/- 5.6 and 5.4 +/- 7.8 months (mean +/- SD) respectively. In nonrelapsed patients, falsely positive results of TPA-GICA (25%) were fewer than those for TPA-CA 195 (31%) and TPA-GICA-CA72-4 (35%). However, TPA-CA 195 and TPA-GICA-CA72-4, based upon their high sensitivity in patients with metastases, seemed in keeping with the effectiveness of TPA-GICA for monitoring of postoperative patients with colorectal cancer. In patients who developed recurrences, PI was more frequently present than IEV. In patients without recurrence, the opposite occurred. CE had less frequently discriminatory capability between these two groups than IEV and PI. Routine radiographic studies were ineffective whereas liver echography with its high sensitivity revealed the first sign of recurrence. Eight (50%) of the 16 relapses (two patients relapsed twice) were suitable for surgery because only one organ with a single metastasis was involved. Three (75%) of the 4 patients with "early" diagnosis of recurrence are alive without evidence of disease 5, 18, and 20 months after the last surgery. The results of this study revealed the importance of "early" diagnosis of recurrence for improved survival of patients with colorectal cancer.Raised carcinoembryonic antigen level as an indicator of recurrent disease in follow up of patients with colorectal cancer.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen level is raised in 80% of patients undergoing colonic resection for cancer. Subsequent elevation in the follow-up period may precede signs and symptoms as an indicator of recurrent disease. there is little evidence that "classical" follow up of patients in the general surgical outpatient clinic improves either survival or quality of life. Regular carcinoembryonic antigen level estimation requested by the general practitioner, allied to day-case colonoscopic surveillance may be a more rational approach.A study was undertaken to investigate the relationship between raised carcinoembryonic antigen level and the recurrence of colorectal cancer in patients following a curative primary resection.Retrospective analysis was carried out on the notes of 125 patients who had attended a dedicated hospital colorectal follow-up clinic between 1988 and 1992. Carcinoembryonic antigen level data were obtained by subsequent examination of the University of Edinburgh Department of Clinical Chemistry (immunoassay section) carcinoembryonic antigen database.A single carcinoembryonic level result of more than 100 ul-1 (normal range less than 60 ul-1) was found to be a highly sensitive (87%), specific (89%), and accurate (88%) indicator of recurrent disease. Raised carcinoembryonic antigen level preceded symptoms in 72% of patients with recurrence of colorectal cancer.Sequential laboratory estimation of carcinoembryonic antigen level organized by the general practitioner may represent an accurate method of detecting recurrent colorectal disease. Hospital review could be limited to colonoscopic surveillance and restaging of patients referred with evidence of recurrent disease.Five-year follow-up after radical surgery for colorectal cancer. Results of a prospective randomized trial.To determine whether an intensified follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer can lead to improved reresectability and a better long-term survival.A prospective randomized trial of 106 patients.Oulu University Hospital, a referral center in northern Finland.A total of 106 consecutive patients who underwent radical resection for colorectal cancer, 54 of whom were randomized into a conventional follow-up group and 52 into an intensified follow-up group.After a 5-year follow-up, the time of detection of recurrence, the recurrence rates, the first method showing recurrence, the mode of recurrence, reresectability, and survival were compared between the groups.The recurrences were identified earlier in the intensified follow-up group than in the conventional follow-up group (mean +/- SD, 10 +/- 5 months vs 15 +/- 10 months). The overall recurrence rate was 41%, with 39% in the conventional group and 42% in the intensified group. Carcinoembryonic antigen determination was the most common method showing recurrence in both groups. Endoscopy and ultrasound were beneficial in the intensified follow-up group, but computed tomography failed to improve the diagnostics. The mode of recurrence did not differ between the groups. Radical resections were performed on 19% (8/43) of the patients, 14% (3/21) in the conventional group and 22% (5/22) in the intensified group. The cumulative 5-year survival was 54% in the conventional group and 59% in the intensified group.Earlier detection of recurrent colorectal cancer by intensified follow-up does not lead to either significantly increased reresectability or improved 5-year survival.Second look in colorectal surgery.Follow-up should identify metachronous colonic neoplasms and precancers, suture line recurrences, and isolated liver or pulmonary metastases. For some sites of failure the surgical re-resection and multimodal approaches increase disease-free survival and quality of life. The aim of our study was to evaluate the role of the different follow-up plans and the carcinoembryonic antigen directed second-look surgery.One hundred-sixty patients radically resected for Dukes B or C colorectal cancer were evaluated by a follow-up plan (plasma carcinoembryonic antigen every 2 months; echography every 6 months; chest x-ray every 12 months; and colonoscopy at 1 year and then every 3-5 years).Eighty-nine recurrences were detected (55.6 percent). In 72 recurrences plasma carcinoembryonic antigen elevation was present. Eight carcinoembryonic antigen directed second-look surgeries were performed: in four patients surgical evidence of recurrence was found (two isolated liver metastases were radically resected); two patients with no surgical evidence of recurrence developed a surrenalic isolated metastases and pelvic and hepatic recurrences; two patients had a five-year disease-free survival. In the 17 symptomatic patients with no carcinoembryonic antigen elevation diffuse disease was present, not resectable for cure. Four solitary liver metastases, one metachronous colonic neoplasm, and one suture line recurrence presented a five-year survival.The authors emphasize that carcinoembryonic antigen-directed second-look surgery is not acceptable for elevated costs. Intensive follow-up plans are superflous, while the monitoring of the carcinoembryonic antigen and instrumental restaging as an indicator of solitary liver metastases and mucosal lesions are very useful.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen in the management of colorectal cancer.The practical value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assay in the management of colorectal cancer after surgery is controversial. The value of CEA in the management of colorectal cancer was reviewed and discussed to justify the use of CEA assay in the management of colorectal cancer.A retrospective study was performed on 318 patients who underwent resection by one surgeon (JYW) between 1981 and 1986 and who were followed for a minimum of 5 years or until death.The incidence of preoperative CEA levels > 5 ng/ml in Dukes Stages A, B, C, and D were 0, 32, 48, and 79 percent, respectively. Five-year survival rates for groups with CEA levels < or = 5 ng/ml and > 5 ng/ml were 85 percent and 55 percent (P < 0.05), respectively, in Dukes Stage B patients and 64 percent and 37 percent (P < 0.05) in Stage C patients. The sensitivity and specificity of postoperative CEA monitoring in detecting recurrent diseases were 66 percent and 94 percent, respectively, for patients with a preoperative CEA value < or = 5 ng/ml and 97 percent and 88 percent for patients with a higher preoperative CEA value.CEA is still the best tumor marker available to be used as an independent prognostic factor and as a monitor for recurrence of disease after primary tumor resection.Pre- and postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen determinations in hepatic resection for colorectal metastases. Predictive value and implications for adjuvant treatment based on multivariate analysis.The object of this study was to evaluate the prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in the resectional treatment of colorectal hepatic metastases. The main question was whether postoperative CEA levels correlated with survival and the time to recurrence.Despite numerous investigations on prognostic factors in colorectal cancer, only sparse data are available to estimate the patient's individual risk for tumor recurrence postoperatively. It is controversial whether preoperative CEA values are of prognostic significance, and after observing the kinetics of CEA decline, elevated CEA levels postoperatively were found to be an ominous sign. CEA therefore could indicate the presence of a tumor burden after resection.One hundred sixty-six patients undergoing hepatic resection for colorectal metastases with curative intent were prospectively documented and underwent multivariate analysis for indicators of prognosis.Abnormal preoperative CEA levels were not of prognostic significance compared with values within the normal range (survival, 36 vs. 30 months; p = 0.12; disease-free survival, 12 vs. 10 months; p = 0.82). The postoperative serum CEA level, however, was the most predictive factor with regard to survival and the disease-free interval. Patients in whom CEA levels were abnormal before surgery and returned into the normal range after resection had significantly better survival times (37 vs. 23 months, p = 0.0001) and disease-free survival times (12 vs. 6.2 months, p = 0.0001) compared with patients with persistently abnormal values.Pre- and postoperative determination of the serum CEA level is mandatory to judge whether a curative resection has been performed and whether tumor has been left behind after the operation. Postoperative CEA levels also should be used as a stratification criterion in adjuvant treatment studies after hepatic resection to indicate patients with a high risk of tumor recurrence.The role of CA-242 and CEA in surveillance following curative resection for colorectal cancer.This study was undertaken to evaluate the role of a new tumour marker, CA-242, alone or in combination with CEA in the practical management of colorectal cancer patients after potentially curative resection. A cohort of 149 patients who had undergone 'curative' surgery was followed up according to an intensive protocol in order to detect recurrent disease. Over a median tumour marker follow-up period of 24 months there were 25 recurrences in 24 patients. Both CEA and CA-242 alone detected half the local recurrences. The sensitivity of CEA was 84% for distant or mixed recurrence compared with 64% for CA-242. An abnormality of either CEA or CA-242 enabled detection of five out of six local recurrences and 17 out of 19 distant or mixed recurrences with a median lead time of 5 months for each marker. Both markers were elevated concurrently in only one local and 11 distant recurrences. While CA-242 alone is not superior to CEA, their combined use (either abnormal) has a high sensitivity (88%), specificity (78%) and negative predictive value (97%); this may be useful in reducing unnecessary investigations in follow-up programmes and as a guide to the initiation of further treatment for recurrent disease.The value of serum carcinoembryonic antigen in predicting recurrent disease following curative resection of colorectal cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) estimations are used to facilitate early diagnosis of recurrent disease after treatment for colorectal cancer.This study was designed to determine the natural history of patients with normal and abnormal levels of CEA.Patients undergoing potential curative resection of colorectal tumors (Dukes Stage A-C) entered a prospective, randomized trial comparing two follow-up regimens (to be reported separately) had CEA levels measured every 3 months for two years; then every 6 months for the next three years. In the study protocol, a rise in CEA was not an indication for investigation to determine recurrence unless there was also other evidence of recurrent disease.Three hundred eleven patients were followed for a median of 4.5 (range, 2-5) years. Recurrent disease developed in 98 (32 percent) patients, 57 of whom had an elevated CEA (sensitivity 58 percent), with a median lead time of six (range, 1-30) months from first abnormal CEA to diagnosis of recurrent disease by other means. The specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of CEA as an indicator of subsequent recurrent disease was 93 percent, 79 percent, and 83 percent, respectively. The sensitivity of CEA for predicting hepatic metastases was 80 percent, with a median lead time of eight (range, 1-30) months, compared with only 46 percent for sites of recurrent disease other than the liver.CEA was the first indicator of recurrent disease in 58 percent of all patients and in 80 percent of patients with liver metastases. The diagnosis of recurrent disease may be made several months earlier by investigating the first abnormal CEA level, although any benefit in terms of survival remains to be proven.Clinical value of whole-body positron emission tomography with [18F]fluorodeoxyglucose in recurrent colorectal cancer.To assess the clinical value of whole-body positron emission tomography (PET) with [18F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) in recurrent colorectal cancer, 35 patients were studied: 15 had resectable liver metastases, one a resectable lung metastasis, eight resectable pelvic recurrence, eight a presacral mass with equivocal findings on imaging, and three increasing serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) without clinical or radiological signs of recurrent disease. PET affected management decisions in seven of 16 patients with metastatic disease. In one of eight patients with pelvic recurrence demonstrated by computed tomography (CT), PET detected unknown pulmonary metastases. In five of eight presacral masses with equivocal CT findings, PET was correct and unexpected distant metastases were detected in one of these patients. In two of three patients with increasing CEA levels and normal pelvic CT findings, pelvic recurrence was identified. Overall, whole-body PET affected management in 14 patients. PET is a valuable tool for staging local recurrence and metastatic disease.Modelling of serial carcinoembryonic antigen changes in colorectal cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) is a tumour marker mainly used for detection of recurrent colorectal cancer. CEA series in 295 patients, who had a macroscopic radical resection of a primary colorectal cancer were studied. A kinetic model was fitted to CEA series of individual patients. Applying the kinetic model recurrences were identified with a sensitivity of 70-80% and specificity of 80-90%. Simulations were performed in order to find the optimal sampling strategy for CEA during follow-up. Simulations showed that CEA determinations at a few weeks interval between would be optimal for early detection of recurrences.Usefulness of carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring despite normal preoperative values in node-positive colon cancer patients.The aim of our study was to determine to what extent serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring is helpful in detecting colorectal cancer recurrence in patients if their preoperative serum CEA is normal. Additional major objectives of this study were to correlate CEA immunohistochemical features of the primary tumor with serum CEA levels at the time of tumor recurrence in node-positive colorectal cancer patients with low preoperative CEA values.One hundred fourteen node-positive colorectal cancer patients with preoperative serum CEA levels of < 5.0 ng/ml undergoing clinically curative operations were studied. Primary tumors were evaluated for tissue CEA using the same monoclonal antibody as used for serum CEA determinations utilizing the avidin-biotin-peroxidase immunohistochemical technique.The exact preoperative serum CEA value did not correlate with tumor grade, immunohistochemical CEA intensity or pattern. In the 32 patients who developed recurrent cancer, the serum CEA at recurrence was greater than 5 ng/ml in 44 percent. All such patients had CEA present in their primary tumor. There was no correlation with the exact preoperative serum CEA, the intensity of the primary tissue CEA, or the localization of such CEA and subsequent serum elevation at recurrence.Serum CEA is a useful marker in the detection of recurrent colorectal cancer despite normal preoperative values.Role of CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 in the early detection of localized and diffuse recurrent rectal cancer.Sixty-six consecutive patients who underwent curative resection for rectal cancer were studied prospectively to evaluate the roles of sequential carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), tissue plasminogen activator (TPA), and carcinomatous antigen 19-9 (Ca 19-9) determinations in the early diagnosis of resectable recurrences. Thirty-three recurrences were detected between 6 and 42 months. CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 showed a sensitivity of 72.7 percent, 78.8 percent, and 60.1 percent, respectively, and a specificity of 60.6 percent, 60.6 percent, and 87.9 percent, respectively. In 23 cases the rise in the value of CEA and/or TPA and/or Ca 19-9 was the first sign of recurrences, and the diagnosis was established later by clinical methods. In this group, the lead time was two months for liver metastases and four months for disseminated metastases. As far as the relationship between localization of recurrence and marker level increase is concerned, of 16 hepatic metastases CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 showed a sensitivity of 94 percent (P less than 0.05), 69 percent, and 62 percent, respectively. Of six patients with local recurrences, CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 showed a sensitivity of 50 percent, 100 percent (P less than 0.05), and 83.3 percent, respectively. Of three patients with peritoneal carcinomatosis, CEA, TPA (P less than 0.05), and Ca 19-9 showed a sensitivity of 0 percent, 100 percent, and 0 percent, respectively. No significant differences were reported among the three markers according to multiple metastases and metachronous polyps. Fourteen patients (42.4 percent) underwent surgical treatment for recurrent disease, and eight of them (57 percent) showed a resectable disease, for a total resectability rate of 24.2 percent. The findings of our study indicate that a follow-up program based on CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 assays is related to an early diagnosis and a good resectability rate for both local and metastatic recurrences from rectal cancer.[Clinical evaluation of four tumor markers (CEA, TPA, CA50 and CA72-4) in colorectal cancer].In a total of 194 cases, consisting of 86 cases of colorectal cancer undergone operation later, 7 cases of non resectable cancer, 34 cases of recurrence, 43 cases of NED (no evidence of a recurrence after radical surgery for colorectal cancer) and 24 cases of benign colorectal disease, serum CEA, TPA, CA50 and CA72-4 levels were determined. The positivity rate was high for all four markers in stage V cases among 86 cases of colorectal cancer, and in cases of non resectable cancer and cases of recurrence. The highest positive rate was obtained with CEA. On the contrary, in cases of stage I to IV the positivity rates of these four tumor markers were as low as 0 to 34.8%. Out of 127 cases of colorectal cancer excluded of 43 NED cases, 52 cases were negative for all four tumor markers and 14 cases were positive only for CEA. In 49 cases, CEA and at least one of the other three tumor markers gave positive results. In 12 cases, CEA gave negative results and at least one of the other three tumor markers positive results. In conclusion, measurement of blood levels of these tumor markers is limited of its usefulness in early diagnosis of colorectal cancer. However, in the diagnosis of advanced stage and of recurrence during the postoperative follow-up period the measurement of tumor markers provides useful information. CEA is most sensitive among the four tumor markers tested and any combination of these four markers is not advantageous because of an increase in false positivity rate.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen in relation to survival, DNA ploidy pattern, and recurrent disease in 406 colorectal carcinoma patients.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in relation to survival, flow cytometric DNA ploidy pattern, Dukes stage, and recurrent disease was prospectively evaluated in 406 patients with colorectal carcinoma. In 246 patients (61%) the carcinomas were DNA aneuploid. Increased preoperative CEA levels (> 5 micrograms/l) were found in 151 of 363 evaluable patients (42%). Dukes stage-B patients with preoperative CEA elevation showed significantly poorer prognosis than those with normal CEA values (p = 0.001). A weak but significant correlation was found between preoperative CEA level and Dukes stage (Kendall's tau = 0.25, p < 0.01). Of 50 evaluable patients with clinical recurrence and postoperative normal or normalized CEA levels, 28 (56%) had a rise in CEA before or at the time of clinical recurrence. The sensitivity of the CEA test for primary and for recurrent disease was not significantly different in the DNA aneuploid and the DNA near-diploid groups.The role of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the management of patients with colorectal carcinoma: the experience of the Istituto Tumori of Milan.CEA determination has attained an important role in the clinical management of patients with tumors of the colorectal tract. In this paper the experience of the Istituto Tumori of Milan is reviewed and the results are discussed. Three hundred and thirty-six patients were followed after curative resection of colorectal carcinoma. The follow-up period was 15 years, from January 1975 to December 1990 (global follow-up 1358 years). In the course of follow-up 136 patients developed recurrent disease. The number of CEA determinations for each patient ranged from 1 to 37 (mean 8, total 3330). CEA levels of presurgical patients were related to the clinical stage. Among patients who developed recurrences 61% showed an increase in CEA serum levels. In 200 patients with a negative follow-up we observed only 15 cases of false-positive results.Comparison of plasma prolactin and CEA in monitoring patients with adenocarcinoma of colon and rectum.Plasma prolactin (PRL) and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) were measured by radioimmunoassay in 74 patients with adenocarcinoma of colon and rectum. The markers were correlated with disease stage, histological grade and progression/remission of disease. The circulating preoperative median PRL and CEA levels were significantly higher in colorectal cancer patients than in their respective controls. PRL was elevated in all Dukes stages and in all histological grades of the tumour whereas the rise in CEA was more pronounced in Dukes D. Out of 74 patients, 29% (21/74) developed recurrent disease and 31% (23/74) responded to the treatment. With regard to monitoring recurrence(s), the predictive value of PRL was 94% which was significantly greater than that of CEA which was only 62%. In patients who developed liver metastases PRL remained elevated whereas CEA showed more than 100-fold increase. Therefore, we feel that CEA is a better marker for monitoring patients who developed liver metastases. From our results, we suggest that PRL can be used as a better overall marker for detecting recurrence(s) in patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma.[Evaluation of combined CA-19-9 and CEA assay in monitoring recurrences and metastases of colorectal cancer].The results of combined CA-19-9 CEA assay were measured in 216 cases of colorectal cancer. In 28 preoperative patients, the positive rate 16.67% in Dukes' A group, 25% in B, 55% in C and 40% in D. It was proved less valuable in early diagnosis. The positive CA-19-9 alone in 66 with relapsed or metastases out of 182 undergoing radical resection was 63.63%, CEA alone 62.12%, and combined assay 86.36%. The false positive rate of CA-19-9 and CEA was 6.03% and combined assay 11.21%. In 27 palliative resections CA-19-9 in 40.74% cases, CEA in 44.44%, and combined assay in 59.2% was positive. In cases of nonresectable tumors, the positive rate was 66.7%, 66.7% and 83.33%, respectively. There was no definite correlation between the value of CA-19-9 and CEA. The data showed significantly higher sensitivity in combined assay than in either CA-19-9 or CEA alone. Combined assay with the sensitivity of 86.36% and the specificity of 88.79%, was more useful in finding of postoperative. recurrences or metastases. We suggest that this method should be used routinely in monitoring postoperative patients with colorectal cancer.Value of follow-up in the management of recurrent colorectal cancer.The purpose of this article was to study the effectiveness of a prospective follow-up programme in patients after curative surgery for colorectal cancer. Of the initial 151 selected patients, 61 (40%) developed a recurrence in whom only six cases (10%) of potentially curable recurrent lesions were detected. The first clues to recurrence in the 61 patients were history or physical examination in 49%, a rising CEA in 29% and a positive imaging finding in 10%, being difficult to decide which test first signalled a recurrent cancer in an additional 11%. Endoscopy and CEA determinations were the most rewarding investigations. CEA was a sensitive means of identifying disseminated recurrent disease and liver metastases compared with liver function tests or liver ultrasound every 3 months. Endoscopy was useful in the diagnosis of local recurrences. However no follow-up test was capable of detecting recurrent colorectal cancer when it might still have been curable. As a direct result of this follow-up programme 15 patients (23%) underwent re-exploration. No symptomatic patients were candidates for curative re-operation. Of the asymptomatic patients six (four colonic and two rectal cancers) (19.5%) were re-resected for cure. Only three of these were alive and without evidence of disease, 40, 43 and 69 months later so that long term survivors after curative re-resection represent only 5% of all patients with recurrences (7.2% of the recurrent colonic cancer and 3% of the rectal cancer). Our follow-up programme did not permit us to alter the incidence of disseminated recurrent disease, and the effectiveness of the curative re-resection represents an increase of only 1.3% in the global 5-year survival rates for colorectal cancer. Our study does not demonstrate any great value of 'classical' postoperative follow-up programme.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen and liver function tests in the detection of recurrent colorectal carcinoma.The optimal laboratory evaluation for the early detection of liver metastases from colorectal cancer is controversial. This investigation was undertaken to compare the efficacy of liver function tests (LFTs) with that of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels for the early detection of liver metastases. Patients who developed liver metastases after potentially curative resections of adenocarcinoma of the colorectum between 1974 and 1988 were reviewed. The following laboratory tests were serially evaluated during the follow-up period: CEA, alkaline phosphatase (AP), serum glutamic oxaloacetic transaminase (SGOT), serum glutamic pyruvic transaminase (SGPT), and lactic dehydrogenase (LDH). These values were retrospectively assessed from the time of documented liver metastases to identify which lab value(s) were elevated initially. Ninety-two patients were available for study. Average time for the occurrence of liver metastases was 20 months (range, 3-72 months). The incidence of elevation of individual tests at the time of suspicion of liver metastasis was: CEA, 94.6 percent (P less than 0.25, chi-squared); AP, 18.5 percent; SGOT, 12.0 percent; SGPT, 5.4 percent; and LDH, 29.3 percent. When comparing CEA with a battery of LFTs at the time of suspicion of liver metastasis, CEA was elevated with normal LFTs in 64.1 percent (P less than 0.05, chi-squared), the most frequent occurrence. At least one LFT was elevated with a normal CEA in only 2.2 percent; CEA and at least one LFT were increased in 30.4 percent; and both tests were normal in only 3.3 percent. These results indicate that, of the individual laboratory tests performed, CEA elevation heralds liver metastases significantly more frequently. LDH is the liver function test most frequently elevated when liver metastases are first suspected. When CEA is directly compared with a battery of LFTs, CEA is statistically significantly more frequently elevated. In fact, suspicion of liver metastases would have been delayed by the omission of LFTs in only 2.2 percent of patients. Therefore, we conclude that LFTs should be deleted from the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients, decreasing costs without significantly decreasing accuracy.Re-operation for recurrent colorectal cancer: the importance of early diagnosis for resectability and survival.Between 1978 and 1986, 179 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer were treated and 137 patients were operated a second time.82.1% of the patients showed elevated CEA levels (greater than or equal to 5 ng/ml) at the time of diagnosis. In 58.1% of the patients the CEA increase preceded the recognition of recurrence, and in 13.4% the diagnosis could be confirmed only by a second-look operation. In 46.7% of the re-operated patients a potentially curative resection of the locally recurrent or metastatic disease could be performed. The resectability was significantly lower in patients with symptomatic recurrent disease (34.5%) as compared to asymptomatic patients with CEA-directed positive imaging (52.7%) and the second-look patients (62.5%) respectively. A significant improvement in survival could be achieved especially in the second-look operated patients.Postoperative surveillance of patients with carcinoma of the colon and rectum.The early detection and management of recurrence following curative resection for colorectal carcinoma can prolong survival. However, at the present time there is no consensus on the appropriate follow-up protocol for such patients. This investigation was undertaken to determine which tests and procedures are most useful in detecting recurrence and the frequency with which they should be employed. Another purpose of this study was to identify those patients at high risk for recurrence. Sixty-five patients who underwent curative resection of adenocarcinoma of the colon and rectum were followed for at least two years or until recurrence. Thirty were classified as Duke's A carcinoma of the colon, 18 were Duke's B, and 17 were Duke's C. Mean follow-up was 44.9 months. The follow-up regimen consisted of clinical exam, liver function tests, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level, and chest x-ray every three months for the first two years postoperatively and every six months thereafter, and colonoscopy or barium enema and proctoscopy every six months for the first two years postoperatively and every year thereafter. Seventeen patients (26%) had a recurrence; 24% per cent of these developed within one year, 65 per cent developed within two years, 82 per cent developed within three years, and 94 per cent developed within four years of resection. Recurrence was detected by CEA in eight patients, chest x-ray in five, endoscopy in three, and laparotomy for small-bowel obstruction in one patient.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Is ultrasound superior to carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement in recurrent tumor screening of patients with colorectal carcinoma?Assuming that in the postoperative recurrent tumor screening CEA levels are as important as imaging techniques in elucidating the spread or the recurrence of a tumor, we examined 61 patients with colonic carcinoma. Those patients were operated curatively and were regularly controlled by clinical examination, laboratory, sonographic, endoscopic or radiological methods. In 3 patients there was a local recurrent, in 3 other patients there was a local recurrent and metastases. 8 patients showed sonographic livermetastases only, proved by computed tomography. In 6 patients CEA-levels rose. In 2 patients with sonographically confirmed metastases of the liver, there were neither clinical nor laboratory hints for metastases and the CEA-levels were normal. No one had elevated CEA-levels before detecting metastases. Our results indicate that ultrasound of the liver can detect metastases of colonic tumors earlier than clinical or laboratory sings do. Because of its greater diagnostic security, ultrasound is superior to CEA-measurement in recurrent tumor screening.Radioimmunoguided surgery in recurrent colorectal cancer: the role of carcinoembryonic antigen, computerized tomography, and physical examination.From January 1986 to December 1987, 32 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer had second-look radioimmunoguided surgery (RIGS system). All patients had pathologic confirmation of recurrence. The RIGS system identified 81% of recurrences, and in six patients recurrent tumor was identified only by RIGS. All patients had physical examination, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assay, and computerized tomography of the abdomen and pelvis. Detection of recurrence was based on symptoms in six, elevated CEA value in 25, and physical examination in one. The CEA was elevated preoperatively in 30 patients; two false-negative results occurred in symptomatic patients who had pelvic recurrence. The median CEA value in those with liver recurrence was 30 ng/ml (range 5.2 to 298) and for pelvic recurrence 13 ng/ml (range 1.9 to 31) (P less than .05). The overall sensitivity of CT was 41% (abdomen other than liver 37%, liver 56%, and pelvis 22%). The combination of elevated CEA, symptoms, and physical findings identified 100% of recurrences. We conclude that a rising CEA remains the most accurate indicator of recurrence. CT should not be done routinely to detect recurrent colorectal cancer unless CEA is elevated or the patient is symptomatic. In our study the intraoperative use of the RIGS system aided the surgeon in identifying occult tumors.The value of a follow-up programme after radical surgery for colorectal carcinoma.To evaluate the effectiveness of a follow-up programme after curative surgery for colorectal carcinoma, a 10-year series of 402 patients was surveyed for the detection rate of potentially curative recurrences and metachronous neoplasms. There were 120 recurrences (30%), and 100 of them (83%) were detected at scheduled check ups. Initial suspicion of recurrence was most often based on physical examination, carcinoembryonic antigen assay, or sigmoidoscopy. Reoperation was undertaken in 62 patients, in 26 cases (22%) for cure. The 5-year survival was 48% after curative reoperations. Metachronous adenomas and carcinomas occurred in 38 and 11 patients, respectively, giving corresponding cumulative 5-year incidences of 13% and 3.8%. Altogether, 37 patients (9.2%) had a curative reoperation for recurrent or metachronous carcinoma, and a further 38 patients (9.5%) had adenomas removed by polypectomy. It is concluded that regular follow-up is useful for the patients, and the follow-up schedule must be planned to detect both early recurrences and metachronous neoplasms.CEA directed second-look surgery for colon and rectal cancer.[Clinical significance of serum CEA determination in the diagnosis of colo-rectal cancer].Serum CEA levels of 581 specimens obtained from 350 colo-rectal cancer patients and 61 specimens from 54 non-tumor subjects were determined by sandwich method of CEA-EIA McAb kit supplied by the Beijing Institute of Biological Products. In patients with primary colo-rectal cancer, the serum CEA level was 15.0 +/- 52.1 ng/ml and 37.9% of patients gave a CEA level greater than 5 ng/ml. In recurrent colo-rectal cancer patients, serum CEA increased to 124.2 +/- 454.8 ng/ml with a positive rate of 78.0%. Both the CEA value and the positive rate of patients in clinically tumor-free period after surgery were 2.9 +/- 2.2 ng/ml and 16.5%, respectively. Serial follow-up CEA assays in selected cases were helpful to reflect the clinical status. Generally, CEA is useful to predict prognosis and to guide follow-up management.[Colorectal cancer: follow-up after curative resection].From Jan 1978 to Dec 1984, 128 patients had a curative resection of colorectal carcinoma. A program for early detection and surgical correction of recurrences was initiated in 88 patients with a mean age of 61 years (range 24 to 85). Seventy two patients complied with the program involving clinical examination, chest X-ray, alkaline phosphatase and CEA determinations and endoscopy at 6 month intervals. Mean follow up was 36 months (range 6 to 60). A total of 28 recurrences (32%) were detected: 4 local, 17 distant and 7 local and distant. Recurrences occurred in 46% of grade C, 19% of grade B and 0% of grade A lesions. Sixty eight% of recurrences were detected within 12 months and 93% within 36 months after surgery. Recurrences were detected by clinical examination in 71% of cases. CEA determination was sensitive (81% and specific (92%) for detection of recurrences in the remaining patients. Four patients (14%) were reoperated on with a survival of 3 to 26 months, all dying from disseminated disease. We conclude that this program did not help to improve the 5 year survival rate of colorectal carcinoma submitted to curative resection. CEA determination may be indicated at 2 month intervals during the period of increased recurrence risk.[A comparative evaluation of methods for diagnosing recurrence of rectal cancer after radical surgery].As a result of a study of 173 cases of rectal cancer, applicability of bleomycin-111indium for diagnosis of tumor recurrences was shown. Assays of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a separate diagnostic procedure proved inadequate due to their low sensitivity (42.1%). Since the effectiveness of ultrasonography application in diagnosing rectal cancer was as high as 91%, it should be recommended for follow-up of radically operated patients.Recurrence of colorectal cancer after hepatic resection.Survival estimates of 95, 65, and 49 percent at 1, 3, and 5 years, respectively, after hepatic resection in 77 patients when all gross metastatic cancer was removed compare favorably with the series of Wagner et al [20] of untreated, apparently comparable patients. In the present series, recurrent disease was evident after hepatic resection, most commonly in the lungs; the liver; and locally, in that order. About half of the 45 patients with a second recurrence were operated on, and the recurrence was completely removed in roughly half of these patients. A median survival estimate of 31 months (range 1 to 67 months) after complete removal of the second recurrence was better than the survival estimate of 14 months (range 1 to 18 months) for those in whom the recurrence could not be removed (p less than 0.01). An elevated carcinoembryonic antigen level as the only indicator of recurrence after hepatic resection has proved to be an ominous prognostic sign.Reoperation directed by carcinoembryonic antigen level: the importance of a thorough preoperative evaluation.Many asymptomatic patients suspected to have recurrent colorectal cancer based on an elevated carcinoembryonic antigen level will be spared unnecessary operation if strict attention is paid to their preoperative evaluation. Liver and renal function should be assessed. Unresectable extraabdominal and intraabdominal recurrence or metastases should be excluded. Patients being evaluated for recurrence after curative resection of a rectosigmoid cancer should undergo a bone scan. Having satisfactorily ensured normal results for these investigations, the surgeon should then proceed to search for an intraabdominal source of tumor recurrence.[Effect of serial CEA determination on diagnosis, therapy and prognosis of recurrent colorectal cancer].A rising CEA level did not indicate an early tumour recurrence in the follow-up of 660 patients with curative surgery because of colorectal carcinoma. In case of rectal carcinoma the first rise of the tumour marker preceded diagnosis of recurrence by other means 7.9 months on an average, in case of colonic carcinoma 5.1 months. The long-term survival after secondary procedure was 17.5% for patients with normal CEA value at time of reoperation and surmounted life expectancy of patients with rising tumour-marker level significantly (5.9%). The worst prognosis was found for the collective with rising CEA before diagnosis of relapse by other means, none of whom was saved by reoperation. The resectability rate of metastases was higher than that of local recurrences with nearly identical survival for both groups. Because of the long CEA lead times advances in therapy by second-look procedures are to be expected mainly for patients with pelvic recurrences after abdominoperineal extirpation.[Clinical evaluation of a combination assay of CEA, CA-19-9 and TPA in patients with colorectal cancer].The effectiveness of serum CEA (56 cases), CA-19-9 (53 cases) and TPA (48 cases) in patients with colorectal cancer has been evaluated. The preoperative sensitivity and specificity of CEA and CA 19-9 were found to be almost the same in level but the level of TPA was low. In 20 cases recurrent, the sensitivity of the marker was 66.7% in the liver, 60% in the lung, and 66.7% in the local recurrence of primary foci. In these recurrent cases, serum CEA in initially elevated to 65%, CA 19-9 to 25%, and TPA to only 10%. In diagnostic rate imaging or in our clinical findings, however, the frequency was almost the same as tumor markers.Variation in recognition of recurrent colonic cancer by different CEA assays.Forty-six patients were followed with serial CEA determinations by two CEA assays after curative resection of a primary or recurrent colonic cancer. Thirteen have had a histologically proven recurrence, of which only six (46 percent) were predicted by both assays, while seven (54 percent) were predicted by one assay only. The assays appear complementary in indicating tumor recurrence, and preliminary findings suggest that it may be beneficial to follow patients with more than one CEA assay after resection of a primary or recurrent colonic cancer.[CEA determination in the follow-up of colorectal cancers].CEA follow-up checks of 135 patients with colorectal carcinoma are described in a retrospective analysis. Unambiguous correlations were found to exist between clinical tumour staging and CEA findings in the context of both primary findings and recurrences and metastasation. Typical courses are described of 107 patients who received curative treatment. An assessment is made of the value of CEA determination in postoperative follow-up.[The value of follow-up studies after surgery of carcinoma of the large intestine].Follow-up of colorectal cancer resected for cure. An experience with CEA, TPA, Ca 19-9 analysis and second-look surgery.Sixty-four consecutive patients who had undergone curative resection for colorectal carcinoma were studied prospectively to evaluate the roles of sequential CEA determinations and independent instrumental follow-up in the early detection of resectable recurrences. Fifty-two of these patients also were submitted to sequential determinations of other tumor antigens: TPA (tissue polypeptide antigen) and Ca 19-9 (colon cancer antigen detected with a monoclonal antibody), for a retrospective evaluation of their utility as markers of recurrent tumors. Twenty-two recurrences were detected in a period ranging from 12 to 72 months (median, 47 months). CEA was the best predictor of recurrence (sensitivity, 90 percent) when compared with the other two markers (TPA sensitivity, 60 percent; Ca 19-9 sensitivity, 20 percent). When compared with the instrumental or biochemical examinations of the follow-up, CEA was still the most sensitive indicator of relapse although the specificity was quite low (78 percent) if minimal significative increases were considered. History and physical examination were more useful than CEA in detecting local recurrences in rectal cancer where the preoperative CEA level was low. A few second-look explorations based solely on small CEA increases failed to demonstrate recurrence or revealed peritoneal carcinomatosis. Selected second-look surgery based on demonstrated recurrences resulted in a resectability rate of 57 percent. A follow-up program based on frequent CEA assays, history, and physical examinations, including rectal, vaginal, and perineal exploration, is proposed. Extensive instrumental investigations should follow when a minimal significative CEA rise is observed, or when history and physical examinations suggest a possible recurrence. Second-look surgery should be evaluated after confirmed or highly suspected diagnosis of recurrence, on the basis of instrumental or clinical examinations.[Value of CT following surgery for rectal cancer (a prospective study)].The results of computed tomography of 48 patients after operation on rectal carcinoma who underwent close-meshed computer tomographic examinations are given in a prospective study. (First examination 6 weeks after operation, further examinations at intervals of 3 months, mean observation time: 12 months). The results of follow-up by means of computer tomographic examination are compared with clinical examinations and control of CEA levels. The use of computer tomographic examination resulted in 43 confirmed negative, 3 confirmed positive and 2 false negative findings (including cases with CT-aided fine needle biopsy). These results give an accuracy of 96% and thus exceed clinical examination and controls of CEA-level. How far early diagnosis of local recurrence of rectal cancer influences survival time, can be answered after completion of this study in the next few years.[The doubling time of circulating CEA as an individual prognostic criterion of recurrence in patients with gastrointestinal cancers].In a prospective study of 928 patients with gastrointestinal cancer registered for primary resection, the postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) time courses were analysed in connection with disease recurrence. Only patients with established diagnosis of disease recurrence and complete follow-up to death entered the evaluation of prognostic criteria of the CEA time course. In this group the CEA time courses of 103/201 patients with recurrent disease exhibited an exponential increase of the serum CEA concentration, i.e. a linear relationship of log CEA and time, which allowed the calculation of the CEA doubling time. All 103 patients developed metastatic spread and generally exhibited CEA doubling times ranging between 10 and 158 days, in patients developing peritoneal carcinosis up to 343 days. The individual CEA doubling times of patients with recurrent disease who received no treatment (n = 71) correlated well with the times of individual survival after the initial CEA increase of the log CEA phase (rs = 0.812; P less than 0.001) thus confirming the results of a previous retrospective study. When the survival time is expressed in multiples of the individual CEA doubling time (IDT), no patient survived longer than 10.8 IDT. The median value of survival was 5.4 IDT. Patients with metastatic spread who underwent various treatments of recurrent disease (n = 32) survived distinctly longer showing survival times up to 32.6 IDT. This could be confirmed by comparing the observed survival after the initial CEA increase of treated and untreated patients (life table method) exhibiting highly significant differences (P less than 0.001).Carcinoembryonic antigen and recurrent colorectal cancer.Comparison of two CEA assays in primary and recurrent large bowel carcinoma with different DNA ploidy pattern.Pre-operative CEA levels were measured in 100 patients with large bowel carcinomas with different DNA ploidy pattern and serial post-operative determinations performed in the 64 who had been operated for cure. The follow-up period was 3 1/2-8 yr. All CEA measurements were performed consecutively with a RIA (Roche), and subsequently repeated in one batch with an EIA (Roche) based on a monoclonal antibody. Both assays showed a similar number of 'false-negative' CEA levels pre-operatively--varying from 69% in aneuploid (AN) Dukes' A to 8% in AN Dukes' D tumours, and from 75% in near diploid (ND) Dukes' A to 40% in ND Dukes' D tumours. The sensitivity for detecting recurrence in patients with tumours of either ploidy pattern was slightly better with EIA than with RIA. A difference between the AN and ND group was shown somewhat better with RIA, the sensitivity in the AN group being 79% and the median lead time 7 months compared to 13% and 2 months in the ND group. The corresponding figures with EIA were 71% and 7 months for the AN group and 63% and 1 1/2 months for the ND group. However, all but one of the patients with ND DNA pattern who showed recurrence-associated CEA elevation with EIA also had an elevated level pre-operatively. We conclude that all patients operated for cure should be followed by regular CEA measurements post-operatively if they had an elevated CEA level prior to operation.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Carcinoembryonic antigen slope analysis as an early indicator for recurrence of colorectal carcinoma.We analyzed the time course of postoperative serum CEA concentrations in 229 patients with histologically confirmed colorectal carcinoma. Preoperative CEA levels were correlated with Dukes' stages, however, the preoperative CEA value was of limited value as a screening procedure. In 42 patients with tumor recurrence after radical resection, a diagnosis of relapse, based on a rise in the CEA concentration, preceded the positive clinical symptoms. Analysis of the CEA time course made it possible to differentiate local tumor recurrence and generalized metastasis, regardless of the histologic type or primary site of the tumor.[Value of CEA in the early diagnosis of colorectal cancer recurrence in the light of second-look results].[Determination of carcinoembryonic and carbohydrate antigens in the diagnosis of recurrences and metastases of rectal cancer].A study was made of the results of measuring the carcinoembryonic and carbohydrate antigens using a kit of reagents in 75 patients with rectal cancer recurrences and metastases. The concentration of these antigens in healthy persons was for CEA 6.4 +/- 0.71 micrograms/l, the carbohydrate antigen--19.6 +/- 2.51 units/ml. In this group of patients rectal cancer local recurrence was found in 52, metastases to the liver in 19 and metastatic involvement of the liver and lungs in 4. An elevated level of the CEA was detected in 92.8% of the patients with cancer recurrence (the mean concentration was 99.9 +/- 9.29 micrograms/l), and in 100% of the patients with metastases (the mean concentration was 193.4 +/- 30.42 micrograms/l). The content of the carbohydrate antigen in cancer recurrences was raised in 21.3% of the cases only, in metastases to the liver in 31.6% and in 2 patients with metastatic liver and lung involvement. Thus, measuring the CEA content turned out to be the most specific and sensitive test for the diagnosis of rectal cancer recurrences and metastases. The use of the carbohydrate antigen for this purpose was found ineffective.[Clinical evaluation of the tumor marker CA 19-9 in comparison with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in surgical pre- and postoperative diagnosis].A new tumor marker (CA 19-9) was investigated. CA 19-9 is a tumor-associated antigen which is detected by a monoclonal antibody. CA 19-9 (CIS-Centocor) was compared simultaneously with CEA (carcinoembryonic antigen) in 347 patients. 123 patients with gastrointestinal tumors showed a sensitivity of 31% for CA 19-9 (CEA 49%), combination increased sensitivity to 58%. The highest sensitivity was found in pancreas carcinoma (CA 19-9 75%, CEA 66%, combination 92%); it was lower in gastric, colon, and oesophagus carcinomas. In relapsed colorectal carcinomas sensitivity was 53% (CEA 78%, combination 85%). In cases of relapse, tumor markers may become positive even if they were not detectable before resection of the primary tumor. Specificity for CA 19-9 was 100% (CEA 84%) compared to a group of non-malignant diseases including patients with inflammations and patients with nicotin abuse (n = 102). Because of its high specificity and superior sensitivity to CEA in pancreas carcinomas CA 19-9 should be determined in primary and relapse diagnosis in combination with CEA.Serial levels of CA 19-9 and CEA in colonic cancer.The use of serial carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 assays was assessed by comparison with serial carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) levels on the plasmas of 53 patients with colorectal carcinoma. The patients had all undergone resection for their primary tumors and in six instances subsequent resections for hepatic metastases. Initial CA 19-9 levels were greater than or equal to 37 U/mL in 22 of the 53 patients (41%) and in 68% of the patients with metastatic disease. Similar trends of serial CA 19-9 and CEA levels were found in 79% of the 53 patients. One patient with initially normal CEA levels had elevated CA 19-9 levels from the start. In ten of the 53 patients (19%), serial CA 19-9 levels remained low despite tumor recurrence or progression, and despite increasing CEA levels above 5 ng/mL. The increasing serial CEA trends predicted recurrence in 88% and increasing CA 19-9 trends in 50% of cases, which was increased to 70% by including trends of CA 19-9 levels below 37 U/mL. Following hepatic lobectomy, both serial CEA and CA 19-9 levels decreased rapidly. Used alone, serial CA 19-9 levels did not appear to be as sensitive as standard CEA in this retrospective study of selected patients.[Carcinoembryonic antigen: diagnosis and tumor progression in gastrointestinal tumors].Tumour progression in 340 patients with resected gastrointestinal primary tumours was monitored using the gradual increase in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in serum. The commencement of the rise in CEA generally preceded clinical detection of the cancer by several months. The degree to which the rise in CEA correlated with the recurrence of cancer was investigated. There was a marked difference in the distribution of the rises in CEA between local tumour growth and distant metastases. CEA increases of more than 1 microgram CEA/l serum in 10 days occurred exclusively in patients with distant metastases. There was a further marked difference in the distribution of the CEA increase between the group with liver metastases and the groups with peritoneal carcinomatosis or other metastases. The site of the primary tumour had no influence on the CEA increase during formation of metastases.[Colorectal cancer recurrence. Early diagnosis by determination of a carcinoembryonic antigen in the serum].[Prospective follow-up study of radically resected colorectal carcinoma. Status after 5 years].207 patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer have been followed up in a prospective, controlled study using serial CEA, ultrasound, colonoscopy and clinical examination for early detection of recurrent tumor. After a median follow-up of 2.5 years, 52 recurrences (25%) have been detected, rising CEA value being the most sensitive indicator (86%) among the diagnostic procedures. 26 patients were reoperated for recurrent disease; in 10 out of 19 patients with local and 3 out of 7 patients with distant recurrence a potentially curative resection was possible. Median survival of patients not operated upon (n = 26) or incompletely resected (n = 13) is 8.5 months, whereas median survival for the 13 patients reoperated for cure has not yet been reached at 2 1/2 years. With respect to resectability, thorough clinical examination and endoscopy have been the most sensitive examinations (both 44%). Aggressive follow-up for suitable patients with colorectal cancer will detect most of the recurrences in an early asymptomatic phase, increase the rate of resectability and prolong survival in selected, curatively reresected cases.Results of a 400-patient carcinoembryonic antigen second-look colorectal cancer study.Four hundred patients with resectable colon and rectal cancers were operated on by 37 surgeons at 31 institutions. Patients were monitored with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level determinations and clinical examinations. One hundred thirty patients had recurrences, and 75 were reoperated on, with 43 reoperations CEA-directed and 32 clinically directed. Two of 75 died within 1 month after the second operation. Twenty-two second-look patients remain free of disease 5 years after their second operation. The highest resectability of recurrent cancer occurred in patients with a CEA level below 11 ng/ml in whom the CEA level was determined at intervals of 1 to 2 months.Eighty-four potential second-look operations based on sequential carcinoembryonic antigen determinations and clinical investigations in patients with recurrent gastrointestinal cancer.In our study of patients with resected primary gastrointestinal cancer, slope analysis of the post-operatively increasing carcinoembryonic antigen time courses signaled relapse in about 80 percent of the patients up to 12 months before positive clinical diagnosis. In 29 patients, clinical confirmation of the relapse could be obtained only after second-look surgery. Slope analysis generally differentiated localized from metastatic disease and therefore also predicted the site of relapse. A first evaluation of 84 patients with potential cases of second-look operations provided evidence for a significant increase in survival. Recently, the evaluation of individual carcinoembryonic antigen doubling times was used to derive an individual prognosis since doubling times strongly correlated with the survival of untreated patients. On this basis, it was clearly possible to show the benefit of second-look operation, since patients with resectable recurrences exhibited longer survival times compared with patients with similar carcinoembryonic antigen doubling times without treatment. Moreover, the introduction of monoclonal antibodies with increased specificity for malignant states, has facilitated the selection of patients for second-look operation because unspecific carcinoembryonic antigen elevations are less frequent and recurrent disease can be predicted more reliably due to the higher carcinoembryonic antigen increments associated with malignant growth.Detection of recurrent cancer of the colon and rectum.Outpatient follow-up in patients operated upon due to carcinoma of the colon and rectum is usually performed, due to a high rate of recurrence and with the aim of finding a curable recurrence. Due to the enormous cost of an extended follow-up system, a careful evaluation of the benefit is needed. The aim of the present investigation was to study the efficacy of the different tools in an extended follow-up. One hundred ninety patients with carcinoma of the colon and rectum were--apart from traditional clinical follow-up--followed with an extensive laboratory battery including carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), hemoglobin (Hb), electrophoresis, ALP, and GT. Forty-seven recurrences were found. Thirty-one of these recurrences were first detected by a rise in CEA. Seven cases were detected at clinical follow-up and six cases due to symptoms suggestive of recurrence. The predictive value of a positive test was 79.4% for CEA but very low for the other tests studied. A negative value for any of the tests in the battery was usually accurate. Follow-up after colorectal carcinoma should include CEA as the only laboratory parameter. Postoperative colonoscopy for removal of missed synchronous lesions, chest X-ray, and endoscopic investigations of the anastomotic region also seem to be of value.Detection of recurrent rectosigmoid carcinoma: prospective evaluation of CT and clinical factors.Twenty-nine patients who underwent curative resection for rectosigmoid carcinoma were followed for 1-4 years by history and physical examination, computed tomography, liver function tests, and carcinoembryonic antigen levels. Recurrences occurred in 13 patients: seven asymptomatic and six symptomatic. CT scans, obtained in 10 of these 13 patients, were positive in nine. Liver function tests were not elevated in any and carcinoembryonic antigen was abnormal in six of 11 patients. CT is the most sensitive test for the detection of recurrent disease.Value of serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen, CEA, and gastrointestinal cancer antigen, GICA or CA 19-9, for preoperative staging and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal carcinoma.Serum levels of gastrointestinal cancer antigen (GICA) and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) were determined in 167 patients with colorectal carcinoma. Eighty-eight patients were studied preoperatively, and 79 postoperatively, before, at the time of, and after the diagnosis of relapse. The authors aimed to assess how often the GICA test failed, i.e., was false-negative in patients in whom the CEA test was true-positive and, more importantly, whether it could give diagnostic information in patients in whom the CEA test failed. Before surgery, serum GICA gave similar information to serum CEA in 56 percent of the patients: true-positive in 18 percent and false-negative in 38 percent; less information in 42 percent; and more information in only 2 percent. During the postoperative follow-up, serum GICA gave similar information to serum CEA in 55 percent of the patients: true-positive (i.e., rising persistently from a postoperative nadir) in 27 percent and false-negative in 28 percent; less information in 44 percent; and more information in only 1 percent. Therefore, this test in its present version, where both the catcher and the tracer antibody are the same, NS 19-9, is redundant.The clinical validity of circulating tumor-associated antigens CEA and CA 19-9 in primary diagnosis and follow-up of patients with gastrointestinal malignancies.The clinical validity of monitoring the tumor markers carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and CA 19-9 were investigated in 602 patients with colorectal, gastric, and pancreatic carcinomas. Sensitivity and specificity of the tests were evaluated preoperatively as well as in the postoperative follow-up for early detection of disease progression and recurrence. At a 95% level of specificity as calculated from a group of 150 patients with benign diseases, the CEA test with monoclonal antibody had a preoperative sensitivity of 39% in colorectal cancer and 21% in gastric cancer. On the other hand, CA 19-9 had a sensitivity of 19% in colorectal cancer, 21% in gastric cancer, and 89% in pancreatic cancer. In the postoperative follow-up it was found that a combination of both tumor marker tests was most profitable in gastric carcinomas, yielding an increase of sensitivity from 59%-94%, showing a high degree of complementarity. The gain in sensitivity provided by the CA 19-9 test over the CEA-test in colorectal cancer was very low. The gain in sensitivity, however, provided by the CEA test over the CA 19-9 test in pancreatic carcinoma was also very low. On the basis of these results it has to be recommended that cases with pancreatic carcinoma are to be monitored most efficiently with the CA 19-9 test, whereas in cases with colorectal cancer the CEA test should be used primarily. However, in gastric cancer the combined use of CEA and CA 19-9 represents a highly valuable basis for monitoring the course of disease.Serum CEA testing in the post-operative surveillance of colorectal carcinoma.Six hundred and sixty-three patients were followed with serial serum CEA measurements in addition to routine clinical surveillance after radical resection of colorectal carcinoma. Of 626 available for analysis, 366 (58.4%) remained clinically free of recurrence and had a normal CEA (less than 20 ng ml-1) throughout and 89 (14.2%) had a temporary non-progressive rise in CEA with no evidence of secondary disease. Of 171 patients who developed proven or suggestive recurrence, 114 had a preceding rise in the serum CEA and in further 21 the CEA rose simultaneously with recurrence. In 36 patients secondary disease was detected while the CEA was still within normal limits. CEA was more effective as an early index of distant metastasis, thus in 76% of those patients with a preceding rise in CEA, the secondary disease was disseminated, whereas only 20% had localised recurrence. The pattern of rise in CEA was of no practical value in distinguishing localised from distant recurrence.Local recurrence following 'curative' surgery for large bowel cancer: I. The overall picture.The Large Bowel Cancer Project is a collaborative prospective study of 4228 patients with a histologically proven adenocarcinoma, of whom 2336 (55 per cent) survived a 'curative' resection. Follow-up information is available on 2220 patients (95 per cent). Subsequently, 309 (14 per cent) have developed a local recurrence confirmed by: biopsy (127; 41 per cent), clinical examination (77; 25 per cent), X-ray (15; 5 per cent), a raised CEA (2; 1 per cent), or some other method - e.g. CT scan or a confident unbiopsied laparotomy finding (88; 29 per cent). Statistically significant factors (chi2 test, P less than 0.05) associated with local recurrence are: Dukes' classification: A 4 per cent; B 13 per cent; C 18 per cent Tumour differentiation: Well 11 per cent; Moderate 14 per cent; Poor 21 per cent Obstruction: Absent 13 per cent; Present 21 per cent Perforation: Absent 13 per cent; Present 28 per cent Tumour mobility: Freely mobile 11 per cent; Others 21 per cent Operation performed (rectal and rectosigmoid tumours): Abdomino-perineal 12 per cent; Anterior resection 18 per cent; Surgeon (Consultant only): Range less than 5 per cent to greater than 20 per cent. Stratification of the above variables altered only the statistical significance pertaining to tumour differentiation (P less than 0.1, d.f. = 2). In particular, the differences between Consultant surgeons remained.Follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer.In our follow-up study of 65 patients after curative surgery for colorectal cancer, tests other than history and physical examination detected only two cases of potentially curable recurrent colorectal cancer. As a routine follow-up test, carcinoembryonic antigen determination is preferable to computerized tomographic scanning, since the sensitivity and specificity of carcinoembryonic antigen and computerized tomographic scanning were found to be equivalent and carcinoembryonic antigen is much less expensive. There was no benefit to the routine use of liver function tests or chest roentgenograms during follow-up. Since barium enema contributed little to what colonoscopy accomplished with greater comfort to the patient, barium enemas should be used only when colonoscopy is not totally successful in reaching the cecum. The most beneficial aspect of the follow-up of these patients is probably the elimination of future metachronous lesions by removal of small, benign polyps.[Prognostic value of CEA in postoperative monitoring of colorectal cancers].The prognostic value of CEA for the purposes of postoperative monitoring assessed in 45 patients with cancer of the colon and rectum. Values were obtained 1-36 months after surgery in all operable cases. Means were also evaluated statistically at various follow-up times. In patients who relapsed, values stayed significantly higher for up to 6 months after surgery than in those who did not. Cockran's method showed that the prognostic significance of this difference 6 months after surgery was p less than 0.05.A prospective evaluation of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in the management of colorectal carcinoma.[Carcinoembryonic antigen in colo-rectal tumors. Prognostic evaluation and postoperative monitoring].CEA radioimmunoassay. Clinical applications in colorectal cancer.Since 1978 carcino-embryonic antigen determinations (CEA) have been used systematically in the preoperative as well as in the postoperative assessment of 139 patients operated for colorectal cancers. From these data results that CEA determination is of poor value for screening purposes, as 30% of the tumors don't produce the specific CEA antigen. High preoperative levels which normalize after operation, are equal to curative resection. The importance of CEA is emphasized in the postoperative follow-up of especially Dukes B and C lesions, where starting from normal base figures, increasing CEA levels are suggesting recurrences, long before their clinical evidence. Serial CEA determinations may show a slow rise, and in these cases a second look procedure can be considered. Clinical examination stays primordial; CEA is a good marker, and on account of the low cost, allows to be inserted in the postoperative follow-up scheme.[Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in surgically treated cancer of the large intestine].Preoperative CEA value. Dukes stage and recurrence rate have been evaluated in 112 patients with large bowel cancer. Recurrence rate within 24 months was significantly higher (33% vs. 10%, p = 0.01) for preoperative CEA values of more than 5 ng/ml. In patients with moderately or poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma the recurrence rate was nearly 40% if the preoperative CEA value was elevated. Among 13 CEA-detected early recurrences, 3 (23%) have been cured by resection.[Clinical usefulness of the study of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) for the determination of the degree of tumor progression, prognosis and monitoring of surgical treatment of neoplasms of the large intestine].Limitations of CEA monitoring as a guide to second-look surgery in colorectal cancer follow-up.Forty-two patients with localized colorectal cancer (Dukes' A, B, C stages) were treated with potentially curative surgery and controlled with a follow-up program, which included CEA monitoring, for a period ranging from 12 to 48 months (median 33 months). During this period, we observed recurrent neoplastic disease in 14 patients. A retrospective analysis of the results showed that: 1. patients with a preoperative CEA value greater than 20 ng/ml have a significantly higher risk of recurrence than the patients with CEA less than 20 ng/ml; 2. sensitivity of the CEA test was good for metastatic recurrent disease, fairly good for residual neoplastic disease, but insufficient for local recurrence; 3. test-specificity was poor, as demonstrated by the negative results of four exploratory laparotomies performed exclusively on the basis of increased CEA levels. Since the principal aim of a second-look operation is the cure of local recurrence, this type of surgery cannot be proposed only on the basis of increased CEA levels.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen in detection of asymptomatic disseminated disease in colorectal carcinoma.Fifty one patients were studied prospectively to evaluate the role of sequential determinations of the carcino-embryonic antigen concentration in the detection of asymptomatic disseminated disease after curative resection for colorectal carcinoma. Computed tomography of the liver was performed during the immediate postoperative period in all patients. Serum concentrations of the antigen were estimated at three month intervals for a minimum of two years. Computed tomography at the time of operation detected occult hepatic metastases in 12 patients. Of the remaining 39 patients, six developed local recurrence alone, two developed disseminated disease in the absence of hepatic metastases, and one developed hepatic disease at 10 months, as detected by sequential computed tomography. Of all 13 patients with asymptomatic hepatic metastases, only eight developed an increase in serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentrations before death. The median interval between detection by computed tomography and rise in antigen concentrations was 7.5 months. The corresponding median interval from increase in concentration to death was only 5.5 months. Of the six patients who developed local recurrence alone, only two had raised concentrations of the antigen. These results suggest that increase in the serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentration occurs late in colorectal carcinoma.[Diagnostic value of the assay of beta 2 microglobulin during the monitoring of surgically-treated colorectal cancers. Comparison with carcinoembryonic antigen].This work presents an evaluation of the diagnostic value of seric beta 2-microglobulin in the follow-up of operated colorectal cancers. Ninety-one patients were operated on with a curative intent between 1976 and 1979. These patients were followed for at least 2 years and divided in 2 groups: a) group NR: 48 patients apparently free of loco-regional recurrence and of distant metastases, b) group R: 43 patients presenting a cancerous relapse. High levels of beta 2-microglobulin were found in 21 patients of group NR (specificity: 56 p. 100) and in 25 patients of group R (sensitivity: 58 p. 100). In the same population, the specificity and the sensitivity of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) for the diagnosis of a relapse were 92 p. 100 and 88 p. 100 respectively. No significant statistical correlation was observed between the levels of beta 2-microglobulin and CEA. The sensitivity of the association beta 2-microglobulin + CEA was not superior to the dosage of CEA alone despite its reduced specificity (54 p. 100). These results indicate that the diagnostic value of the dosage of beta 2-microglobulin is inferior to that of CEA and is without interest for the detection of tumoral recurrence in the postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancers.Is CEA analysis of value in screening for recurrences after surgery for colorectal carcinoma?The progress of 139 patients operated upon for cure of colorectal carcinoma, was followed postoperatively with a standardized protocol. A CEA test was performed for comparison with other parameters. Median observation time was four years. When an upper limit for CEA of 7.5 micrograms/1 was allowed, sensitivity was found to be 78 per cent, specificity 91 per cent, and predictive value of an elevated CEA concentration, 83 per cent. In general, CEA measurement traced recurrence six months before clinical diagnosis. In only a few cases was recurrence first heralded by an abnormality in other blood chemistry test results. CEA may thus be used in postoperative screening for recurrence even though most recurrences, when detected, are not curable.Clinical significance of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in patients with adenocarcinoma in colon and rectum.Determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in serum has been performed in 253 patients with proved adenocarcinoma in the colon and rectum. Preoperative CEA was normal in 58.3% of the patients. A correlation between CEA level and Dukes' grading was found. There was, however, no statistically significant difference in recurrence rate between patients with normal and patients with elevated pre-operative CEA. Transient CEA elevation was seen in the follow-up period after curative resection in 21.8%. 75% of the patients with recurrence had abnormal CEA, and CEA elevation was the first sign of recurrence in 59.1%. The majority of these patients, however, had advanced disease not available for surgical treatment. In cases with local resectable tumour CEA often was normal. Only a few patients had advantage of CEA determination for diagnosis of recurrence and its routine use is therefore questioned.Plasma CEA in the post-surgical monitoring of colorectal carcinoma.This paper reports the findings of the M.R.C., study into the use of the plasma CEA test for early detection of recurrence following "successful" surgery for colorectal carcinoma. This study was set up in 1973, and represents the largest series of patients published on this topic. It was primarily prospective, 468 patients being entered at the time of, or after the initial diagnosis of colorectal carcinoma. Follow-up was for at least 2 years, and both initially and throughout the follow-up the clinician treating the patient was kept "blind" to the patient's plasma CEA level. The general conclusion is that the CEA test provides a useful additional tool for the early detection of recurrence in these patients. Sixty-five per cent of patients with recurrence showed a raised plasma CEA level, and over half the patients who developed recurrence had a raised level some time before the disease was detected by other means. A surprising number of patients had a raised CEA level on a single occasion which subsequently returned to normal at the next follow-up and did not seem to be associated with malignancy. The problems associated with this type of study and their limiting effect on interpretation are discussed.Correlation of single and serial CEA determinations with the clinical evolution of cancer patients.The correlation between CEA results and the clinical evolution of 56 patients with breast and colorectal cancer, was studied. In mammary cancer (41 patients) there was a correspondence of 75% between single initial CEA values and clinical state at the time of the determination. For colorectal cancer patients the correspondence was 80%. A follow up of the patients during 4 years permitted the evaluation of serial CEA results in the prognosis of the disease. Two or more consecutive CEA results with the same significance (increased or normal) correlated better than single values with the clinical evolution of the disease (93% of correspondence). Normal values in patients with active disease were indicative of favourable prognosis; the appearance of single values above normal but below three times the upper normal limit, do not justify changes in the installed therapy. Two or more consecutive increased results are indicative of present or future deterioration of the patient. Cases of non-correspondence between consecutive serial. CEA results and clinical evolution of the patient are considered as "real false results" (7%). Serial CEA determination resulted very useful in the follow up of the oncological patient in the frame of other laboratory and diagnostic means, as a part of the periodic clinical control.Serial CEA assays and liver scintigraphy for the detection of hepatic metastases from colorectal carcinoma.Of 340 patients with histologically proven colorectal carcinoma, hepatic metastases were diagnosed in 90 (26 per cent), in 50 at the time of initial surgery (synchronously) and in 40 during the post-operative follow-up (metachronously). At the time of initial surgery, plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels were markedly elevated in patients with synchronous metastases and normal or only moderately elevated in those with metachronous metastases. During follow-up, CEA levels in the entire group of patients with metastases remained normal in 8 per cent and rose in the remainder: very quickly in 85 per cent and slowly in 15 per cent. Hepatic metastases were diagnosed by strict scintigraphic criteria in 70 per cent of patients and were suggested by liberal criteria in the remainder. During follow-up, hepatic metastases progressed in the scintigraphic image from those defined by liberal to those diagnosed by strict criteria. In two-thirds of the patients, liver scintigraphy proved to be superior to the CEA test in diagnosing hepatic metastases by strict criteria; in the majority of the remainder of patients, the CEA test, particularly in cases with a pattern of fast increase of CEA in plasma, suggested metastases before a definite diagnosis could be made by liver scintigraphy. In only 3 per cent of the patients neither liver scintigraphy nor the CEA test were indicative of metastases. Thus, the two diagnostic modalities, when combined, could attain a sensitivity of 97 per cent, when patients with persistently rising CEA levels and concomitant liver lesions defined by the liberal criteria were grouped with those for whom scintigraphy was unequivocal.CEA monitoring among patients in multi-institutional adjuvant G.I. therapy protocols.The Gastrointestinal Tumor Study Group (GITSG) has since 1975 included protocols for monitoring carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in its colorectal cancer adjuvant trials. Among the 563 patients on the colon cancer study (GI 6175) and the 207 patients on the rectal cancer study (GI 7175), one third had preoperative CEA determinations and more than 90% had some postoperative CEA monitoring. Colon cancer patients whose preoperative CEA was greater than 5 ng/ml had a greater probability of recurring than those whose values were lower (33% versus 18% recurrence with 21 months minimum follow-up; p < 0.05). The prognostic value of preoperative CEA was apparent only in patients with Dukes' C1 colon tumors. Preoperative CEA values were not of prognostic significance among the rectal adenocarcinoma patients. Although elevated levels of CEA after resection of either colon or rectum cancers were strongly associated with subsequent tumor recurrence, no single CEA value, arbitrarily defined as "elevated", provided an adequate screening test with both high sensitivity and high specificity. Postoperative CEA elevations were more strongly predictive of recurrence when part of a steadily rising trend. In the colon cancer study, the median monthly increase in CEA for disease-free patients was estimated to be zero, and for the relapsed patients 5.8%. The corresponding estimates for patients on the rectal cancer protocol were zero and 7.8%. Only 36 of the 344 disease-free patients on the colon protocol and 14 of the 94 disease-free patients on the rectal protocol (15%) exhibited a rate of increase of CEA as high as 3% per month over the entire period of observation. Two thirds of the relapsed patients on both studies showed a rate of increase this high or higher. The patterns of CEA rise in individual patients were quite varied, however, and monthly rates of increase as established in our study are not to be used as guidelines in patient management.Carcinoembryonic antigen: usefulness as a postsurgical method in the detection of recurrence in Dukes stages B2 and C colorectal cancers.Sequential carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) plasma levels were obtained postoperatively in 181 patients with colorectal Dukes stages B2 and C colorectal cancers to assess their usefulness as part of a follow-up program designed to detect disease progression. In all, 1,684 determinations were obtained in patients who were, at the time, free of any clinical or radiologic evidence of disease. If individual CEA determinations are considered and if 10 ng/ml is specified as the limit between normal and elevated CEA levels, both sensitivity (45.0%) and specificity (93.4%) make determination of CEA levels an acceptable screening test in this well-defined population, especially as it also fulfills the criteria of patient acceptance, potential benefit to the patient, and low cost. Preoperative CEA levels were also determined in 93 of the 181 patients, and these results confirm the prognostic value of the slope between preoperative and postoperative CEA levels.Predictive value of plasma CEA levels: preoperative prognosis and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal carcinoma.Plasma CEA levels were determined in 280 patients with histologically proven colorectal carcinoma: in 180 once or twice preoperatively and repeatedly postoperatively, and in 100 postoperatively only. Preoperative levels correlated directly with surgical-pathologic state and inversely with the time of recurrence; i.e., groups of patients with more advanced stage showed higher proportion of elevated CEA levels, and patients with higher levels had recurrences earlier. Levels above 20 ng/ml were strongly suggestive of liver metastases or disseminated disease. Postoperative plasma CEA levels displayed three patterns of variation. 1) Levels fluctuating within normal range, below 3.2 ng/ml, strongly evidenced that surgery was effective, and 2) those fluctuating below 7.5 ng/ml indicated usually nonmalignant concomitant disease; in either group no more than 10 per cent of the patients had recurrences. 3) Levels rising persistently from a postoperative nadir indicated recurrence or, when the rise was dramatic, liver metastases or disseminated cancer in at least 97 per cent of the patients.A retrospective study of serial CEA determinations in the early detection of recurrent colorectal cancer.In the past five years, routine CEA determinations have been carried out on all patients after curative operation for colorectal carcinoma. These patients also underwent a clinical follow-up examination in the Oncology Outpatient Department. In 86 patients, recurrence of a tumor was confirmed. In 31 cases, a second-look operation was carried out. The CEA determinations were retrospectively analyzed in these patients and correlated with the time the recurrence of the tumor was diagnosed. These results show that of 86 patients only 15 (17.4 per cent) had pathologic CEA values before clinical symptoms of tumor recurrence. In the patient group with local recurrence, only 11 (23.9 per cent) of 46 patients had previously pathologically raised CEA values. Of 31 patients, 15 (48.4 per cent) underwent curative resection after the second-look operation. At this time, 12 patients (38.7 per cnt) still had normal CEA values, whereas only three patients (9.7 per cent) had pathologically raised CEA values. From these results, it was established that early diagnosis of tumor recurrence was very low. Therefore, one should not rely more on postoperative routine CEA determinations in the postoperative monitoring of patients following curative operations for colorectal carcinoma than on regular comprehensive follow-up examinations of these patients.Postoperative screening of patients with carcinoma of the colon.A prospective evaluation of 149 patients with Dukes' B2 or C colorectal carcinoma, including periodic history, physical examination, chest radiograph, liver function tests, complete blood count, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) radioimmunoassay, barium enema, and endoscopic studies, has been underway since 1976. Thirty-four patients have had recurrence. This study suggests that the history of CEA are the most sensitive noninvasive methods with which to detect recurrent tumors but are unlikely to indicate recurrence at a therapeutically advantageous stage.The usefulness and limitations of CEA assay in the management of colorectal cancer.We investigated the usefulness and limitations of the measurement of CEA in the evaluation of tumor resection and the detection of recurrence in colorectal cancer patients. Preoperatively, 46 of 90 patients (51.1%) had CEA values of 5.0 ng/ml or higher. The percentage of patients with elevated CEA in whom the CEA values returned to normal one month postoperatively was significantly higher in those who had undergone a curative resection than in those who had undergone a non-curative resection (p less than 0.02). Among patients with normal CEA values, the changes were nil or only slight in CEA values, one month postoperatively. Among 28 with recurrences, 24 (85.7%) had CEA values of 5.0 ng/ml or higher. All 11 with liver recurrences had values of 10.0 ng/ml or higher. In 4 with liver recurrences and in cases where CEA measurements were made, CEA values were found to be abnormal 3 to 10 months before the recurrences and a rapid elevation occurred for a short period. However, 4 out of 10 with local or lymphnode recurrences showed normal CEA values. CEA measurement was useful in detection of liver recurrences, but not so useful in detecting local or lymphnode recurrences.Prognostic significance of CEA in colorectal cancer: a statistical study.Pretreatment and serial posttreatment carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) serum levels were studied with respect to the course of disease in 222 patients with colorectal cancer. The CEA values during the subsequent six years were expressed in actuarial or cumulative plots in relation to tumour-free period, time of diagnosis of recurrence and other parameters. The pretreatment CEA value was highly significant but gave no more prognostic information than the Dukes classification. The pretreatment CEA had prognostic significance only in inoperable patients. Elevated pretreatment CEA did not exclude the possibility of curative treatment. Normalization of CEA after resection did not indicate completeness of cure. In patients with local or distant recurrences CEA occasionally rose before recurrences became clinically apparent. Positive lead time was 0-625 days. However, in about 40% of the patients clinical diagnosis of recurrence preceded a rise of CEA. Maximal negative lead time was 585 days. Statistically, recurrence without a rise of CEA was exceptional. The results strongly suggest that serial CEA determinations cannot replace physical examination and follow-up.Evaluating serial cancer marker studies in patients at risk of recurrent disease.The proportional hazards model of Cox (1972, Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Series B 34, 187--220), with a time-dependent covariate, is used to analyze serial cancer marker data. A particular advantage of this method is the case with which missing marker data are handled. Analysis of a real data set shows that high levels of the cancer marker carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) are associated with increased risk of death in patients with resected colorectal cancer. Several aspects of CEA marker history are analyzed, including CEA level at death time t, CEA level 200 days prior to time t, and whether or not CEA exceeded 5 ng/ml prior to t. Methods to test the hypothesis of no marker effect and to give estimates and confidence intervals for model parameters are outlined both for continuous and for grouped time-to-response data. For grouped data a likelihood ratio test of the proportional hazards assumption is suggested.Value of serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations for early detection of recurrent cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) has been monitored at intervals of approximately three months in patients who had undergone potentially curative surgery for breast cancer, head and neck cancer, lung cancer, and colorectal cancer, but who were considered to be at high risk of recurrence. Monitoring of CEA in patients' serum was of no value for the early detection of tumour recurrence in either breast or head and neck cancer patients. It was of value for the early detection of lung cancer recurrence, but these patients were always beyond the scope of cure. In colorectal cancer patients, two-thirds of recurrences were heralded by a rising CEA, but only one of 15 patients had disease confined to local tissues which could be totally excised, although a further three patients had liver metastases which were apparently localized to one lobe of the liver. For colorectal cancer patients, serial CEA estimations are an effective method for the early diagnosis of recurrence, although this seldom translates into improved patient benefit.A statistical evaluation of baseline and follow-up carcinoembryonic antigen in patients with resectable colorectal carcinoma.A long-term CEA follow-up was evaluated statistically for a series of 74 patients with primary colorectal carcinoma who underwent resections for cure. Thirty-three recurrences and 29 deaths were reported among this population after a median follow-up interval of 55 months. Preoperative CEA levels correlated with the Dukes' classification. However, the preoperative level adds significant information to Dukes' classification in the prediction of recurrence. Postoperative CEA assays taken later in the clinical evaluation process carry the most prognostic information for subsequent recurrence. Using matched-pairs techniques, the authors noted that CEA often rose in anticipation of recurrence, sometimes as early as one year before recurrence. The following four follow-up CEA events were evaluated: 1) three consecutive rising CEA's 2) CEA rises 5.0 ng/ml; 3) CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml; 4) CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml two consecutive times. The follow-up CEA events examined were characterized by false positive rates ranging from 17% to 66% and true positive rates ranging from 43% to 56% in the prediction of recurrence. From follow-up CEA evaluations, further clinical investigation appeared most warranted when CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml at two consecutive follow-up evaluations, but the chances of finding any subsequent recurrent disease was near 50%. Among patients experiencing recurrences, although forewarned by CEA elevations, there was no subsequent time when patients were most likely to have recurrence of disease.[Value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the diagnosis and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer].Serum CEA monitoring in the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients with negative preoperative serum CEA.[The CEA-concentration in plasma of patients with colorectal carcinoma and polyps has been determined by radioimmunoassay (RIA, Z-gel-method)].82% of the cancer patients and 52% of the patients with polyps showed CEA levels above the upper normal limit of 2,5 microgram/1. CEA-values of more than 10 microgram/1 could only be detected in patients with carcinoma. Complete removal of the tumour by surgery has been followed by a marked decrease of prior increased plasma-CEA to values in the normal range, which could not be observed in the cases with tumour residues or metastases. In the patient's follow-up recurrence or metastases could be recognized several months before clinical detection by a renewed increased of the CEA-level in plasma.[Indications for repeat operations for recurrence of rectocolic cancer: contribution of serum carcino-embryonic antigen levels (author's transl)].Preoperative CEA level: a prognostic test in patients with colorectal carcinoma.Preoperative and postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels were evaluated in 42 patients with colorectal carcinoma. Preoperative CEA values correlated inversely with survival at a statistically significant level and provided prognostic information not available by pathologic staging. Postoperative plasma CEA can accurately predict recurrent disease and may, when serial values are elevated, serve as an indication for a second-look procedure.[Carcino-embryonic antigen as screening protein in the follow-up of patients with surgically-treated gastrointestinal cancer (author's transl)].Carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) was determined in 206 patients with gastrointestinal cancer (131 colonic and 75 stomach) at the 2nd Department of Surgery of the University of Vienna. The value of CEA in predicting tumour recurrence and/or metastatic spread has been assessed within the framework of regular follow-up control examinations after surgery. A postoperative rise in CEA titre corresponded with cancer recurrence or metastasis both in patients with stomach (91%), as well as colonic cancer (86%), whilst low postoperative CEA values correlated with a negative clinical report only in patients with carcinome of the colon to any degree of accuracy (91%). The correspondence was much lower in patients with stomach cancer (67%).Results of CEA-initiated second-look surgery for recurrent colorectal cancer.The clinical significance of the pattern of elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in recurrent colorectal cancer.Serial serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assays were performed in 148 patients after potentially curative surgery for colorectal cancer. Thirty-seven patients developed proved recurrent tumour in a follow-up period of 2-5 years. Elevated CEA levels were recorded in 36 of these patients and in 27 rising levels preceded clinical symptoms of recurrent tumour. Two distinct patterns of CEA rise were observed: a 'fast' rise in which serum concentrations reached 100 microgram/l within 6 months of the first elevation and a 'slow' rise in which concentrations remained less than 75 microgram/l for at least 12 months. The majority of patients with the 'fast' rise had metastatic spread, whereas most patients with a 'slow' rise had local recurrence alone. This differential pattern may help to predict the site of recurrent tumour.[CEA assays in postoperative detection of recurrent colorectal carcinoma (author's transl)].Carcinoembryonic antigen in the diagnosis and follow-up of colorectal carcinoma.[Interest and limits of estimation of the carcinoembryonic antigen in colonic and rectal (author's transl)].An attempt is made to define the usefulness and limitations of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) radioimmunoassay for evaluation of diagnosis, tumor resection and detection of tumor relapse in 108 patients with colorectal carcinoma. Preoperative CEA levels were correlated with pathological stage and tumors localisations. Increasing levels of CEA were found with advanced stage of disease (Stage C and D lesions). Our results indicate: 1) that an incomplete drop in circulating CEA level one month after surgery was a bad prognostic sign; 2) that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased CEA levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.Predictive value of plasma CEA in patients with colorectal carcinoma.Two years follow-up of 46 patients with colorectal carcinoma resected "for cure" shows that of the nine patients with an elevated (less than 5 ng/ml) CEA plasma titer one to six months after surgery, only one, or 11%, had remained disease free. Of the 38 patients with normal (less than 5 ng/ml) plasma CEA, 27, or 71%, were free of disease two years after surgery. In another 85 patients presenting six months to ten years after resection "for cure" of their colorectal carcinoma, normal CEA levels were found in 73, and only five, or 6.4%, of these presented with disease progression when followed for two years; of the 12 patients that presented with CEA values less than 5 ng/ml, disease progression was evident in eight or 67%; in eight patients with CEA levels of greater than 10 ng/ml, the proportion of patients with disease progression increased to 87.5% (7/8). When a patient with a history of colorectal cancer, but seemingly free of disease, presents with levels not only repeatedly above normal (greater than 5 ng/ml) but above the levels found in some nonmalignant conditions (greater than 10 ng/ml), thorough re-examination of the patient to locate the site of possible disease progression is indicated. In 14 such patients further diagnostic methods showed local recurrences in four, metastasis limited to the liver in six, and other metastasis in four. In conclusion, in patients with colorectal carcinoma postoperative elevated CEA plasma levels are a sign of poor prognosis. Consistently elevated CEA levels (greater than 10 ng/ml) are a strong indication of disease progression.Clinical value of carcinoembryonic antigen: diagnosis, prognosis, and follow-up of patients with cancer.Plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in nanograms per milliliter was assayed in 149 patients with benign and 567 patients with malignant disease. Elevated CEA level (greater than 5.0) was a good indicator of malignant disease but a poor screening test for cancer because of the high false-negative rate. Degree of elevation of plasma CEA level correlated with incidence of metastatic disease in patients with colorectal, gastric, and breast carcinomas, but no correlation was seen between CEA levels and status of lymph nodes in patients with localized disease. Patients with localized colorectal cancer, but elevated CEA levels before resection, had a 2.1-fold increase in the incidence of recurrence; however, this added to the prognostic value of Dukes' staging only when the CEA level remained elevated postoperatively. In 87% of patients with colorectal cancer, the CEA level was elevated at the time of recurrence, but a therapeutic value of reexploration for unexplained CEA level elevation was not confirmed.[Importance of the analysis of the carcinoembryonic antigen in clinical oncology].330 patients (126 with gastric neoplasms, 204 with large bowel carcinoma) were submitted to serial assays to evaluate the possible relations between C.E.A. levels, pathologic stage and histologictype of the neoplasm and to define the usefulness of the C.E.A. test in monitoring the followup of the patients with gastrointestinal neoplasms. From our experience it ensues that C.E.A. test positivity (C.E.A. greater than or equal to 5 ng/ml, according to the method employed) is higher in colon neoplasms in comparison with gastric neoplasms, in the adenocarcinomas compared with the anaplastic forms. Besides, the study of the relationship with the pathologic stage points out the scanty usefulness of the C.E.A. test in the early diagnosis of gastroenteric neoplasms (Dukes A-B-C1 = 29.2%; CH stage = 88.1%). The use of C.E.A. test during the follow up seemed us of fundamental importance. We observed that: a) after radical surgery, 72% of the patients showed a normalization of C.E.A. values; b) there is a significant relationship between clinical course and C.E.A. as it can predict, sometimes several months earlier, the occurrence of relapses and metastases; c) there is also a close relationship (P less than 0.001) between the modifications of the antigen under chemotherapy and the clinical response. At present, C.E.A. seems to play, above all, fundamental role in choosing a correct treatment after radical surgery or in modifying the chemotherapeutic treatment in non surgical cases or in non radically resected patients.A retrospective and prospective study of serial CEA determinations in the early detection of recurrent colon cancer.The results of the present study emphasize the importance of minimizing the time delay between a significant elevation in CEA and a second-look operation. Equally important are the frequency of serial determinations, a thorough understanding of the limitations of the assay, and careful evaluation of the clinical condition of the patient.Long-term follow-up of colorectal carcinoma patients by repeated CEA radioimmunoassay.The use of serial CEA determinations to predict recurrence of colon cancer and when to do a second-look operation.The concept of second-look surgery was introduced by Wangensteen 25 years ago, and 17% of patients were reported to be converted to a cancer-free state. Instead of an arbitrary time interval for reoperation, serial CEA values were used as the indicator of colon cancer recurrence and second-look operation. Twenty-two retrospective and 18 prospective patients were evaluable. There was no operative mortality. The CEA Nomogram was used to determine whether the CEA change was significant. All patient-samples were analyzed in duplicate, stored, and compared with the most recent sample; therefore, each patient served as his own control. The prospective results emphasize the importance of minimizing the time delay between a significant change in CEA values and reoperation. Equally important are the frequency of serial determinations (every one or two months), a thorough understanding of the limitations of the CEA radioimmunoassay, and the clinical condition of the patient.Use of CEA as an indicator of early recurrence and as a guide to a selected second-look procedure in patients with colorectal cancer.The usefulness of the CEA as an indicator of recurrence and a guide to selected second-look surgery was evaluated from a retrospective analysis of 358 patients with colorectal cancer and from a prospective experience with 16 patients all of whom had been admitted for second-look surgery because of postoperative elevations of CEA only. Our previous experience had shown that after curative resection the CEA usually returned to normal levels (less than 5 ng/ml) within one month, but became elevated at time of clinically obvious recurrence being very high in patients with liver metastases, but only moderately elevated or normal in patients with local recurrence. All 16 patients had previously had curative resection of colorectal cancer; 13 in the rectum or rectosigmoid and three in the right colon. There were 13 Dukes' C and three Dukes' B cancers. All had been followed clinically and by CEA testing at three monthly intervals and were considered free of disease (NED) at time of CEA elevation. The median disease free interval was 13 months (range 4-57 months) and the median CEA prompting admission for second-look operation was 21 ng/ml (range 10-56 ng/ml). The sites of recurrence were liver in six, lung in two and localized disease in six. Two patients had negative exploration for recurrence and were found to have cholelithiasis only (one of these later died of metastases). Resection for cure was done in seven and palliative resection or biopsy only was done in nine patients. At this time, four patients are NED (12-37 months), five are living with disease (10-16 months) and seven have died of disease (2-12 months). The CEA test provides a method of early detection of recurrence and may permit surgical retrieval in selected patients and earlier initiation of palliation in other patients. The longterm effects in patient salvage remain to be defined.The use of serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations to predict recurrence of carcinoma of the colon and the time for a second-look operation.Our patients have demonstrated that serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations contributed to the detection of recurrent tumor and that shortening the delay between carcinoembryonic antigen elevation and reoperation has resulted in an increase from 27 to 78 per cent in instances of resectable recurrent tumor encountered. If these results continue to be substantiated, the carcinoembryonic antigen assay has made a significant contribution in the control of this disease. Serial carcinoembryonic antigen assays should be performed every two months. All benign inflammatory conditions that cause carcinoembryonic antigen elevations must be searched for, and ruled out, before reoperation is decided upon. The physician must be cognizant not only of the significance of the assay but also of the limitations, and he must rely heavily on his clinical judgment.Preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen level as a prognostic indicator in colorectal cancer.We examined the relation of carcinoembryonic antigen levels to time, site and extent of recurrence in 358 patients with colorectal cancer. The recurrence rate was higher in patients with Dukes' B and Dukes' C lesions who had preoperative levels higher than 5 ng per milliliter. There was a linear inverse correlation between preoperative levels and estimated mean time to recurrence in patients with Dukes' B and C lesions, ranging from 30 months for a level of 2 to 9.8 months for a level of 70 ng per milliliter. In patients with Dukes' C lesions the median time to recurrence was 13 months if preoperative levels were higher than 5 ng per milliliter, and 28 months if they were lower. Preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen levels in patients with resectable Dukes' B and C cancer provided an additional criterion for allocating these patients to groups at high or low risk for recurrence.Characteristics of adenocarcinomas of the colorectum with low levels of preoperative plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA).Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) is evaluated preoperatively and then serially postoperatively in 97 patients with colorectal carcinoma. CEA is initially elevated (greater than 2.5 ng/ml) only in 58% of the these patients. The group without preoperative CEA elevation has a statistically significant higher proporation of Dukes A lesions (p less than 0.05), seems less likely to suffer recurrence or have CEA elevation at the time of recurrence, and has a longer disease-free interval, than the group with preoperative CEA elevation. However, no distinction between the two groups can be made on the basis of the patients age, sex, presenting signs and symptoms, or location and size of their primary lesions. Higher postoperative CEA values are associated with liver metastases in both groups.Carcinoembryonic antigen test for recurrent colorectal carcinoma. Inadequacy for early detection.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) tests were performed on 36 patients with histologically proved locally recurrent or residual malignant disease after resection of colorectal carcinoma but with no clinical evidence of distant metastasis. Only nine patients (25%) had abnormal CEA levels of greater than 5 ng/ml despite the fact that most patients had had symptoms of recurrence for several months. Among the nine of our patients, none had CEA values greater than 5 ng/ml, and only three had levels greater than 2.5 ng/ml (3.4, 3.8, and 4.7 ng/ml). The CEA assay is not a sensitive test for early detection of recurrence of colorectal carcinoma.Carcinoembryonic antigen: 3 years' experience in a cancer clinic.Long-term studies on multiple plasma samples of 988 patients with carcinoma of entodermal origin indicate that, especially for patients with colorectal cancer, repeatedly elevated or rising carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) values are a sign of poor prognosis when found preoperatively, postoperatively or during chemotherapy. Persistently elevated CEA values in postoperative patients apparently free of disease are a useful marker for early detection of recurrence or metastases. Normal CEA values are of little or no prognostic value.Carcinoembryonic antigen: clinical and historical aspects.To further define and determine the usefulness of CEA, 1100 CEA determinations have been made over the past two years at The Ohio State University Hospitals on patients with a variety of malignant and nonmalignant conditions. Correlation of CEA titers with history and clinical course has yielded interesting results not only in cancers of entodermally derived tissues, for which CEA has become an established adjunct in management, but also in certain other neoplasms and inflammatory states. The current total of 225 preoperative CEA determinations in colorectal carcinomas shows an 81% incidence of elevation, with postoperative titers remaining elevated in patients having only palliative surgery but falling to the negative zone after curative procedures. An excellent correlation exists between CEA levels and grade of tumor (more poorly differentiated tumors showing lower titers). Left-side colon lesions show significantly higher titers than right-side lesions. CEA values have been shown to be elevated in 90% of pancreatic carcinomas studied, in 60% of metastatic breast cancers, and in 35% of other tumors (ovary, head and neck, bladder, kidney, and prostate cancers). CEA levels in 35 ulcerative colitis patients show elevation during exacerbations (51%). During remissions titers fall toward normal, although in 31% still remaining greater than 2.5 ng/ml. In the six colectomies performed, CEA levels all fell into the negative zone postoperatively. Forty percent of adenomatous polyps showed elevated CEA titers (range 2.5-10.0) that dropped following polypectomy to the negative zone. Preoperative and postoperative CEA determinations are important in assessing the effectiveness of surgery. Serial CEA determinations are important in the follow-up period and in evaluation of the other modes of therapy (e.g., chemotherapy). These determinations of tumor antigenicity give the physician added prognostic insight into the behavior of the tumor growth. Rectal examination with guaiac determinations, sigmoidoscopy, cytology, barium enema, and a good clinical evaluation remain the primary tools for detecting colorectal disease. However, in the high-risk patient suspicious of developing cancer, CEA determinations as well as colonoscopy are now being used increasingly and provide additional highly valuable tools in the physician's armamentarium.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a prognostic and monitoring test in clinically complete resection of colorectal carcinoma.The prognostic and postoperative monitoring capabilities of the CEA assay were compared to pathological staging of the operative specimens, clinical followup including endoscopy, radiology and scanning techniques, as well as DNCB skin testing and laboratory enzyme determinations (alkaline phosphatase and transaminase). A total of 46 patients with curative resection for colorectal carcinoma were studied. This included 23 patients with recurrent tumors compared to 23 long-term survivors without signs of recurrence at the time of the study. Preoperative CEA determinations were a good prognostic tool comparable to pathological staging of the specimen. Post operative CEA monitoring was the earliest sign of recurrence in 14 of 23 patients and was positive at the time of recurrence determined by other methods in 20; it was negative in only three cases. The incidence of false positive results among the non recurrent group became a lesser problem when repeated elevated values were required before considering the patient as having a recurrence. From these data, it seems reasonable to propose the use of a second-look operation in patients with maintained elevation of circulating CEA and no clinical signs of tumor presence, if we are to treat recurrence at an early stage. Chemotherapy would be an alternative way to deal with this problem, since the absence of clinical signs in general correlate with small bulk of tumor which at this time may be more susceptible to chemotherapeutic agents.Assessment of serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assays in postoperative detection of recurrent colorectal cancer.Monthly serial postoperative CEA determinations, three-monthly system review plus physical examination, and a battery of six-monthly laboratory and radiologic tests were compared in order to evaluate each in detection of recurrent colorectal cancer. Twelve of the 33 patients studied prospectively developed recurrent disease. In this study CEA was found not to be a substitute for careful clinical follow-up, but if used in a serial manner it was a useful adjunct for detection of early recurrent cancer, especially intra-hepatic and retroperitoneal disease recurring in patients with elevated pretreatment CEA levels. The other laboratory and radiologic tests employed were often useful to confirm progressing disease, but they did not reveal any first evidence of recurrent disease.[Value and limits of the determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in postoperative evaluation of patients with colonic and rectal carcinomas].An attempt is made to define the usefulness and limitations of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) radioimmunoassay for evaluation of tumor resection and detection of tumor relapse in patients with large-bowel carcinoma. In 45 patients for whom complete tumor resection was reported, all but 5 showed a drop in CEA to normal values after surgery. The 5 patients whose CEA did not fall to below 5 ng/ml showed a subsequent rise in CEA level and later were all found to have a tumor relapse. The results indicate that an incomplete drop in circulating CEA level one month after surgery is a bad prognostic sign. Twenty-two of these patients were followed up by repeated CEA radioimmunoassay for several months after surgery; 8 showed a progressive increase in CEA levels preceding clinical diagnosis of tumor relapse by 2-10 months. The clinical history of these 8 patients is briefly described. The results demonstrate that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased CEA levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.CEA levels at recurrence and metastases; importance for detecting secondary disease.The relation of CEA plasma levels to prognostic factors was studied in 170 patients with various stages of colo-rectal cancer. Several parameters of known relevance for the prognosis were analyzed. Among the patients with involvement of regional lymph nodes at the time of the primary, 53% had a raised CEA value (greater than 5 ng/ml serum) as opposed to 21% when this was not the case (p less than 0.05%). When serosal break-through had occured, 47% of the patients had raised values compared to 21% of those with no serosal break-through (p less than 0.02%). After radical surgery, all patients who remained healthy acquired persistent low plasma CEA, giving the assay a prognostic value. Altogether 20 patients had local recurrences without distant metastases and were thus potential candidates for a re-operation for cure. 70% had raised CEA plasma values, giving the assay a better than expected usefulness in the clinical follow-up, the significance of the difference from operated and healthy patients or healthy control persons being high, p less than 0.001%. The secondary rise in CEA appeared to be unconnected with whether or not the primary tumor had been accompanied by raised plasma CEA. The localization and the histopathological differentiation of the primary tumor seemed to be of less importance for the serum CEA than the dissemination of the tumor.CEA as a monitor of gastrointestinal malignancy.Ninety-four patients with carcinoma of the colon have been followed with serial determinations of plasma CEA (carcinoembryonic antigen) levels over a 3-year period using the Hansen assay. Nine hundred twelve CEA determinations have been made in these patients. Plasma CEA levels rose in 90% of the instances of clinical progression documented in these patients. In 30% of patients, this rise indicated progression 6 months or more before it was detected by standard clinical methods. Unfortunately, a few patients never developed elevated CEA levels even though disease clearly progressed. False positive results have also been encountered, with significant elevations occurring in patients who have since remained without evidence of disease for several months. Our data indicate that at least two sequential elevated CEA values, the second being higher, must be a minimal criterion for consideration of possible progression of disease. Even with this standard, we have encountered false positive results in 10% of our patients, indicating recurrence or progression where none has occurred clinically. CEA measurement is of limited usefulness for 30 days after curative surgery, because the elevation of CEA levels due to the original amount of tumor present as well as due to surgery per se may persist for this length of time in a significant number of patients. On the other hand, CEA levels have responded to chemotherapy in close correlation with observed clinical course in those patients with metastatic disease treated in this series. Initial pretherapy CEA values have so far proved to be good prognostic indicators of disease course following complete resection. With an initial CEA value of less than 2.5 ng/ml of plasma, recurrent has been rare (1/20). If the pretreatment CEA was greater than 7.0 ng/ml, it has been the rule (7/9).Role of serial plasma C.E.A. assays in detection of recurrent and metastatic colorectal carcinomas.Serial estimations of plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (C.E.A.) levels have been carried out in 220 patients with colorectal carcinomas who had potentially and apparently curative surgery. In a two-year follow-up period 53 patients developed recurrences or metastases. In 36 of these patients sustained rises in plasma C.E.A. titres occurred synchronously with or between three and 18 months before the clinical detection of recurrences or metastases. The use of serial plasma C.E.A. assays is therefore recommended as an additional diagnostic aid for the earlier detection of recurrent or metastatic colorectal carcinomas.Detection of recurrence of large-bowel carcinoma by radioimmunoassay of circulating carcinoembryonic antigen (C.E.A.).The usefulness and limitations of the carcinoembryonic antigen (C.E.A.) radioimmunoassay for the evaluation of tumour resection and for the detection of tumour relapse were studied in patients with large-bowel carcinoma. The level of plasma-C.E.A. was determined before any treatment in a group of 101 patients with histologically proven adenocarcinoma of the colon and rectum. 71% of all patients and 63% of cases with localised tumour (Dukes A and B) had a preoperative C.E.A. value of 5 ng. per ml. or higher. This limit was reached by only 1 of 90 apparently healthy, non-smoking blood-donors. Among 45 patients for whom a complete tumour resection was reported, all patients except 5 showed a drop of C.E.A. to normal values after surgery. The 5 patients whose C.E.A. did not fall to below 5 ng. per ml. showed a subsequent rise in C.E.A. level and were all found later to have a tumour relapse. The results indicate that an incomplete drop of circulating C.E.A. level one month after surgery has a bad prognostic significance. 22 of these patients were followed up by repeated C.E.A. radioimmunoassay for several months after surgery. 8 showed a progressive increase in C.E.A. levels preceding clinical diagnosis of tumour relapse by two to ten months. 6 other patients showed a moderate increase in C.E.A. levels, suggesting a tumour relapse not yet clinically detectable. The remaining 8 patients showed no increase in C.E.A. level above 5 ng. per ml. and no clinical symptoms of relapse. The results demonstrate that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased C.E.A. levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in colonic cancer. Use in preoperative and postoperative diagnosis and prognosis.CEA, CA 242, CA 19-9, CA 72-4 and hCGbeta in the diagnosis of recurrent colorectal cancer.The purpose of this study was to compare the utility of serum CEA, CA 19-9, CA 242, CA 72-4 and human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG)beta in the follow-up of 102 surgically treated colorectal cancer patients, out of which 40 patients developed clinical recurrence.In patients with recurrent disease, serum samples were obtained at the time of clinical recurrence, and in the disease-free group, they were obtained postoperatively. The combined use of the markers was evaluated with logistic regression analysis. The sensitivities of the different tumour markers at various specificity levels were compared by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.When the five tumour markers, Dukes stage and location of the primary tumour were evaluated together in the same model, only CEA provided significant diagnostic information (p < 0.0005) in addition to the location of the primary tumour (p = 0.003). The diagnostic information provided by the other serum tumour markers was insignificant, although CA 72-4 approached borderline significance (p = 0.053). ROC curves were constructed and the difference in the values of the area under the curve (AUC) between the different serum tumour markers was determined at the time of clinical recurrence. Of the individual markers, the highest AUC was observed for CEA (AUC = 0.931). The difference in AUC values between CEA and the other tumour markers was highly significant (p < or = 0.001).CEA had the highest diagnostic accuracy in detecting recurrent colorectal cancer. Inclusion of CA 19-9, CA 242, CA 72-4 or hCGbeta in the model did not improve the accuracy, although CA 72-4 approached borderline significance (p = 0.053). Thus, CEA seems to retain its position as the surveillance marker of choice for patients surgically treated for colorectal cancer.Use of CA 19-9 in the early detection of recurrences in colorectal cancer: comparison with CEA.The serum levels of CA 19-9 were determined in the follow-up of 370 patients with colorectal cancer and compared with CEA. An increase in CA 19-9 preceded clinical diagnosis of recurrence in 25% of 72 patients. The mean time between the rise in CA 19-9 and clinical diagnosis of relapse was 3.7 months (median 3). Sensitivity of CA 19-9 in the early diagnosis of recurrence was much lower than that obtained for CEA (75%). Only 1 patient had elevated CA 19-9 levels and normal CEA.Effect of 3 to 5 years of scheduled CEA and CT follow-up to detect recurrence of colorectal cancer: the FACS randomized clinical trial.Intensive follow-up after surgery for colorectal cancer is common practice but is based on limited evidence.To assess the effect of scheduled blood measurement of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and computed tomography (CT) as follow-up to detect recurrent colorectal cancer treatable with curative intent.Randomized clinical trial in 39 National Health Service hospitals in the United Kingdom; 1202 eligible participants were recruited between January 2003 and August 2009 who had undergone curative surgery for primary colorectal cancer, including adjuvant treatment if indicated, with no evidence of residual disease on investigation.Participants were randomly assigned to 1 of 4 groups: CEA only (n = 300), CT only (n = 299), CEA+CT (n = 302), or minimum follow-up (n = 301). Blood CEA was measured every 3 months for 2 years, then every 6 months for 3 years; CT scans of the chest, abdomen, and pelvis were performed every 6 months for 2 years, then annually for 3 years; and the minimum follow-up group received follow-up if symptoms occurred.The primary outcome was surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent; secondary outcomes were mortality (total and colorectal cancer), time to detection of recurrence, and survival after treatment of recurrence with curative intent.After a mean 4.4 (SD, 0.8) years of observation, cancer recurrence was detected in 199 participants (16.6%; 95% CI, 14.5%-18.7%) overall; 71 of 1202 participants (5.9%; 95% CI, 4.6%-7.2%) were treated for recurrence with curative intent, with little difference according to Dukes staging (stage A, 5.1% [13/254]; stage B, 6.1% [34/553]; stage C, 6.2% [22/354]). Surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent was 2.3% (7/301) in the minimum follow-up group, 6.7% (20/300) in the CEA group, 8% (24/299) in the CT group, and 6.6% (20/302) in the CEA+CT group. Compared with minimum follow-up, the absolute difference in the percentage of patients treated with curative intent in the CEA group was 4.4% (95% CI, 1.0%-7.9%; adjusted odds ratio [OR], 3.00; 95% CI, 1.23-7.33), in the CT group was 5.7% (95% CI, 2.2%-9.5%; adjusted OR, 3.63; 95% CI, 1.51-8.69), and in the CEA+CT group was 4.3% (95% CI, 1.0%-7.9%; adjusted OR, 3.10; 95% CI, 1.10-8.71). The number of deaths was not significantly different in the combined intensive monitoring groups (CEA, CT, and CEA+CT; 18.2% [164/901]) vs the minimum follow-up group (15.9% [48/301]; difference, 2.3%; 95% CI, -2.6% to 7.1%).Among patients who had undergone curative surgery for primary colorectal cancer, intensive imaging or CEA screening each provided an increased rate of surgical treatment of recurrence with curative intent compared with minimal follow-up; there was no advantage in combining CEA and CT. If there is a survival advantage to any strategy, it is likely to be small.isrctn.org Identifier: 41458548.18F-FDG PET/CT superior to serum CEA in detection of colorectal cancer and its recurrence.The aim of this study was to examine whether positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) can detect more cases of colorectal cancer (CRC) than serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), both at initial staging and during surveillance for recurrence. A retrospective review of 639 CRC patients imaged with PET/CT was performed. PET/CT was superior to serum CEA in detecting CRC, identifying 2.5 times as many CRC at initial staging compared to serum CEA and 1.5 times as many CRC recurrences. The current guideline recommendations of utilizing PET/CT only in the context of a rising serum CEA will miss more than one third of all CRC recurrences. Detection of resectable recurrences in colorectal cancer patients with 2-[18F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography.To evaluate the usefulness of 2-[(18)F]fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) in the early detection of resectable recurrences of colorectal cancer (CRC) and the impacts on the clinical disease management.FDG-PET/CT was performed on patients with elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels >5 ng/mL (Group 1) or suspicious recurrences without rise in serum CEA levels (Group 2). The results were analyzed on the basis of histological data, disease progression, and/or clinical follow-up. Recurrence was defined as evidence of recurrent lesions within 6 months of the FDG-PET/CT scan. Resectable recurrences and changes in management were calculated based on medical records.In our study, 128 consecutive FDG-PET/CT analyses (n=49 in Group 1 and n=79 in Group 2) were performed on 96 recruited patients. Recurrences were proven in 63. The overall sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of FDG-PET/CT were 98.4%, 89.2%, and 93.8%, respectively, and were 100%, 88.9%, and 95.9% in Group 1 and 96.9% and 89.4% and 92.4% in Group 2, respectively. Surgical resections were performed in 38.7% (12/31) of Group 1 patients and 53.1% (17/32) of Group 2 patients. FDG-PET/CT induced changes in planned management in 48.4% (62/128) of all patients, which included 63.3% (31/49) of Group 1 patients and 39.2% (31/79) of Group 2 patients (p=0.008). After a follow-up, 3.4% (1/29) of patients who underwent surgical resection of recurrent lesions and 34.3% (11/34) patients who did not undergo resection died at the end of study (p=0.004).The surgical resection of limited recurrent disease, as determined by FDG-PET/CT, improves the survival of CRC patients. FDG-PET/CT should be performed not only in patients with elevated serum CEA levels, but also in those in whom recurrences are suspected to improve the early detection of resectable disease.Clinical validity of tissue carcinoembryonic antigen expression as ancillary to serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentration in patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer.Although serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level is prognostic in colorectal cancer, the prognostic role of tumour CEA expression is unclear. The aim of this study is to identify the prognostic and surveillance roles of tissue CEA expression along with serum CEA concentration in patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer.Between January and December 2003, 294 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer were included in the study. Correlation of tissue CEA expression with overall survival (OS), disease-free survival (DFS) and elevated serum CEA concentration at tumour recurrence were analysed.Tissue CEA expression was positive in 215 patients (73.1%). CEA expression was an independent prognostic factor for OS [hazard ratio (HR) = 2.537, 95% confidence interval (CI) = 1.065-6.042, P = 0.035] and DFS (HR = 3.090, 95% CI = 1.405-6.795, P = 0.005). Elevation of serum CEA at tumour recurrence was significantly lower in patients without than with tissue CEA expression (14.3 vs 57.6%, P = 0.045). Moreover, when patients were grouped according to a combination of serum CEA elevation and tissue CEA expression, those with tissue CEA expression and elevated serum CEA (group 3) had significantly poorer OS and DFS (P < 0.001 each) than those without CEA expression and elevated serum CEA (group 1) and those with either tissue CEA expression or elevated serum CEA (group 2). OS (P = 0.006) and DFS (P = 0.027) were both significantly greater in group 1 than in group 2.Tissue CEA expression is a prognostic factor in patients with colorectal cancer. Analysis of tissue CEA expression may be helpful in determining the clinical utility of serial measurements of serum CEA as surveillance in patients with curatively resected colorectal cancer.Detection of recurrences during follow-up after liver surgery for colorectal metastases: both carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and imaging are important.The follow-up of patients treated for colorectal liver metastases (CRLM) is not standardized. The accuracy of an increase in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels for finding recurrences after treatment for CRLM is compared in this retrospective cohort study with the accuracy of routine imaging modalities of liver and chest.Data from all patients in follow-up after intentionally curative treatment for CRLM from 1990 to 2010 were analyzed. All patients underwent the same follow-up schedule. The way in which recurrences became apparent (i.e., CEA increase, routine imaging, or both) was registered. The specificity and sensitivity of increases in CEA before finding recurrent disease were calculated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves. An economic evaluation of the cost per resectable tumor recurrence was performed.ROC curves showed that a significant CEA increase was defined as a 25 % increase from the previous value. Recurrences were detected in 46 % of the procedures through CEA increase concomitant with positive imaging, in 23 % through CEA increase without positive findings on routine imaging, and in 31 % through positive imaging without an increase in CEA. The resectability of recurrences did not differ between triggers. Cost per curable recurrence was <euro>2,196 for recurrences found via CEA alone and <euro>6,721 for recurrences found with imaging and CEA.In the follow-up of patients after liver surgery for CRLM, a 25 % increase in CEA serum level can accurately detect recurrences, but routine imaging is indispensable. In patients with CRLM, we advocate both CEA monitoring and imaging in the follow-up after liver surgery.Utility of low dose (18)F-FDG PET-CT in patients with suspected colorectal carcinoma recurrence in conventional diagnostic methods.To evaluate the efficacy of (18)F-FDG PET-CT in the diagnosis of recurrence of colorectal cancer (CRC) in patients with elevated values of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and/or signs of recurrence in the multidetector CT (MDCT), and to demonstrate that good results can be obtained applying the ALARA principles.A retrospective study of 54 patients with suspected CRC, who underwent an (18)F-FDG PET-CT, administering a mean dose of 222 MBq (6 mCi) of (18)F-FDG, from 07/2007 to 01/2011 was carried out. Seven patients were excluded, thus studying 47 (27 males, 20 females, mean age 63 years). Recurrence was confirmed by histopathology study in 14 cases and by clinical evolution in 33. The patients were divided into 4 groups. A: patients with elevation of CEA and suspected recurrence in the MDCT. B: elevation of CEA, without suspicious lesions in the MDCT. C: normal levels of CEA and positive MDCT. D: normal levels of CEA and uncertain MDCT.We found sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV and overall accuracy of 91%, 69%, 89%, 75% and 85% respectively. For group A, we found 100% sensitivity, in group B, 75% sensitivity with 100% specificity%, for C, sensitivity was 89% with 71% specificity. Finally, in group D, sensitivity was 100% and specificity 60%, respectively.Applying a low dose, the (18)F-FDG PET-CT has high diagnostic performance in patients with suspicion of CRC, approaching in a higher grade the ALARA criteria.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen measurement, abdominal contrast-enhanced computed tomography, and fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in the detection of colorectal cancer recurrence: a correlative study.The aim of this study was to evaluate the correlative role of fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement and contrast-enhanced abdominal computed tomography (ceCT) in the detection of colorectal cancer (CRC) recurrence.A total of 96 patients (40 female, 56 male; mean age, 60.6  12 years) with a previous diagnosis of CRC underwent 18F-FDG PET/CT on suspicion of recurrence and were evaluated retrospectively. Inclusion criteria were accepted as the presence of increased serum CEA levels or positive findings on abdominal ceCT or both. 18F-FDG PET/CT findings were compared with histopathological findings and/or clinical follow-up data as the gold standard. Patients were divided into three groups: group 1, with increased CEA levels and normal abdominal ceCT; group 2, with normal CEA levels and positive ceCT; and group 3, with increased CEA levels and positive ceCT.Whereas sensitivities of CEA, ceCT, and 18F-FDG PET/CT in the three patient groups were calculated as 91, 67, and 96%, specificities were 13, 51, and 62%, respectively. There were 35, 14, and 46 patients in groups 1, 2, and 3, respectively. In separate analyses conducted on the groups, sensitivity of 18F-FDG PET/CT was computed as 100 and 100% and specificity as 88 and 80% for groups 1 and 2. In group 3, which comprised four patients with secondary malignancies, sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT were 94 and 16%, respectively.18F-FDG PET/CT has an additional role in the detection of CRC recurrence with a higher sensitivity compared with CEA and ceCT alone, and 18F-FDG PET/CT is especially more successful in patients with isolated elevated CEA levels or positive ceCT findings without accompanying CEA elevation.The utility of FDG-PET/CT as an effective tool for detecting recurrent colorectal cancer regardless of serum CEA levels.Tumor recurrence of colorectal cancers (CRC) is generally followed up by analyses of the serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels. However, recent evidence suggests that tumor recurrence can also be visualized by 18F-fluoro-deoxyglucose emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) in patients with normal CEA levels. We retrospectively evaluated the diagnostic performance of FDG-PET/CT in patients with suspected recurrence of CRC by comparing PET/CT performance in patients with normal CEA levels with PET/CT performance in patients with elevated CEA levels.A total of 235 patients with CRC who had been treated with surgery and/or chemotherapy/radiotherapy underwent PET/CT for the detection of tumor recurrence. The patients [96 females and 139 males; age (mean  SD) 59.9  12.6 years; range 18-85] were divided into 2 groups based on whether their CEA levels were normal (<5 ng/ml) (Group 1, n = 118) or elevated (>5 ng/ml) (Group 2, n = 117). All of the patients had suspected recurrence based on raised CEA levels, clinical symptoms, and/or tumor detection using other imaging modalities.Of the 235 patients, 172 (73.1 %) had disease recurrence confirmed by a pathological examination (either biopsy or surgical exploration) or clinical follow-up studies. The FDG-PET/CT study yielded a true positive in detecting recurrence in 169 (71.9 %) patients, a true negative in 53 (22.5 %) patients, a false negative in 3 (1.2 %) patients and a false positive in 10 (4.2 %) patients. CRC recurrence was detected in 64.4 % (76/118) and 88 % (103/117) patients in Group 1 and Group 2 with FDG-PET/CT, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of the FDG-PET/CT study for establishing recurrence were 100, 84, 89.4, 100 and 93.2 %, respectively, for Group 1; by contrast, these parameters were 97.1, 84.6, 98, 78.5 and 95.7 %, respectively, for Group 2. The number of patients with hepatic and extra-hepatic metastases, such as lung and abdominal lymph node metastasis, detected with FDG-PET/CT was significantly different in Group 1 than in Group 2; however, the number of patients with local recurrence and peritoneal implants detected with FDG-PET/CT was not different between the two groups.FDG-PET/CT can accurately detect tumor recurrence in patients with suspected recurrent CRC, even for patients with normal CEA levels.Role of serum carcinoembryonic antigen in the detection of colorectal cancer before and after surgical resection.To determine whether serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) correlate with the presence of primary colorectal cancer (CRC), and/or recurrent CRC following radical resection.A total of 413 patients with CRC underwent radical surgery between January 1998 and December 2002 in our department and were enrolled in this study. The median follow-up period was 69 mo (range, 3-118 mo), and CRC recurrence was experienced by 90/413 (21.8%) patients. Serum levels of CEA were assayed preoperatively, and using a cutoff value of 5 ng/mL, patients were divided into two groups, those with normal serum CEA levels (e.g.,  5 ng/mL) and those with elevated CEA levels (> 5 ng/mL).The overall sensitivity of CEA for the detection of primary CRC was 37.0%. The sensitivity of CEA according to stage, was 21.4%, 38.9%, and 41.7% for stages I-III, respectively. Moreover, for stage II and stage III cases, the 5-year disease-free survival rates were reduced for patients with elevated preoperative serum CEA levels (P < 0.05). The overall sensitivity of CEA for detecting recurrent CRC was 54.4%, and sensitivity rates of 36.6%, 66.7%, and 75.0% were associated with cases of local recurrence, single metastasis, and multiple metastases, respectively. In patients with normal serum levels of CEA preoperatively, the sensitivity of CEA for detecting recurrence was reduced compared with patients having a history of elevated CEA prior to radical resection (32.6% vs 77.3%, respectively, P < 0.05).CRC patients with normal serum CEA levels prior to resection maintained these levels during CRC recurrence, especially in cases of local recurrence vs cases of metastasis.Unnecessary surgery can be avoided by judicious use of PET/CT scanning in colorectal cancer patients.This study aims to determine the role of positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) in changing the management plan in patients with metastatic or recurrent colorectal cancer (CRC) and to evaluate the role of PET/CT in patients with an unexplained rise in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA).A total of 60 consecutive patients with CRC, who had PET/CT, were identified between 2008 and 2010. All patients had CT scans prior to the PET/CT. Data were collected from clinic letters, CT and PET CT reports and pathology results and cross-checked with the patient's notes.Patients were aged between 43 and 85 years [33 males, 27 females]. CEA was raised in 37 patients and normal in 23. Results of PET/CT were compared with that of CT scan and 33 out of the 60 patients (55%) had PET/CT results which were different to that of CT scan and 27 patients (45%) had similar PET/CT and CT results. PET scan appropriately altered the management in 23/60 patients (38%) and avoided unnecessary surgery in 14 patients. PET/CT had a sensitivity of 86% and specificity of 84%. In patients with an unexplained rise in CEA, PET/CT was positive in only one out of ten (10%) patients.PET/CT is valuable in deciding the management outcome in patients with metastatic or recurrent colorectal cancer. Unnecessary surgery might be avoided by careful use of PET/CT scanning in colorectal cancer patients. PET/CT might not be of value in patients with an unexplained rise in CEA.Postherapeutic follow-up of colorectal cancer patients treated with curative intent.Based on published data showing that despite a curative intent treatment approximately 50% of colorectal cancer (CRC) patients will present with disease relapse, and on the results of meta-analysis which showed improved survival by using intense posttreatment follow-up programs, we aimed in the present study to evaluate the additional benefit of routine abdominal ultrasound in the follow-up program of CRC patients.We conducted a prospective study, on 107 patients diagnosed with stage III CRC. Patients follow-up included: history and physical examination, CEA determination, and abdomino-pelvic US every 3 months.Recurrent disease was observed in 36% of cases after a median follow-up interval of 24 months. The liver was the most frequent isolated site of disease recurrence (62%). Serum CEA level increased in most patients (69%) with recurrent disease. Also, a high percentage of relapses was diagnosed by routine abdominal US (62%).Our study illustrates the benefit of intense follow-up (CEA, abdominal US) after curative treatment of CRC.Cost-effectiveness analysis of postoperative surveillance protocols following radical surgery for colorectal cancer.Up to 30-50% of patients who undergo radical surgery for colorectal cancer (CRC) develop tumor relapse. The aim of this study was to assess various surveillance protocols utilized in a tertiary referral hospital in Northern Italy.Data concerning 373 consecutive patients who underwent radical surgery for CRC between 1990 and 2006 and whose data had been entered into a prospective database were considered eligible for this study. The overall costs and the percentages of recurrence following the various surveillance protocols were calculated.One hundred two (27.35%) of the patients suffered a recurrence after a mean of 17.6 (95% CI 13.9-21.1) months. The combination of physical examination, colonoscopy, thorax-abdominal computed tomography (CT) scan, and serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) dosage was found to be the most cost/effective one to monitor stages I and II colon cancer; while physical examination, rigid sigmoidoscopy, thorax-abdominal CT scan, and serum CEA dosage were found to be the most cost/effective surveillance to monitor stages III and IV of colon cancer and rectal cancer.Adherence to follow-up guidelines and early detection are vital factors affecting the curability of relapsed cancer in CRC patients who undergo surgery. The first five years after surgery was found to be the most risky period for recurrence. Cost/effectiveness analysis indicate that follow-up protocols should be tailored to the risk of recurrence with the aim of identifying relapse when the disease is at an asymptomatic, presumably more curable stage.Usefulness of CEA concentration measurement and classic colonoscopy in follow-up after radical treatment of colorectal cancer.There is always a certain rate of recurrence after radical treatment for cancer and to get on it an early detection of disease set back is crucial.Medical data of patients operated on for primarily detected colorectal cancer in years 1993-2002 was retrospectively reviewed. Usefulness of follow-up means such as physical examination, or CEA and endoscopic surveillance was analyzed. All mentioned above were applied to scheduled follow-up (in 3, 6 and 12 month intervals following an operation and annually after that by the year 5).Complete and reliable data was obtained from 340 out of 502 follow-up intended subjects (67.7%). Elevated CEA was the most frequent predictor of recurrence within non-symptomatic subjects meeting follow-up appointments (60%). The cancer set back diagnosed by means of either physical or endoscopic examinations was the case only in one out of five patients (20.75% and 18.87% respectively). Clinical onset of recurrence making patients meet an unscheduled appointment was found increasing relative risk of nothing-but-palliative option either for them with local set back, or meta-static spread. Relative risk of onset of meta-chronous colonic cancer was significantly higher in patients being affected by synchronous advanced adenoma at time of surgery compared to those with one-fold changes.CEA scheduled follow-up after treatment for colorectal cancer CRC seems adequate to provide a good outcome of treatment for recurrent tumors. CRC patients presenting with synchronous advanced adenomas at time of surgery are probably to be under more intensive endoscopic surveillance.Accuracy of monitoring serum carcinoembryonic antigen levels in postoperative stage III colorectal cancer patients is limited to only the first postoperative year.The aim of the present study was to determine the accuracy of yearly postoperative monitoring of serum tumor markers to either detect or rule out recurrence in colorectal cancer patients.A total of 127 colorectal cancer patients who underwent curative surgery were enrolled. The serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9) levels were assayed, and radiological examinations were performed routinely for 5 years after surgery or until recurrence was detected. Yearly recurrence rates (number of recurrences/number of patients assessed in a given year), sensitivities, specificities, and likelihood ratios were calculated. Post-test probabilities were calculated from these values.Recurrences tended to show almost the same frequencies in the first and second year after surgery (20 of 127 patients and 18 of 107 patients, respectively). However, the post-test probability of recurrence in patients with positive and negative serum CEA levels was significantly lower in the second year than in the first year (test positive: 40.0% and 76.0%; test negative: 9.3% and 0.5%, respectively).Measuring CEA can help to identify patients likely to demonstrate recurrence with high accuracy only within the first year after surgery. Another examination, such as imaging, is therefore necessary for monitoring patients at 2 or more years after surgery.18F-FDG PET-CT in evaluation of postoperative colorectal cancer patients with rising CEA level.Accurate imaging of patients with possible recurrent colorectal cancer (CRC) is vital, as it is now clear that curative surgery is still possible for a proportion of patients with metastatic disease. Follow-up is usually performed with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level, computerized tomography (CT) and other conventional imaging techniques, but in the last few years, functional imaging using integrated positron emission tomography and CT (PET/CT) is being used increasingly to identify recurrent disease.To evaluate the usefulness of integrated PET/CT in the follow-up of postoperative CRC patients with rising CEA level.Seventy-three histopathologically proven patients with postoperative CRC having undergone CT of chest and abdomen were subjected to PET/CT imaging. Whole-body PET/CT imaging (base of skull to mid thigh region) was performed in all patients. These patients were grouped into various categories depending on CEA level.Of the total 73 patients, 22 had CEA levels within normal limits (<3 ng/ml). Among the remaining 51 patients, CT showed recurrence in 23 (45%) patients, whereas PET/CT was positive in 36 (71%) patients. In group 1 (CEA 3-5 ng/ml), CT was positive in four of 13 (30%) patients and PET/CT was positive in seven of 13 (53%) patients, in group 2 (CEA 5-10 ng/ml) CT was positive in three of nine (33%) patients and PET/CT was positive in six of nine (67%) patients, in group 3 (CEA 10-20 ng/ml) CT was positive in five of 11 (45%) patients and PET/CT was positive in seven of 11(63%) patients, in group 4 (CEA 20-50 ng/ml) CT was positive in five of nine (55%) patients and PET/CT was positive in seven of nine (77%) patients and in group 5 (CEA >50 ng/ml) CT was positive in six of nine (67%) patients and PET/CT was positive in nine of nine (100%) patients. Among 23 patients in whom both CT and PET/CT were positive, PET/CT showed extra lesions in 17 (73%) patients and changed the management in 11 (47%) patients. PET was negative in four patients with positive findings on CT, thereby changing the management. Of the total of 51 patients, PET/CT changed the management in 28 (55%) patients.This study shows an overall detection rate of 71% for PET/CT compared with 55% for CT in postoperative CRC patients with increasing CEA. PET/CT changes the management in half of the patients, highlighting the superior role of fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT scan over CT scan.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen, magnetic resonance imaging, and positron emission tomography-computed tomography in the evaluation of patients with suspected local recurrence of colorectal cancer.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and positron emission tomography (PET)-computed tomography (CT) in detection of local recurrence of colorectal cancer is evaluated in 71 patients, selected due to suspected relapse at CT follow-up. Recurrence was confirmed by histology in 18 cases and excluded in 25 cases. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy were as follows: 44.4%, 92.5%, 66.7%, 83.1%, and 80.3% for CEA; 88.9%, 73.6%, 53.3%, 95.1%, and 77.5% for MRI; and 94.4%, 73.6%, 54.8%, 97.5%, and 78.9% for PET-CT. A diagnostic protocol integrating CEA and dedicated imaging studies is to be advocated.[Follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer: impact of positron emission tomography - computed tomography (PET/CT)].Postoperative surveillance has an important role in patient survival after curative resection of colorectal cancer.To describe the characteristics of the follow-up with positron emission tomography (PET) / computed tomography (CT)(PET/CT) and its impact in colorectal cancer (CRC) survivors after curative resection in a university hospital in Tochigi Prefecture, Japan.Consecutive review of patient's hospital charts who underwent presurgical staging with PET/CT for curative resection of colorectal cancer between April 2005 and March 2008. The follow-up data of these patients was reviewed until September 2008.Of 209 patients presurgically staged for CRC, 207 (male/female = 125/82; mean age = 65.3  11.3 years) underwent curative resection and were included in the present study. The compliance rate with the Japanese Society for Cancer of the Colon and Rectum (JSCCR) follow-up guidelines was 53%. The cumulative survival at the end of study interval was 96.4%. The test most commonly used in postoperative follow-up of CRC was the carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). PET/CT was the test that detected more patients with recurrent lesions (n = 11, positive predictive value = 23.4), including one patient with an asymptomatic curable recurrence (inguinal lymph node metastasis), also being the most effective test (2.1%). However, its high cost makes it the less cost-effective.The use of PET/CT in the postoperative follow-up after curative resection in CRC has proven to be an individualized and effective alternative in the finding of asymptomatic disease curable. Systematic CEA tests with contrast-enhanced CT as a first line of screening and PET/CT as a second line may be an alternative follow up approach after curative resection for CRC.Intensive risk-adjusted follow-up with the CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 tumor marker panel and abdominal ultrasonography to diagnose operable colorectal cancer recurrences: effect on survival.Intensive risk-adjusted follow-up leads to improved resectability of tumor recurrences and better overall survival among patients who have undergone surgery for colorectal cancer.Long-term observational single-center study.University of Pisa, Pisa, Italy.One hundred eight disease-free patients who had undergone surgery for colorectal cancer were submitted to long-term follow-up with the serum CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 tumor marker (TM) panel and abdominal ultrasonography.Sensitivities and specificities of TMs, abdominal ultrasonography, and abdominal and chest computed tomography (CT); the median survival among patients operated on and those not operated on and the cumulative 5-year overall survival among the entire group.Twenty-two patients with asymptomatic colorectal cancer recurred 32 times. The CEA, TPA, CA19.9, CA72.4, and TM panel sensitivities were 46.9%, 34.4%, 9.4%, 9.4%, and 81.0%, respectively, and the mean (SD) lead times before confirmation of recurrence were 4.3 (4.8), 4.1 (4.7), 8.3 (10.9), 5.0 (7.0), and 5.3 (5.8) months, respectively. Abdominal and chest CT sensitivities were 100.0%. Among 86 patients without recurrence, specificities of the TM panel and all panel markers were 100.0%, while specificities of abdominal ultrasonography, abdominal CT, and skeletal CT were 99.9%, 99.0%, and 100.0%, respectively. The median survival after first recurrence was 16 months (range, 3-48 months) for 8 patients with recurrence who did not undergo second-line surgery. Among 14 remaining patients who underwent metastasectomy, the median survival after first recurrence was 37 months (range, 12-187 months; P = .03). Among the entire group of 108 patients, the cumulative 5-year overall survival was 88.7%.Long-term intensive risk-adjusted monitoring using the CEA, TPA, CA19.9, and CA72.4 TM panel and abdominal ultrasonography allows early detection of most recurrences. Patients can then undergo radical metastasectomy, with potentially improved overall survival.Surveillance with serial serum carcinoembryonic levels detect colorectal cancer recurrences in patients who are initial nonsecretors.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels, elevated in a subgroup of patients with colorectal cancer (CRC) at presentation, are serially followed as part of recommended surveillance after initial resection. The value of following serial CEA levels in patients who initially present with less than or normal levels of CEA (nonsecretors) is controversial. This study sought to determine the use of follow-up CEA levels in nonsecretors. A retrospective review was performed of patients with resected Stage I, II, and III CRC. We excluded patients who did not have a pretreatment CEA level, at least two follow-up CEA levels, or in whom CEA levels did not normalize after resection. The patients were grouped by initial CEA values: CEA 5 ng/mL or less (nonsecretors) and CEA 5 + ng/mL: (secretors). We identified 186 patients with CRC; 146 were initial nonsecretors. We identified 22 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer; 6 were secretors and 16 patients were nonsecretors. In the secretors group, CEA was elevated with recurrence in four (66%) of the patients. In the nonsecretors, CEA was elevated with recurrence in eight (50%) of the patients. In summary, many recurrences of CRC are marked by an elevation of CEA regardless of whether the patients initially presented as secretors or nonsecretors.Does serum carcinoembryonic antigen elevation in patients with postoperative stage II colorectal cancer indicate recurrence? Comparison with stage III.The aim of this study was to determine the accuracy of postoperative monitoring of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) to detect or rule out recurrence in patients with stage II colorectal cancer (CRC) by comparing results with stage III.A total of 303 patients with CRC who underwent curative surgery were enrolled. Serum CEA was assayed, and radiological examination was performed routinely for 5 years after surgery. Yearly recurrence rates, sensitivities, specificities, likelihood ratios, and posttest probabilities were calculated.Sensitivity and specificity of CEA monitoring in stage II patients are almost same as those in stage III. Whereas recurrences occurred early in stage III, they occurred almost as frequently in both early and late stage II. The obtained posttest probability of recurrence in stage II patients with CEA elevation was significantly lower (only 30% or less) than those in stage III (approximately 80%).Elevation of CEA in patients with stage II CRC does not represent recurrence with high probability. One of the reasons for the unreliability of CEA monitoring was its high false-positive rate. Another tumor marker with a lower false-positive rate is necessary to follow-up stage II CRC patients.Clinical significance of CEA and CA19-9 in postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancer.We evaluated the efficiency of CEA and CA19-9 as tools for diagnosing recurrence in the postoperative surveillance of colorectal cancer.A total of 227 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer between 1999 and 2003 at our hospital received complete follow-up according to the schedule determined prospectively. Using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, performance of postoperative values of CEA or CA19-9 for detecting recurrence was assessed.The sensitivity (1.000) and specificity (0.978) of the postoperative values of CEA in the high preoperative CEA group were very high. Even in the normal preoperative CEA group, the area under the curve (AUC) of the ROC curve of CEA (0.740, 95% confidence interval [95% CI], 0.628-0.852) was significantly larger than 0.5 (P < 0.001). The postoperative values of CA19-9 showed high sensitivity (0.833) and specificity (0.900) in the high preoperative CA19-9 group, while the AUC of the ROC curve of the normal preoperative group was as small as 0.510 (95% CI, 0.376-0.644). In the high preoperative CA19-9 group, however, there was no significant difference between the AUC of CA19-9 (0.904, 95% CI, 0.786-1.000) and that of CEA (0.869, 95% CI, 0.744-0.994) (P = 0.334).The measurement of CEA is an efficient way to detect recurrence. The efficiency of measuring CA19-9 for the purpose of detecting recurrence is low, especially in patients with a normal level of preoperative CA19-9. Even in patients with a high preoperative level of CA19-9, CEA might be able to fill the role of CA19-9.Lead time of carcinoembryonic antigen elevation in the postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancer did not affect the survival rate after recurrence.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the early detection of recurrence during the postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancer remains unclear. We hypothesize that the tumor with longer lead time of CEA elevation to the definite recurrence may have a better prognosis because of its slower growth rate and closer observation.From 1995 to 2003, 4,841 consecutive patients who received curative resection of localized colorectal adenocarcinoma were enrolled from a prospective database. The patients with persisting CEA elevation after operation had been already excluded. Postoperative follow-up, including physical examination, imaging, and CEA test, were performed according to a surveillance program. A CEA >/=5 ng/mL was defined as elevated. The definition of the CEA lead time was the period between CEA elevation and detection of recurrence. All statistical analyses were performed by SPSS package for Windows (Microsoft, Redmond, WA, USA).The postoperative median follow-up time for the 4,841 patients was 68 months. A total of 999 patients (20.6%) had CEA elevation and recurrence. Among these patients, recurrence was confirmed in 727 patients (72.8%)before, at the same time, or within 3 months of CEA elevation and thus had a short lead time of CEA elevation (SLT group). In 272 patients (27.2%), recurrence was confirmed after more than 3 months of CEA elevation and thus had a longer lead time of CEA elevation (LLT group). The recurrence pattern showed similarities in these two groups. A total of 193 patients (193/999, 19.3%) received a second radical operation, and 806 patients (80.7%) were inoperable. The re-resection rate between the SLT group (146 patients, 20.1%) and the LLT group (47 patients, 17.3%) was not significantly different. The overall survival rate after recurrence showed no difference between these two groups (P = 0.123).Most cases of recurrence were detected at nearly the same time when the CEA level was elevated. Therefore, a more sensitive test is needed for early detection. The relationship between the lead time of CEA and the clinical outcome was not statistically significant. A more aggressive approach to the patient who has CEA elevation and is highly suspect of recurrence may be needed.First alert for recurrence during follow-up after potentially curative resection for colorectal carcinoma: CA 19-9 should be included in surveillance programs.The aim of this study was to evaluate the contribution of each examination included in the postoperative surveillance program, especially that of serum tumor markers.Patients who underwent curative surgery for colorectal carcinoma (CRC) from January 2000 to December 2006 were enrolled. The postoperative surveillance program in our department includes tumor marker (carcinoembryonic antigen [CEA] and carbohydrate antigen [CA] 19-9) measurement every 3 months for 5 years, chest radiograph or chest computed tomography (CT) every 3 months for 2 years and then every 6 months until 5 years, and abdominal CT every 3 months for 2 years and then every 6 months until 5 years. The first examination that revealed abnormality in patients who developed recurrence was analyzed.During the study period, 105 recurrences were diagnosed. There were 45 hepatic recurrences, 23 local recurrences, 20 pulmonary recurrences, 16 lymph node recurrences, and 10 peritoneal recurrences. Computed tomography, CEA, and CA 19-9 were the first abnormal examination(s) in 77, 23, and 26 patients, respectively. Tumor markers detected the recurrence earlier than did CT in 27% of patients. CEA and CA 19-9 equally contributed to detection with respect to the number of patients, while the sites of detected recurrences differed.For early detection of occult recurrence of CRC, CT was the most reliable modality. On the other hand, tumor markers were also relevant. Given the recent advances in multimodal approaches for advanced CRC, the combination of CT, CEA, and CA 19-9, which is currently not included in guidelines, should be routinely performed.Strict follow-up programme including CT and F-FDG-PET after curative surgery for colorectal cancer.The risk of local recurrence following curative surgery for colorectal cancer (CRC) is up to 50%. A rigorous follow-up program may increase survival. Guidelines on suitable methods for scheduled follow up examinations are needed. This study evaluates a strict follow-up program including carcinogenic embryonic antigen (CEA), chest X-ray, abdominal ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and (18)F-FDG positron emission tomography (FDG-PET).A cohort of 132 patients, treated by surgery with curative intent for CRC, was included. Patients were followed prospectively with scheduled controls at 3, 6, 12 and 24 months after curative surgery. CEA, chest X-ray, US, CT and FDG-PET supplemented by clinical examination. The end-point was recurrence. Sensitivity and specificity was estimated 2 years after surgery.Of the 132 patients included in the study, 25 experienced recurrence, detected at scheduled controls (n = 18) and at intervals between them (n = 7). The results of CT and FDG-PET were correlated with recurrence. CT combined with FDG-PET had the highest specificity and sensitivity.A total of 72% of recurrences were detected at scheduled controls. The findings supported a strict follow-up program following curative surgery for colorectal cancer. FDG-PET combined with CT should be included in control programs.Predictive factors of early relapse in UICC stage I-III colorectal cancer patients after curative resection.To predict the clinicopathologic factors for early relapse of UICC stage I-III colorectal cancer (CRC) patients undergoing curative resection and thus to identify a subgroup of patients who are at high risk for postoperative early relapse.Between January 2001 and June 2007, a total of 778 UICC stage I-III CRC patients who underwent a radical resection and regular follow-up were retrospectively analyzed. Of these 778 CRC patients, 521 colon cancer and 257 rectal cancer cases were analyzed, respectively, to determine the predictors of early relapse postoperatively. These 778 patients were followed-up intensively, and their outcomes were investigated retrospectively.Out of 521 colon cancer patients, postoperative relapse after primary resection was found in 142 (27.3%) patients, and 77 (54.2%) of 142 recurrent colon cancer patients were classified as postoperative early relapse. Meanwhile, among 257 rectal cancer patients, postoperative relapse was found in 68 (26.5%) patients and 44 (64.7%) of 68 recurrent rectal cancer patients were identified as postoperative early relapse. Forty-nine (63.6%) of 77 early relapsed colon cancer patients were stage III, and likewise, 26 (59.1%) of 44 early relapsed rectal cancer patients were stage III. Univariately, postoperative early relapse of colon cancer patients was significantly correlated with the presence of vascular invasion (P < 0.001), perineural invasion (P < 0.001), high postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level (P = 0.001), and type of surgery (P = 0.016). Using a Cox proportional hazards analysis, the presence of vascular invasion (P = 0.033), perineural invasion (P = 0.005), and high postoperative CEA levels (P = 0.001) were demonstrated to be independent predictors of postoperative early relapse of colon cancer patients, while in rectal cancer patients, both vascular invasion (P = 0.039) and perineural invasion (P = 0.008) were statistically significant predictors of early relapse by univariate analysis. Using a Cox proportional hazards analysis, only perineural invasion (P = 0.043) was an independent factor. Early relapse cases had significant lower overall survival rates than non-early relapse cases either in colon cancer (P < 0.001) or in rectal cancer (P = 0.0091) patients.This study suggests that vascular invasion, perineural invasion, and postoperative CEA level may be significant factors for postoperative early relapse of colon cancer; while only perineural invasion is considered to be a significant predictor in rectal cancer patients. Identification of these high-risk UICC stage I-III CRC patients of early relapse is important, and thus could help to define patients with this tumor entity for an enhanced follow-up and therapeutic program.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring after curative resection for colorectal cancer: clinical significance of the preoperative level.We evaluated preoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a prognostic factor for colorectal cancer and determined when surveillance of this marker was useful.Serum CEA was measured preoperatively in 1,263 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer at 3-month intervals for the first 2 postoperative years and at 6-month intervals thereafter. Mean follow-up was 48 months (range 1-156 months).The 5-year disease-free survival was less in patients with a high preoperative serum CEA level (P<0.0001). Among patients with a tumor recurrence, 38.5% had high follow-up serum CEA levels. The number of patients with high postoperative serum CEA levels exceeded the number of patients with high preoperative levels. High preoperative and follow-up serum CEA levels were independent prognostic factors for tumor recurrence (P=0.003 and P<0.001, respectively). In patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels, CEA surveillance had a 92.3% positive predictive value (PPV) and a 96.1% negative predictive value (NPV). The mean interval between postoperative serum CEA elevation and the diagnosis of a tumor recurrence [diagnostic interval (DI)] was 2.5 months (range 5-17 months). The DI was 0 in 18.8% of patients with a tumor recurrence.High serum CEA levels preoperatively and at follow-up are prognostic factors for colorectal cancer. Postoperative serum CEA surveillance is used most effectively when patients have high preoperative serum CEA levels. Considering the DI of 0 in 18.8% of the patients, the current CEA surveillance schedule might be changed.Serum p53 antibody as tumor marker for follow-up of colorectal cancer after curative resection.No large-scale studies have examined the use of serial measurements of serum p53 antibodies (s-p53Abs) combined with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurements during the follow-up of colorectal cancer (CRC) patients after curative resection.A highly specific enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was used to analyze s-p53Abs levels in 305 CRC patients before and after curative resection at a single institution. Agreement between recurrence and serial s-p53Ab and CEA measurements was evaluated by diagnostic accuracy odds ratio (DOR), kappa, and area under receiver operating characteristic curve (AUC).Among 305 patients, 76 (25%) patients had disease recurrence during follow-up. None of the 168 s-p53Ab seronegative patients (s-p53Ab < 10 U/microL) without recurrence had an abnormal s-p53Ab test during follow-up. Among the remaining low-level (10 U/microL <or= s-p53Ab <or= 76 U/microL, n = 103) and high-level (s-p53Ab titer > 76 U/microL, n = 34) seropositive patients, recurrence defined by s-p53Ab tests resulted in a DOR of 4.3 and infinity, a kappa of 0.35 and 1.00, and an AUC of 0.633 [95% confidence interval (CI), 0.495 to 0.772; P = 0.047], and 1.0 (95% CI, 1.000 to 1.000; P < 0.0001), respectively. Recurrence defined by CEA tests had an AUC of 0.781 (95% CI, 0.654 to 0.909) for low-level and 0.796 (95% CI, 0.611 to 0.982) for high-level seropositive patients.Agreement between clinical recurrence and serial s-p53Ab test was dependent upon preoperative s-p53Ab level. Serial s-p53Ab testing outperformed CEA testing when predicting clinical recurrence in colorectal cancer patients with an abnormal preoperative s-p53Ab level.Postoperative surveillance recommendations for early stage colon cancer based on results from the clinical outcomes of surgical therapy trial.Intensive postoperative surveillance is associated with improved survival and recommended for patients with late stage (stage IIB and III) colon cancer. We hypothesized that stage I and IIA colon cancer patients would experience similar benefits.Secondary analysis of data from the Clinical Outcomes of Surgical Therapy trial was performed by analyzing results according to TNM stage; early (stage I and IIA, 537 patients) and late (stage IIB and III, 254 patients) stage disease. Five-year recurrence rates were higher in patients with late (35.7%) versus early stage disease (9.5%). Early and late stage salvage rates, recurrence patterns and methods of first detection were compared by chi(2) test.Salvage rates for early- and late-stage disease patients with recurrence were the same (35.9% v 37%; P = .9, respectively). Median survival after second surgery after recurrence was 51.2 and 35.8 months for early- and late-stage patients, respectively. Single sites of first recurrence did not significantly differ between early and late stage, but multiple sites of recurrence occurred less often in early-stage patients (3.6% v 28.6%, for early v late, respectively; P < .001). METHODS of first detection of recurrence were not significantly different: carcinoembryonic antigen (29.1% v 37.4%), computed tomography scan (23.6% v 26.4%), chest x-ray (7.3% v 12.1%), and colonoscopy (12.7% v 8.8%), for early versus late stage disease, respectively.Patients with early-stage colon cancer have similar sites of recurrence, and receive similar benefit from postrecurrence therapy as late-stage patients; implementation of surveillance guidelines for early-stage patients is appropriate.Persistent high postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen in colorectal cancer patients--is it important?Evaluation of pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels together has seldom been assessed for the prognosis of colorectal cancer (CRC).To concurrently evaluate pre- and postoperative CEA as factors of relapse and survival.The study consisted of 114 patients who had undergone surgery from February 2002 to June 2006 for CRC. All patients were classified into four groups according to their pre- and postoperative CEA levels. Data obtained for clinicopathologic parameters, lymph node metastasis, stage, recurrence, and CEA levels were analyzed to determine their association with survival. Multivariate analysis by the Cox proportional hazard regression model was performed to identify the independent prognostic factors associated with survival.Postoperative serum CEA levels remained high in Group 3 (n = 32). Nineteen patients (59.3%) demonstrated a detectable cause for persistent high CEA levels, while the reasons for those in the other thirteen patients (40.6%) remained obscure. Abnormal preoperative CEA levels significantly correlated with the depth of tumor invasion, lymph node metastasis, TNM stage, and recurrence (p < 0.05). Abnormal postoperative CEA levels were significantly related to the depth of tumor invasion, TNM stage, and postoperative relapse (p<0.05). Patients in Group 3 demonstrated the worst survival rate. Abnormal postoperative CEA levels, lymph node metastasis, and location of the tumor were independent prognostic factors for survival.The survival of patients with high postoperative CEA levels due to unknown reasons may be extended if they are exhaustively tested with sensitive diagnostic methods and treated at an early stage.Negative serum carcinoembryonic antigen has insufficient accuracy for excluding recurrence from patients with Dukes C colorectal cancer: analysis with likelihood ratio and posttest probability in a follow-up study.This study was designed to determine the efficacy of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring for screening patients with colorectal cancer by using posttest probability of recurrence.For this study, 348 (preoperative serum CEA level elevated: CEA+, n = 119; or normal: CEA-, n = 229) patients who had undergone potentially curative surgery for colorectal cancer were enrolled. After five-year follow-up with measurements of serum CEA levels and imaging workup, posttest probabilities of recurrence were calculated.Recurrence was observed in 39 percent of CEA+ patients and 30 percent in CEA- patients, and CEA levels were elevated in 33.3 percent of CEA+ patients and 17.5 percent of CEA- patients. With obtained sensitivity (68.4 percent, CEA+; 41 percent, CEA-), specificity (83 percent, CEA+; 91 percent, CEA-) and likelihood ratio (test positive: 4.0, CEA+; 4.4, CEA-; and test negative: 0.38, CEA+; 0.66, CEA-), posttest probability given the presence of CEA elevation in the CEA+ and CEA- was 72.2 and 65.5 percent, respectively, and that given the absence of CEA elevation was 20 and 22.2 percent, respectively.Whereas postoperative CEA elevation indicates recurrence with high probability, a normal postoperative CEA is not useful for excluding the probability of recurrence.Different roles of tumor marker monitoring after curative resections of gastric and colorectal cancers.We previously demonstrated that false-positive findings for tumor markers are frequently observed, and that the sensitivity of marker monitoring for early detection of the recurrence is low after curative resection of gastric cancer. The aim of this study was to investigate whether such characters are specific to gastric cancer. Serum carcinoembryonic antigen and/or carbohydrate antigen 19-9 were periodically assessed in 258 patients who underwent curative gastrectomy for gastric cancer (n = 161) or curative resection for colorectal cancer (n = 97). The frequency of false-positive findings for the tumor markers, the sensitivity of the marker monitoring for detection of the recurrence, and the characteristics of such cases were compared between these two cancer groups. During the median follow-up period of 30 months, recurrence developed in 14% of gastric cancer and 23% of colorectal cancer patients. A false positive with the tumor marker was frequently observed in patients after gastrectomy compared with after colorectal surgery. The sensitivity of the marker monitoring regarding early detection of recurrence was higher in patients with colorectal cancer than those with gastric cancer, especially in cases of advanced stage. As a result, the accuracy of marker monitoring for the detection of recurrence was higher in patients after the resection of colorectal cancer than that of gastric cancer. Surgeons and oncologists should thus be aware that the role of the tumor marker monitoring after a curative operation differs between patients with gastric and colorectal cancers.Tumor markers in patients with relapse of colorectal carcinoma.To evaluate CEA and CA19-9 in a long-term follow-up after radical surgery for colorectal cancer.A total of 1,090 patients were operated on for colorectal cancer, 716 patients underwent R0 resection, 631 patients were under further surveillance, relapse was diagnosed in 122 patients (20%), 74 patients were indicated for reoperation The resectability of the relapse was 35%. An AxSYM instrument (Abbott) was used for analysis.At the time of relapse both markers were normal in 31% of the patients. When relapse was diagnosed, in patients with normal preoperative levels, CEA and CA19-9 were below cut-off in 48% and 79%, respectively, and in those with primary elevation, they were again elevated in 78% and 64%, respectively.The surveillance based only on CEA and/or CA19-9 was cost-effective, but failed to disclose 1/3 of patients suffering from relapse; these markers must be combined with liver and chest imaging methods and colonoscopy.A small rise in CEA is sensitive for recurrence after surgery for colorectal cancer.Rise in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) above normal limits can indicate recurrent colorectal cancer. The aim of this study was to evaluate whether a small rise in CEA, even within normal limits was a sensitive indicator of recurrence.150 patients aged 22-87 years were followed up for a mean of 27 months after colorectal surgery with CEA 3 and 6 monthly computerized tomography. We analysed whether a rise in CEA > 1 ng/ml correlated with recurrence of metastases.Forty-six of 139 patients in final analysis had recurrent disease. A rise in CEA > 1 had a predictive value of 74% for recurrence or metastases (sensitivity 80%, specificity 86%). These findings were similar whether or not the CEA was normal preoperatively.If CEA is measured after surgery for colorectal cancer, a rise of >1 in the patient's postoperative value is predictive for recurrence or metastases with an overall sensitivity of 80% and specificity of 86%. Previous studies have recognized the role of large rises in CEA in predicting recurrence but this study shows that small changes in CEA may be significant even if these levels would be traditionally within 'normal' limits.Clinical and pathologic evaluation of patients with recurrence of colorectal cancer five or more years after curative resection.This study was designed to evaluate the characteristics of recurrences that occur five or more years after curative resection for colorectal cancer.This study included a total of 352 patients who were confirmed as having recurrence after curative resection for colorectal cancer during the period from January 1995 to December 2000. Of the 352 patients, 231 had early recurrence (less than 2 years after operation), 103 had intermediate recurrence (2-5 years after operation), and 18 had late recurrence (more than 5 years after operation). The clinicopathologic findings of the patients with late recurrence were compared with those of the other two recurrence groups, with special reference to the pattern of recurrence.The rate of late recurrence was 1.2 percent. In the late recurrence group, males outnumbered females by a ratio of 3.5:1 and the mean level of preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen was 4.5 ng/ml, whereas that of the early recurrence group was 30.5 ng/ml. All the lesions in the cases with late recurrence except one lesion were located in the left colon or rectum, the tumors were small-sized and polypoid, and well-differentiated adenocarcinomas were more frequently observed. Distant metastasis, especially lung metastasis, was most frequently observed.Late recurrent colorectal cancer has some characteristics compared with early or intermediate recurrence. Although recurrence at more than five years postoperatively is not common, its possibility should be considered whenever performing follow-up, and surveillance for lung metastasis is recommended after more than five years of surgery.FDG-PET scan in patients with clinically and/or radiologically suspicious colorectal cancer recurrence but normal CEA.Although frequently used for tumor surveillance, the sensitivity of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) to detect recurrent colorectal cancer (CRC) is not optimal. Fluorine 18-fluoro-2-deoxy-glucose-positron emission tomography (18F FDG-PET) scans promise to improve recurrent CRC detection. We aimed to review PET scans of patients with clinically and/or radiologically suspicious tumor recurrence but normal CEA.A retrospective review of an electronic database of 308 patients with CRC who had PET scans was performed. Only PET studies of patients with normal CEAs and suspected tumor recurrence who had pathological verification were selected for further analysis. Thirty-nine patients met the inclusion criteria.PET was positive in 26 patients (67%) and normal in 13 (33%). Histopathologic evidence of tumor recurrence was seen in 27 of the 39 patients (69%). When correlated with histopathology, PET was true positive in 22 patients, false positive in 4, true negative in 8 and false negative in 5. Overall, the accuracy of PET was 76.9%, negative predictive value (NPV) was 61.5%, and positive predictive value (PPV) was 84.6%. PPV value of PET for liver metastases was 88.8% compared to 73.3% for local recurrence. In two patients with confirmed recurrence, CEA became positive 2 months after PET scan indicating earlier detection of disease with PET. The false positive PET findings were mainly in the bowel and were secondary to acute/chronic inflammation and granulation tissue. In 3 patients with false negative PET, histopathology was consistent with mucinous adenocarcinoma.PET yields high PPV for recurrent CRC, particularly for liver metastases, in spite of normal CEA levels and should be considered early in the evaluation of patients with suspected tumor recurrence.Prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen levels in patients with colorectal cancer.To evaluate the prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen(CEA) levels in colorectal cancer (CRC) patients.425 CRC patients underwent curative resection at our institution. Their pre- and postoperative serum CEA level was classified into two groups according to concentration: normal CEA (<5.0 ng/ml) and abnormal CEA (> or =5.0 ng/ml).Of all patients, abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were observed in 181 (42.6%) and 48 (11.3%) patients, respectively. Abnormal preoperative serum CEA level was significantly correlated with the tumor located in the colon, the depth of tumor invasion, the status of lymph node metastasis, UICC stage, and the presence of postoperative relapse (p < 0.05). Concurrently, an abnormal postoperative serum CEA level was also prominently related to the above corresponding parameters (p < 0.05), except for the tumor location. Patients with a failed conversion of abnormal preoperative value to normal postoperative concentration were found to have the worst overall survival rate. Abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were single independent predictors for survival and postoperative relapse, respectively.The identification of abnormal pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels may be useful in the auxiliary cancer prognosis or postoperative surveillance of CRC patients.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement during follow-up for rectal carcinoma is useful even if normal levels exist before surgery. A retrospective study of CEA values in the TME trial.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a marker in the follow-up after curative resection of colorectal carcinoma (CRC) is often omitted from follow-up despite guideline recommendations. One reason is the assumption that when a normal CEA value exists before curative resection of CRC, it will neither rise during follow-up. This study investigates this relationship.Data were derived from a study initiated to evaluate treatment regimes for rectal carcinoma (Dutch TME trial, n=1861) from which 954 were eligible for analysis. Recurrent disease occurred in 272 of these patients (29.5%). The pre-operative CEA value was compared to CEA values during follow-up, using threshold values of 2.5 and 5.0 ng/ml.Normal pre-operative CEA values were present in 63% (CEA<5.0) and 39% (CEA<2.5) of patients with recurrent disease. Patients with a normal pre-operative CEA and recurrent disease had elevated CEA values during follow-up in 41% (CEA<5.0), 50% (CEA<2.5) and in 60% with both threshold values when the last measurement was done within 3 months before recurrent disease was diagnosed.A normal pre-operative CEA is common in patients with rectal carcinoma. CEA does rise due to recurrent disease in at least 50% of patients with normal pre-operative values. Serial post-operative CEA testing cannot be discarded based on a normal pre-operative serum CEA.Diagnostic accuracy of serum-carcinoembryonic antigen in recurrent colorectal cancer: a receiver operating characteristic curve analysis.Serial measurements of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) are frequently used in the follow-up after colorectal cancer (CRC), but its usefulness remains debatable. Choosing the appropriate cut-off point is crucial to the diagnostic accuracy (DA) of continuous test variables. Receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) analysis is the appropriate statistical method for this purpose, but has not been applied in previous studies.One hundred ninety-four consecutive patients surgically treated with curative intent for CRC between July 1996 and June 1999 had systematic follow-up for five years. Follow-up included imaging, coloscopy and serial CEA measurements. Complete data including CEA measurements were available from 153 patients. ROC analysis of CEA was done with regard to detection of recurrent disease.Depending on the chosen cut-off value of CEA, DA varied widely within the normal range (CEA <or=10 U/ml). CEA >4 U/ml provided the highest sensitivity (0.78) and specificity (0.91), compared to a sensitivity and specificity at the upper normal range (CEA = 10 U/ml) of 0.51 and 0.99, respectively. Thirty-three patients (24%) developed recurrence. Among 11 (5%) asymptomatic patients diagnosed by elevated CEA levels, only two patients (1.5%) were amenable to secondary curative surgery. A threefold increase of CEA in an individual patient had the same DA as the best cut-off value (>4 U/ml).Diagnostic accuracy of CEA in follow-up after curative surgery for CRC is influenced by the chosen cut-off value. A threefold increase of CEA may indicate recurrent disease. The value of serial measurement of CEA was limited.Multivariate analysis of prognostic determinants for colorectal cancer patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels: prognostic value of postoperative serum CEA levels.High preoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels have been well investigated and found to be associated with poor prognosis in patients with colorectal cancer (CRC). However, it has been observed that the outcome varies after curative resection, along with postoperative serum CEA levels; some patients continue to have high postoperative serum CEA levels while postoperative CEA levels return to normal in others. The purpose of this study was to determine the prognostic significance of postoperative serum CEA levels in CRC patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels. Between January 2002 and December 2004, 423 CRC patients underwent operation in our hospital; 181 (42.8%) had high preoperative serum CEA levels and were enrolled in this study. Among the 181 patients, 165 patients had curative resection; the remaining 16 had stage IV disease, so they underwent palliative surgery and were subsequently excluded from analysis. Pre- and postoperative serum CEA levels were measured and analyzed. All patients had curative resection and were divided into two groups according to postoperative serum CEA levels: one group comprised patients with postoperative serum CEA > or = 5 ng/mL (n = 80) and the other group comprised patients with postoperative serum CEA levels < 5 ng/mL (n = 85). Postoperative serum CEA levels were significantly related to location of primary tumors (p = 0.042), lymph node metastases (p = 0.009), TNM stage (p = 0.001), and postoperative relapse (p = 0.004). The results of multivariate analysis showed that both lymph node metastases and high postoperative serum CEA levels (> or = 5 ng/mL) were independent prognostic factors for CRC patients after curative resection. Postoperative serum CEA levels can be a single independent prognostic determinant in CRC patients with high preoperative serum CEA levels. Intensive follow-up and adjuvant therapy may be necessary in CRC patients who continue to have high postoperative serum CEA levels even after curative resection.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen assay in predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, and survival after curative resection of colorectal cancer.We measured carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in peripheral and portal venous blood, and bile from patients with colorectal cancer, to determine its role in predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, and survival.The subjects were 73 patients who underwent curative surgery for colorectal cancer.The median serum, bile, and portal CEA levels were significantly lower in 5-year survivors than in patients in whom hepatic metastases or recurrent disease subsequently developed. The CEA level in portal blood and bile was a good indicator of hepatic metastases, with sensitivity of 92% and 100%, respectively. However, the accuracy of any CEA measurement for predicting hepatic metastases, local recurrence, or 5-year survival did not exceed 70%.None of these CEA measurements is accurate enough to be the basis of a management decision. Thus, we suggest that CEA measurement be used to assist in the prediction of a high risk of the development of hepatic secondaries and that these patients are followed up closely after curative resection.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen and cytokeratins for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of colorectal cancer.To evaluate the efficacy of postoperative serial assay of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and cytokeratins for the detection of recurrent disease in patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma after radical surgery.Between 1993 and 2000, 120 patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma underwent radical surgery in the Department of Surgical Gastroenterology, Federal University of Sao Paulo-Escola Paulista de Medicina, Sao Paulo, Brazil. Periodic postoperative evaluation was performed by assaying markers in peripheral serum, colonoscopy and imaging examination. Presence of CEA was detected using the Delfia method with 5 microg/L threshold, and cytokeratins using the LIA-mat TPA-M Prolifigen method with 72 U/L threshold.In the first postoperative year, patients without recurrent disease had normal levels of CEA (1.5 +/- 0.9 microg/L) and monoclonal tissue polypeptide antigen-M (TPA-M, 64.4 +/- 47.8 U/L), while patients with recurrences had high levels of CEA (6.9 +/- 9.8 microg/L, P < 0.01) and TPA-M (192.2 +/- 328.8 U/L, P < 0.05). During the second postoperative year, patients without tumor recurrence had normal levels of CEA (2.0 +/- 1.8 microg/L) and TPA-M (50.8 +/- 38.4 U/L), while patients with recurrence had high levels of CEA (66.3 +/- 130.8 microg/L, P < 0.01) and TPA-M (442.7 +/- 652.8 U/L, P < 0.05). The mean follow-up time was 22.3 mo. There was recurrence in 23 cases. Five reoperations were performed without achieving radical excision. Rises in tumor marker levels preceded identification of recurrences: CEA in seven (30%) and TPA-M in eleven individuals (48%).Intensive follow-up by serial assay of CEA and cytokeratins allows early detection of colorectal neoplasm recurrence.Imaging techniques contribute to increased surgical rescue of relapse in the follow-up of colorectal cancer.This study analyzes the results of a follow-up policy in colorectal cancer at our institution and evaluates the possible benefit provided by each test performed.Six hundred nineteen patients who had radical surgery and adjuvant treatment for colorectal cancer were followed up with a protocol that included carcinoembryonic antigen testing and clinical examination every three months for the first two years, every four months in the third year, and every six months in the fourth and fifth years. Chest X-ray and colonoscopy were performed yearly for five years and abdominal ultrasound was done every six months for the first three years and yearly afterward. Abdominopelvic computerized tomography was performed yearly for the first two years in cases with rectal cancer. If relapse was detected, all operable cases underwent surgery if possible.Between 1993 and 1999, 619 patients were followed-up. Mean follow-up was 66.9 months. Two hundred eight relapses were detected, 83.6 percent in the first three years and 73 (35.1 percent) underwent surgical resection. Carcinoembryonic antigen testing detected 44.2 percent of recurrences and 31.9 percent of them were operated on. Imaging techniques detected a lower percentage of recurrences (18.7 percent) but were more often resectable: 52 percent and 60 percent of the recurrences detected by computerized tomography and chest X-ray, respectively, underwent surgery. Median overall survival of patients with resected relapse was 62 months, significantly higher than those who were not operable (12.4 months).Imaging techniques in the surveillance of resected colorectal cancer contribute to early detection of relapse with a high proportion of operable metastatic disease.Postoperative surveillance in patients with colorectal cancer who have undergone curative resection: a prospective, multicenter, randomized, controlled trial.Although systematic postoperative surveillance of patients with colorectal cancer has been demonstrated to improve survival, it remains unknown whether a more intensive strategy provides any significant advantage. This prospective, multicenter, randomized, controlled trial was aimed at comparing the efficacy of two different surveillance strategies in terms of both survival and recurrence resectability.Patients with stage II or III colorectal cancer were allocated randomly to either a simple surveillance strategy including clinical evaluation and serum carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring, or an intensive strategy in which abdominal computed tomography or ultrasonography, chest radiograph, and colonoscopy were added.A total of 259 patients were included: 132 were observed according to the simple strategy and 127 were observed according to the intensive strategy. Both groups were similar with respect to baseline characteristics and rate and type of tumor recurrence. After a median follow-up of 48 months, there was no difference in the probability of overall survival in the whole series (hazard ratio [HR] = 0.87; 95% CI, 0.49 to 1.54; P = .62). However, the intensive strategy was associated with higher overall survival in patients with stage II tumors (HR = 0.34; 95% CI, 0.12 to 0.98; P = .045) and in those with rectal lesions (HR = 0.09; 95% CI, 0.01 to 0.81; P = .03), mainly due to higher rate of resectability for recurrent tumors. Colonoscopy was responsible for the detection of the highest proportion (44%) of resectable tumor recurrence in the intensive arm.A more intensive surveillance strategy improves the prognosis of patients with stage II colorectal cancer or those with rectal tumors. Inclusion of regular performance of colonoscopy seems justified up to the fifth year of follow-up, at least.[Usefulness of evaluation of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and soluble fragments of cytokeratin 18-th (TPS) in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer].The aim of this study is to diagnose the evaluation of concentration of CEA and TPS in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer.We measured 178 consecutive patients with histopathologically confirmed colorectal cancer: 101 men and 78 women ages 22-86 (average age 54.7). Markers' CEA nad TPS concentration were evaluated before operation and every month after operation during the first 3 months and then every 3 months during 2 years. Relapse was detected in 47 patients.In postoperative period in non-relapse group the mean (the average) concentration of CEA was 1.92+/-2.03 ng/ml and TPS 65.54+/-33.96 U/l and respectively in relapse group for CEA was 1.92+/-2.03 ng/ml and for TPS 65.54+/-33.96 U/l. The obtained results in investigated group show significantly statistical. The relapse was confirmed by using CEA concentration in 42 patients (89.4%). In case of TPS concentration relapse was confirmed in 38 patients (80.85%). The relapse was detected in 45 patients (95.74) if increase in CEA or TPS concentration was treated as a way of detecting relapse. TPS markers point out that the increase of TPS concentartion may be ahead of relapse symptoms at about 2-6 months.TPS is a useful marker in postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer. The evaluation of TPS concentration allow to diagnose the recurrence of colorectal cancer earlier than by using burden markers--CEA. Common evaluation of TPS and CEA increase sensitivity in detection of relapse in patients with colorectal cancer.Systematic follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer in Norway: a population-based audit of effectiveness, costs, and compliance.In this study, we analyzed the Norwegian guidelines for systematic follow-up after curative colorectal cancer surgery in a large single institution. Three hundred fourteen consecutive unselected patients undergoing curative surgery for colorectal cancer between 1996 and 1999 were studied with regard to asymptomatic curable recurrence, compliance with the program, and cost. Follow-up included carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) interval measurements, colonoscopy, ultrasonography of the liver, and radiography of the chest. In 194 (62%) of the patients, follow-up was conducted according to the Norwegian guidelines. Twenty-one patients (11%) were operated on for curable recurrence, and 18 patients (9%) were disease free after curative surgery for recurrence at evaluation. Four metachronous tumors (2%) were found. CEA interval measurement had to be made most frequently (534 tests needed) to detect one asymptomatic curable recurrence. Follow-up program did not influence cancer-specific survival. Overall compliance with the surveillance program was 66%, being lowest for colonoscopy (55%) and highest for ultrasonography of the liver (85%). The total program cost was 228,117 euro (US 280,994 dollars), translating into 20,530 euro (US 25,289 dollars) for one surviving patient after surgery for recurrence. The total diagnosis yield with regard to disease-free survival after surgery for recurrence was 9%. Compliance was moderate. Whether the continuing implementation of such program and cost are justified should be debated.Postoperative follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer: a combined evaluation of CT scan, colonoscopy and tumour markers.The purpose of this study is to present the experience of our department regarding the importance of the systematic postoperative follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer, early diagnosis and treatment of the recurrence of the disease or a metachronous cancer.In a study that took place between October 2001 and February 2004 amongst 67 patients that were operated upon for colorectal cancer, 41 were systematically being followed up through CT scan, colonoscopy and tumour markers.In the 14th and 18th months postoperatively for 2 of the patients the CT scan showed hepatic metastasis, while the colonoscopy was negative. Regarding the tumour markers, one (CEA) was elevated in one patient while three were elevated in the others. For 2 out of the 41 patients the colonoscopy showed recurrence of the disease within one and two years respectively. The CT scan proved to be free of metastasis and the tumour markers were falling within the normal range for one of the patients while for the other CEA was elevated. Both patients underwent additional colectomy. Postoperative increase of the tumour markers was observed in 9 patients. The above patients had normal markers in the immediate postoperative period. For 4 out of the 9 patients recurrence or spread of the disease was observed while the rest of them are still being followed up.In conclusion, we believe that the systematic postoperative follow-up of the patients with colorectal cancer through CT, colonoscopy and the use of tumour markers contributes decisively to the early diagnosis and treatment of any possible recurrence of the cancer or a metachronous cancer or misdiagnosed concomitant cancer.Cost and effectiveness of follow-up examinations in patients with colorectal cancer resected for cure in a French population-based study.The cost of follow-up examinations for patients having undergone potentially curative surgery for colorectal cancer is considerable. The aim of this study was to provide a thorough assessment of the cost and effectiveness of the follow-up tests used during the 5 years after surgical resection for colorectal cancer and its recurrences. We studied medical and economic data from the records of 256 patients registered in the Herault Tumor Registry who underwent potentially curative surgical resection in 1992. Recurrence, curative recurrence, survival, and the cost of follow-up tests were assessed respectively for at least 5 years. We analyzed the cost and effectiveness of follow-up tests in patients who received either follow-up with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring as advocated by the 1998 French consensus conference recommendations (standard follow-up) or a more minimal follow-up schedule. Nine patients died in the postoperative period. The 5-year survival rates in the standard and minimal follow-up groups were 85% and 79%, respectively (p=0.25). Cost-effectiveness ratios were 2123 in Dukes' stage A patients, 4306 in Dukes' stage B patients, and 9600 in Dukes' stage C patients. Cost-effectiveness ratios for CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography per patient alive in the standard follow-up group were 1238 and 2261.5, respectively. Cost-effectiveness ratios for CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography per patient alive in the minimal follow-up group were 1478 and 573, respectively. There were no survivors 5 years after a recurrence when the recurrence was detected by physical examination, chest X-ray, and colonoscopy in either follow-up group. Dukes' classification is a poor indicator of patient selection. The follow-up tests should only include CEA monitoring and abdominal ultrasonography for the diagnosis of recurrence.Follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal cancer.Individual cutoff levels of carcinoembryonic antigen and CA 242 indicate recurrence of colorectal cancer with high sensitivity.This study was designed to identify the sensitivity and specificity associated with recurrent colorectal cancer, principally hepatic metastases, with individual cutoff levels of carcinoembryonic antigen; identify the corresponding data for CA 50 and CA 242; compare these findings with standard cutoff levels, clinical examinations, and patients' personal health assessments; and identify the time between increasing serum levels and detection of actual relapses, particularly hepatic metastases.A prospective study was performed that included 132 patients with colorectal cancer who underwent surgery with curative intent and who were followed up for a minimum of 5 years. Serum samples were obtained the first two years after surgery. Marker serum levels were analyzed with the commercial Delfia test kit.During the sampling period, carcinoembryonic antigen levels were very high or above the individual cutoff level in 21 of 24 cases with recurrent disease. All eight hepatic metastases detected during the sampling period were indicated by carcinoembryonic antigen 0 to 19 months earlier. In the 3rd postoperative year, nine patients with recurrence were identified, and in eight of them, carcinoembryonic antigen rose above the individual cutoff level 23 months before diagnosis. The overall sensitivity and specificity associated with recurrent disease with individual cutoff levels were 79 and 64 percent for carcinoembryonic antigen, 46 and 77 percent for CA 50, and 63 and 76 percent for CA 242, respectively, which was higher than for any other method compared.With individual cutoff levels, both carcinoembryonic antigen and CA 242 had high sensitivity and acceptable specificity for indicating recurrent colorectal cancer. Because most (29/33) patients with recurrent disease identified within 3 years after surgery and all 8 with hepatic metastases identified during the sampling period were indicated by carcinoembryonic antigen with the individual cutoff, that method was established as the best for postoperative surveillance.CEA and relapse after the operation of colorectal carcinoma.Relapses have an important meaning in relation to the curative surgical intervention. In RO resections according to UICC classification, the local relapses were classified as the most important factor for survival. Without any doubts the most important of these tumor-biological prognostic factors in patients with colorectal carcinoma is the carcino-embryonal antigen. Up to now, the unquestionable importance of the determination of serum levels of CEA for the detection of relapses is most often described.This study is retrospective, not randomized. Analyzed were medical records and data of patients, who underwent the surgery of colorectal carcinoma at IInd Department of Surgery, University Hospital, Faculty of Medicine, Comenius University, Bratislava, in period from January 1st, 1986 to December 31st, 1995. In our analysis we evaluate the age and gender of patients, date of the surgery and type of the surgery from the point of acuteness, as well as radicality, staging of the disease, levels of the serum CEA. Serum levels of carcino-embryonal antigen before operation were determined and evaluated. In patients, who remaind in the monitoring at our department we examine CEA in regular intervals.From our group of patients, in 28 patients the relapse of the disease was determined here. Before the first operation, the preoperative level of CEA was examined in 15 patients and in 13 patients it was not. From 15 patients with examined CEA level, 7 patients (46.7%) had increased and 9 patients (53.3%) normal level. In twenty-seven patients CEA level was examined to reveal a relapse. One patient was diagnosed during the acute surgery and CEA was not determined prior this operation. From the remaining 27 patients, CEA level was positive in 20 patients (74.1%) and 7 patients had normal levels (25.9%). From these 7 patients with normal CEA level, in 5 cases it was locoregional relapse and 2 patients have distant metastases. From all patients, in whom the relapse was determined at our department, in 13 patients locoregional relapse was detected and in 15 patients distant metastases were diagnosed.Due to the sensitivity of serum level of CEA for detection of relapses, which is higher compared to the primary tumor and also to found lead time 4 months we think the postoperative regular determination of CEA in patients after the curative resection is appropriate. Earlier determination of less progressive relapse is definitely important, although the current long-term survival after the surgery for relapses is not optimistic. Development of surgical procedures as well as alternative treatment can bring better results in less developed relapse of the disease. (Ref. 28.).FDG-PET improves the management of patients with suspected recurrence of colorectal cancer.This study aims to assess the influence of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) detection of recurrent disease on the management of patients with colorectal cancer and suspected recurrence. One hundred and twenty patients with suspected recurrence were studied with FDG-PET. Fifty-eight patients were referred for FDG-PET because of the elevation of serum tumour markers. Thirty-one patients were referred because of inconclusive results of conventional imaging modalities. Twenty-five patients had known recurrence and were referred for pre-surgical assessment. Six patients were referred because of abdominal pain. A major management change was considered when, as a consequence of FDG-PET results, medical treatment was changed to surgical, or surgical to medical or to no treatment. A minor management change was considered when changes were made within a treatment modality. Of the 58 patients with elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), FDG-PET detected recurrence and led to a major management change in 34 (58%). Eighteen underwent curative surgery and 16 were treated with systemic therapy. Of the 31 patients evaluated because of inconclusive results of conventional imaging modalities, FDG-PET was positive for recurrence in 24 and negative in seven. A major management change took place in 14 patients (45%). Of the 25 patients evaluated to rule out other sites of disease before surgery, FDG-PET did not show any other site of recurrence in 13 (52%) and showed more lesions in the remaining patients. Major management change took place in eight patients (32%). Overall, in the 120 patients studied, FDG-PET resulted in major management changes in 58 (48%), minor changes in four (3%) and no change in 54 (45%). It can be concluded that FDG-PET has a significant impact on the management of patients with suspected recurrence of colorectal cancer. FDG-PET detection of recurrence frequently allows curative surgical intervention. The early identification of distant metastases may also facilitate the implementation of systemic treatment.Results of long-term follow-up after curative resection of Dukes A colorectal cancer.Patients with Dukes A (UICC I) colorectal cancer have a good prognosis after curative resection. It is not known, however, if the outcome is significantly different for UICC Ia and Ib patients or if patients with reduced risks of recurrences can be identified early after surgery. This is of interest, as it would permit a more cost-effective, patient-oriented, and tumor stage-oriented follow-up program. To study these questions, a prospective follow-up database, including 1375 patients after curative resection of colorectal cancer, was analyzed. A total of 296 patients with Dukes A colorectal cancer with a median follow-up of 44 months were studied. Perioperative and follow-up mortality rates were 3% and 14%, respectively. Recurrent disease developed in 10% of Dukes A patients after a disease-free interval of 16 months. Significantly more patients suffering from pT2 (UICC Ib) cancer had recurrent disease than patients with pT1 (UICC Ia) cancer (13% vs. 4%; p <0.05). Preoperative CEA levels in patients with recurrent disease were significantly higher than in long-term disease-free patients (5.3 +/- 1.8 vs. 3.5 +/- 0.6 ng/ml; p <0.05). Curative resection of recurrent disease was achieved in 38% of the patients with recurrences (4% of all patients). Survival analysis showed significantly better survival in patients with Dukes A cancer than in those at higher tumor stages (log rank, <0.0001), and only 39% of all Dukes A patients who died during follow-up had recurrent disease. Dukes A (UICC Ia and Ib) colorectal cancer was diagnosed in 22% of our patients treated for cure, and long-term survival was 86%. There were significantly fewer cases of recurrent disease after curative resection of UICC Ia (pT1N0M0) cancer, so we propose a novel, less intensive follow-up regimen for these patients, leading to a more cost-effective, patient-oriented, and tumor stage-oriented follow-up program.Usefulness of analytical CEA doubling time and half-life time for overlooked synchronous metastases in colorectal carcinoma.Measurement of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) has been widely applied to detect recurrence, especially of colorectal carcinoma. The validity however, is still controversial. We investigated serial changes in CEA values to calculate whether the CEA doubling time and half-life time could predict metastatic progression or prognosis in colorectal carcinoma.Pre- and post-operative serial serum CEA contents were determined in 22 cases of colorectal cancer with or without metastasis. CEA values were determined by enzyme immunoassay (EIA). Patients were assigned depending upon survival time (within vs. more than 18 months after primary resection) for assessment of CEA doubling time. From the gradient of the semi-logarithmic CEA graph, the preoperative doubling time was calculated and the postoperative half-life time was estimated according to the diagnosis of metastases within 2 years after primary resection [metastasis (+) or (-)].In spite of the effect of curative re-operation of metastatic lesions or of postoperative adjuvant chemotherapy, the CEA doubling time of the groups showed a relation with prognosis (p = 0.045, Student's t-test) when the patients were divided into >18 and < or =18 months survival time. The CEA half-life time of the groups without overlooked metastases was statistically longer than those with (mean +/- SD 8.01 +/- 2.07 and 4.33 +/- 1.11, respectively, p < 0.01, one-factor ANOVA test). Clearance (k) showed a significant difference between the groups (p < 0.001, Student's t-test).The CEA doubling time appeared to be a less independent prognostic factor, whereas prolongation of the CEA half-life time might potentially suggest the existence of overlooked synchronous metastases from colorectal carcinoma.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography as an adjunct to carcinoembryonic antigen in the management of patients with presumed recurrent colorectal cancer and nondiagnostic radiologic workup.The purpose of this study was to determine the role of fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (PET) in localizing disease in patients with colorectal cancer with radiologically occult symptomatology or increases in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level.Two hundred seventy-seven patients with colorectal cancer underwent PET scanning between November 1998 and September 2000 prompted by (1) increasing CEA level and nondiagnostic imaging or (2) symptoms with normal CEA level and nondiagnostic imaging. PET results were correlated with operative findings/histology, clinical follow-up data, and CEA level to determine PET's accuracy in determining the source of symptoms or CEA.Fifteen patients had increasing CEA levels, and 14 had abnormal PET. Two of these 14 were denied exploration because PET suggested widely metastatic disease. Nine patients underwent exploration with curative intent. In 1 patient, recurrence was not pathologically confirmed (false-positive rate, 8%). Two had disease beyond that predicted by PET, and 6 underwent complete resection and normalized their CEA levels. Four symptomatic patients with normal CEA levels and negative x-rays had abnormal PET; at exploration, 3 had no evidence of recurrence.PET imaging can often accurately localize the source of radiologically occult increases in CEA level and select that subset of patients eligible for therapeutic laparotomy. Symptomatic, PET-positive patients with normal CEA levels frequently undergo nontherapeutic laparotomy, and PET findings should be interpreted with caution in these patients.CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 in patients surviving colorectal cancer without recurrent disease.To establish a baseline and intraindividual fluctuations of the tumour markers CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 in patients cured from colorectal cancer, and to test the hypothesis that serum concentrations and intraindividual fluctuations do not differ from the concentrations in cancer-free individuals.Ninety patients with colorectal cancer, who had undergone surgery with curative intent, were still alive at least 5 years after surgery with no signs of recurrent disease. Serum levels of tumour markers CEA, CA 50 and CA 242 before and up to 2 years after surgery were analysed after the prospective study was terminated.The pre-operative serum levels of CEA, CA 50 and CEA 242 were elevated in 36%, 16% and 20% of the patients. They were lowered after curative surgery. A small increase of CEA levels was found after the initial post-operative decrease. The intraindividual fluctuations for CA 50 and CA 242 did not exceed 15% but in 24% of the patients the serum levels of CA 50 were high and oscillating. The patients cured from Dukes > C cancer had higher serum concentrations of CEA than patients who had a Dukes > B cancer, which were higher than in patients who had Dukes > A cancer. Concentrations of CA 242 were higher in patients cured from Dukes > A than patients cured from Dukes> B or C cancers.During the first 2 years after curative surgery for colorectal cancer the serum levels of CEA did not differ from those levels in normal cancer-free subjects. The serum levels of CEA were related to Dukes > staging whereas the levels of CA 242 were inversely related to Dukes > staging.Carcinoembryonic antigen for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of colorectal cancer.During recent years a discussion about cost-effectiveness and importance of follow-up determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) after curative resection of large bowel cancer has developed.Between 1990 and 1998 follow-up CEA levels of 1,321 patients after curative colorectal cancer resection were prospectively collected in cooperation with family physicians, CEA determinations were made with different assays by various laboratories. The reported findings were adjusted for the different methods used.306 patients developed recurrent disease following curative cancer resection (23.2% of all patients). Regarding the role of follow-up CEA determination, they were divided into: I. no preoperative CEA determination/insufficient follow-up (N = 47); II. no elevation of CEA with primary cancer, a) elevation with recurrent disease (N = 62), b) no elevation at any time point (N = 53), c) role of CEA not completely elucidated (N = 41); III. elevated CEA levels with primary cancer, a) no increase with recurrent disease (N = 21), b) increase with other symptoms of recurrent disease (N = 45), c) increased levels as early symptom of recurrent disease (N = 37). 30 patients (9.8% of all patients with recurrent disease; 2.3% of all patients) with increased CEA levels at the time of recurrent disease underwent surgical resection with curative intention (R0 resection).Our findings indicate that up to 47% of the patients with recurrent disease and 11% of all patients (N = 144, groups IIa + IIIb + IIIc) could benefit from routine follow-up CEA determinations after curative colorectal cancer resection. Nonetheless, only 2.3% of all patients with elevated CEA levels underwent R0 resection of recurrent disease. Despite these detection and R0 resectability rates, CEA plays a crucial role in the early detection of recurrent disease and remains an important part of routine patient care after curative resection of colorectal cancer.Can postoperative surveillance with serial CEA immunoscintigraphy detect resectable rectal cancer recurrence and potentially improve tumor-free survival?This study was performed to determine if postoperative serial monitoring of rectal cancer patients can be performed with an immunoscintigraphic imaging test for carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). It was also of interest to assess whether this test, in combination with standard monitoring procedures used in an intensive surveillance plan, can result in the identification of surgically salvageable patients.Forty consecutive resected Dukes' B and C rectal cancer patients underwent a prospective, single-institution, surveillance trial of physical examination (including digital rectal examination), endoscopy, CT of the abdomen and pelvis, liver ultrasound, chest x-ray, blood CEA, and CEA immunoscintigraphy with arcitumomab (CEA-Scan, Immunomedics, Morris Plains, NJ) every 6 months for the first 2 years and every 12 months for the next 3 years after initial operation. Outcomes were compared with those from a similar group of 69 patients treated previously at the same institution but without CEA imaging.A total of 219 CEA imaging studies were performed without any significant adverse effects or immune responses, and resulted in lesion sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive and negative predictive values of 94.1%, 97.5%, 97.3%, 76.2%, and 99.5%, respectively. Of the 40 patients, 16 developed 22 surgically confirmed local or distant recurrences, and CEA imaging correctly disclosed 82% of these lesions pre-operatively. All of the patients found to have recurrences had at least one tumor site by CEA imaging; only 6 of 16 had elevated blood CEA titers. On a patient-basis, there was a sensitivity of 100%, a specificity of 79.2%, an accuracy of 87.5%, and positive and negative predictive values of 76.2% and 100%, respectively. The potential therapeutic benefit of serial arcitumomab imaging is suggested by the fact that 6 of 16 patients (37.5%) with recurrence underwent potentially curative second-look operations, compared with 6 of 69 (8.7%) of a comparable population studied at this institution during an earlier 6-year period, using all of the same tests except CEA imaging. None of the patients in this historic control group survived more than 21 months, although the mean survival of the six patients resected for cure in the study population was 35 months (range 11 to 69 months). During 6 years of followup, three of the six re-resected patients eventually died of cancer recurrence, two died from other causes (and were confirmed by necropsy to be tumor-free), and one patient is still free of disease in the sixth year. CEA scanning appeared to be more predictive of recurrence than blood CEA testing or other diagnostic modalities.Arcitumomab inclusion in intensive surveillance of patients with resected rectal cancer can disclose tumor recurrence at a stage that allowed surgical salvage therapy in 37.5% of the 16 patients with recurrence who had second-look surgery, and in 19% the patients were free of disease during longterm followup. This pilot study suggests that a randomized prospective trial comparing standard surveillance procedures to the use of CEA imaging added thereto should be undertaken.Is (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography in recurrent colorectal cancer a contribution to surgical decision making?Accuracy of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) and contribution to surgical decision making in recurrent or metastatic colorectal cancer were evaluated.One hundred whole-body PET tests in colorectal cancer patients (1994 to 1998) were compared with computed tomography (CT), liver ultrasonography, and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) test. Mean follow-up was 12 months.Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of FDG-PET for malignant findings were, respectively, 98%, 90% and 95%; for 87 CT scans, 91%, 72%, and 82%; for 98 CEA tests, 76%, 90%, and 82%; for detection of liver metastases with PET, 100%, 99%, and 99%; and for 68 ultrasound tests, 87%, 96%, and 93%. PET accuracy for local recurrence was 96%. Additional information was provided by PET in 86% of cases (abdomen, thorax, liver). PET influenced surgical decisions in 61% of cases.FDG-PET adds relevant accuracy to the conventional staging of patients with colorectal cancer and may cost-effectively help to select the appropriate treatment.The role of carcinoembryonic antigen for the detection of recurrent disease following curative resection of large-bowel cancer.During recent years, a discussion about cost-effectiveness and importance of follow-up evaluation after curative resection of large-bowel cancer has developed. It is not known whether the determination of carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) plays a crucial role in the early detection of recurrent disease.We conducted an analysis of the prospective follow-up database of 1321 patients after curative resection of colorectal cancer in our institution between 1990 and 1998 to evaluate the role of CEA in the early detection of recurrent disease.Of the 1321 patients included in our study, 306 developed recurrent disease following curative resection (23.2%). These patients with recurrent disease were divided into: Group I. No pre-operative CEA determination/insufficient follow-up (n=47; 15.4%). Group II. No elevation of CEA with primary cancer (n=156; 51.0%): (IIa) elevation with recurrent disease (n=62); (IIb) no elevation at any time point (n=53); and (IIc) role of CEA not completely elucidated (n=41). Thirteen patients of group II underwent curative relapse surgery (8.3%). Group III. Elevated CEA with primary cancer (n=103; 33.7%): (IlIa) no increase with recurrent disease (n=21); (IIIb) increase with other symptoms of recurrent disease (n=45); and (IIIc) increased values as an early symptom of recurrent disease (n=37). Sixteen patients of group III underwent curative relapse surgery (15.5%). In patients after relapse surgery, recurrent disease developed again after a median time of 12 months (mean 17.9+/-3.8 months).Our findings indicate that 2.8% of all patients (12.1% of patients with recurrent disease) who underwent curative resection of colorectal cancer profit from follow-up CEA determinations. With careful observation of CEA kinetics, 6.2% (n=82) of all patients or 26.8% of patients with recurrent disease could profit from routine follow-up CEA determinations. In 9.5% of patients with recurrent disease, curative resection of relapse was achieved and these patients remained disease free for a median time of 12 months. Regular CEA measurements remain an important part of routine patient care after curative resection of colorectal cancer.Is intensive follow-up really able to improve prognosis of patients with local recurrence after curative surgery for rectal cancer?Because more than 90% of local recurrences after curative surgery for rectal cancer appear within the first 36 months after surgery, an intensive and strict follow-up program during this period could improve early diagnosis and, thus, prognosis of patients.Of the 216 patients who underwent surgery for rectal cancer, 127 entered an intensive follow-up program (median follow-up: 42 months); the clinical outcome of the remaining 89 patients was reconstructed with the help of their general practitioners.Fifty eight (26.8%) of the 216 patients who were treated with curative surgery alone developed a local recurrence; pelvic recurrences were prevalent. Eleven (30.5%) of the 36 patients who had recurrence during follow-up, and 6 of the 22 who had not undergone follow-up, had a reoperation with curative intent; the median survival was 19 months vs. 8 months, respectively (P = ns). Four (44.4%) curative reoperations were performed on the 9 asymptomatic patients and in 13 (26.5%) of the 49 cases with symptomatic local recurrences. Median survival was 15 months vs. 14 months, respectively (P = n.s). All patients except one (living after 42 months from reoperation) died within 48 months.In our study, adherence to a strict follow-up program unfortunately proved to be ineffective for improving long-term survival for patients who underwent reoperation with curative intent.CEA, TPS, CA 19-9 and CA 72-4 and the fecal occult blood test in the preoperative diagnosis and follow-up after resective surgery of colorectal cancer.In a prospective clinical study we examined the diagnostic procedures used in the preoperative diagnosis of colorectal cancer patients (n = 176) and the value of supplementation of standard diagnostic methods (clinical investigation, colonoscopy, barium enema, ultrasound, computer tomography) with a test for occult fecal blood (FOBT) and an expanded tumor marker panel (CA 19-9, TPS and CA 72-4 in addition to CEA) in the postoperative follow-up (n = 116, mean follow-up 21 months). Preoperative diagnosis based on colonoscopy/barium enema, followed by histology and the imaging methods, in most cases US and/or CT. Patients with postoperative stage Dukes D and after palliative surgery were excluded from the follow-up study (n = 43). The patients were seen every three months (clinical investigation, US, CT, tumor markers, FOBT) within the first two postoperative years and every half a year thereafter. 83 of the 116 patients (16%) developed a recurrent disease and 5 of them could be reoperated with curative intention. In addition to the 19 patients 14 simultaneously admitted patients with recurrence of colorectal cancer (total n = 33) were studied. The results of our study analyzing the sensitivity and specificity of colonoscopy, tumor, markers and the FOBT in the preoperative and postoperative phases as well as in the diagnosis of recurrent disease of colorectal cancer confirms the view that FOBT and tumor markers cannot replace endoscopic and imaging methods. However they support the concept, that diagnosis and follow-up of colorectal cancer should be based on a combination of clinical investigation and imaging methods (US, CT etc. and endoscopic and/or x-ray examination) with supplementation by FOBT and determination of tumor markers, mainly CEA. In the case a patient is asking for prognostic and recurrence information as early and as valid as possible we currently recommend the following procedure for the first two years after surgery: every three months the determination of tumor markers, FOBT as well as ultrasound of the upper abdomen and CT of the lower abdomen and every half year a total colonoscopy. The question of whether this program will also have a therapeutical relevance depends on several factors like the personal experience and concepts of the consulting surgeons and oncologists and also on the tasks and duties which are considered worthy by the patient for his further life if confronted with the diagnosis of recurrent colorectal cancer.Should carcinoembryonic antigen be used in the management of patients with colorectal cancer?The contribution of carcinoembryonic antigen carcinoembryionic antigen for the effective management of colorectal cancer patients remains a controversial issue. The aim of this study is to attempt to get some valid answers to its function in the diagnosis, prognosis, and overall management of colorectal cancer patients.A retrospective review of colorectal cancer patients managed and prospectively registered by the authors between 1985 and 1998 was performed. Serum carcinoembryionic antigen levels were determined preoperatively in 209 patients with primary colorectal cancer and postoperatively in 196 patients who had undergone curative resection of their tumors, according to a fixed schedule. A maximum value of 5 ng/ml was accepted as being normal. With the exception of endoscopy, all other diagnostic techniques were only used after an abnormal carcinoembryionic antigen result (a raised value found twice consecutively).carcinoembryionic antigen preoperative values were raised only in 40 percent of patients and were related to disease stage, with the highest values found in patients with Stage IV disease. However, an elevated preoperative carcinoembryionic antigen value had a very marked prognostic importance, with a statistically significant difference in survival curves (Kaplan-Meier); the same was valid for curatively resected patients (Stages I, II, and III) and for Stages II and III patients considered separately. Multivariate analysis using the Cox proportional hazards technique confirmed these results, showing preoperative carcinoembryionic antigen to have an independent prognostic value, with a relative risk of recurrence of 3.74 for patients with raised preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen levels. In postoperative follow-up, carcinoembryionic antigen elevation was found to be a very accurate marker of recurrence (sensitivity, 77 percent; specificity, 98 percent), mainly in liver metastasis (sensitivity, 100 percent), and the best marker of asymptomatic recurrence (63 percent of cases). However, carcinoembryionic antigen's impact on overall survival was negligible because of the poor results of surgical treatment of recurrences.Preoperative carcinoembryionic antigen is a very important prognostic indicator and should be considered in future trials. Postoperative carcinoembryionic antigen elevation is a very sensitive marker of recurrence and even of asymptomatic recurrence, but its impact on overall survival does not seem to be relevant. Nevertheless, carcinoembryionic antigen should continue to be used in colorectal cancer patients until better methods of diagnosis and treatment of recurrence are developed.The relationship between prognosis and CEA-dt after hepatic resection in patients with colorectal carcinomas.CEA-doubling time (CEA-dt) was calculated by measuring serum CEA at two voluntary points. As CEA-dt is correlated with tumour doubling time the growth rate of liver metastasis could be determined. We investigated the relationship between CEA-dt and prognosis to determine the indications for resection of liver metastasis.We examined 334 patients diagnosed with resected liver metastasis of colorectal carcinoma. Patients were divided into three categories based on CEA-dt; Group A, CEA-dt <30 days; Group B, 30 days </=cCEA-dt <80 days; and Group C, CEA-dt >/=s80 days. Clinicopathological parameters, the 3-year or 5-year survival rate and the rate of recurrence were compared among the three groups.In Group A, the survival time after hepatic resection was significantly shorter compared to the other groups. Furthermore, multiple liver metastasis showed slightly reduced CEA-dt levels compared with solitary metastasis, but even in patients with solitary liver metastasis, the rate of survival was poor. In 70% of Group A patients, recurrent tumour was recognized within 1 year of hepatic resection.When surgery for liver metastasis of colorectal cancer is considered. Group A patients should be recognized as having a poor prognosis and a high rate of recurrence after hepatic resection, and CEA-dt should be employed as a prognostic factor.Carcinoembryonic antigen: its value in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer.We examined the value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring for detecting treatable recurrence of colorectal carcinoma. CEA assays were undertaken in 193 patients over a 2-year period. The levels in 34 patients were raised in one or more assays above the laboratory-defined upper limit of normal; 31 cases were reviewed retrospectively. In 10% of patients there were Dukes' A lesions at the initial resection, in 39% Dukes' B, and in 52% Dukes' C1 or C2. Tumours were rectal in 61%. Median follow-up was 3 years (range, 16 years-2 months). In 23 of 31 (74%) there were symptoms or signs of recurrent disease prior to or simultaneously with an observed rise in CEA; in 8 the CEA rise preceded the onset of symptoms or the appearance of signs. Of the 31 cases 26 underwent investigation for recurrent disease, but in only 6 of these was the investigation driven by the observed rise in CEA rather than the onset of symptoms or presence of signs. Three of these six were false-positive results (50%), one has been lost to follow-up, and two had confirmed recurrence. Neither of the two with recurrence had operable disease. One of the two had no further treatment, and one underwent laparotomy at which multiple peritoneal seedlings were found. In both of the two cases going to laparotomy, one of which was prompted by a high CEA, widely disseminated disease was found. Over a 2-year period, serial CEA measurement thus yielded no patient benefit.Is carcino-embryonic antigen useful in the follow-up management of patients with colorectal liver metastases?The role of carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) in monitoring early detection of recurrent or metastatic colorectal cancer, and its impact on resectability rate and patient survival remains controversial. Our objective was to determine any association between the preoperative level of CEA and prognosis, and the resectability and survival by method of diagnosis of colorectal hepatic metastases.We analyzed patients who underwent exploration for hepatic resection for metastatic colorectal cancer over a 15-year period. The patient population consisted of those patients who had undergone primary colon or rectal resection and were followed up with serial CEA levels and of patients who were followed up with physical examination, liver function tests (LFTs) or computed tomography (CT) of the abdomen and pelvis that led to the diagnosis of liver metastases. Also included in the study were patients who were diagnosed with liver metastases at the time of the primary colon or rectal resection and underwent planned hepatic resection at a later time.Three hundred and one (301) patients who underwent a total of 345 planned hepatic resections for metastatic colorectal cancer between January 1978 and December 1993 were included in this analysis. The median preoperative CEA level was 24.8 ng/mL in the resected group, 53.0 ng/mL in the incomplete resection group, and 49.1 ng/mL in the nonresected group (P = 0.02). More of the patients who had a preoperative CEA < or =30 ng/mL were in the resected group, while those who had a preoperative CEA >30 ng/mL were likely to be in the nonresected group (P = 0.002). The median survival was 25 months for patients with a preoperative CEA level < or =30 ng/mL and 17 months for patients with a preoperative CEA >30 ng/mL (P = 0.0005). The resectability rate and the survival of patients by method of diagnosing liver metastases-rising CEA versus history and physical, elevated LFTs, CT scan versus diagnosis at the time of primary resection-was not significant (P = 0.06 and P = 0.19, respectively). Given the nonstandardized retrospective nature of the study cohort and relative small groups of patients, the power to detect small differences in survival by method of diagnosis is limited. In the complete resection group of patients with unilobar liver disease (5-year survival of 28.8%) there was no difference in survival between those patients who had normal preoperative CEA and those who had elevated preoperative CEA, and approximately 90% of them had an abnormal preoperative serum CEA level.CEA is useful in the preoperative evaluation of patients with hepatic colorectal metastases for assessing prognosis and is complimentary to history and physical examination in the diagnosis of liver metastases. Patients with colorectal liver metastases and preoperative CEA < or =30 ng/mL are more likely to be resectable, and they have the longest survival.[The pre- and postoperative monitoring of the immunological indices and tumor markers in colorectal carcinoma].The onset of immunological reaction against colorectal carcinoma is based on superficial changes in the malignant cell components following the formation of antigen structures. This explains the interest in the issue and defines the aim of the study. Over a 5-year period, in the Emergency Surgery Clinic, 86 patients with histologically diagnosed colorectal carcinoma (46 men and 40 women) are examined prior to surgery, and 107 patients (55 men and 52 women)--after the operation. The tumor markers CEA, CA 19-9, AFP and immunoglobulin IgA are tested using ELISA and RIA methods. Conventional ultrasound, scintigraphic and CT studies are carried out to detect liver metastases. The obtained results undergo statistical processing with correlation analysis and sensitivity and specificity coefficients. Among those examined preoperatively elevated CEA levels (CEA > 2.5 ng/ml) are recorded in 42 cases (48.9%), and for CA 19-9 (CA 19-9 > 37 E/ml)--in 40 (46.5%). From the patients with complicated colorectal carcinoma in the postoperative period 83 are clinically healthy (77.6%); of the latter marker-positive are 16 (19.3%), and marker-negative--67 (80.7%). Relapses and metastases are registered in 24 cases (22.4%) of which marker-positive--19 (79.2%). Liver and abdominal lymph node metastases are detected by US, scintigraphy and CT study. All three imaging methods contribute to diagnose liver metastases in 14 patients (13%). In 32 patients (18 men and 14 women) postsurgical monitoring of immunological IgA levels and tumor markers is done over period ranging from 7-10 days to 2 years postoperatively. Correlative dependences between IgA and CEA (R = +0.99), and between IgA and CA 19-9 (R = +0.97) are also documented. The sensitivity of both markers (CEA and CA 19-9) is low, varying between 38 and 51 per cent, with specificity amounting to 61-67 per cent. The paradoxically high elevation of tumor markers prior to operation shows a constant decrease at 3 months after surgery.1. The sensitivity of both markers (CEA and CA 19-9) is low (38-51%), and that is why their use in screening examinations lacks clinical relevance. 2. CEA specificity is by no means high (61-67%), and it may become positive in a number of nononcological diseases (liver cirrhosis and hepatitis, inflammation diseases of GIT and lungs). 3. Plasma CEA and CA 19-9 levels correlate well with the neoplastic process progression/regression. 4. Preoperative CEA level has a prognostic value for postsurgical relapses. 5. High IgA levels are indicators for relapses or metastases from colorectal carcinoma. 6. Tumor histological verification correlates also with the high CEA levels and with the depth of tumor infiltration into the intestinal wall. 7. The dynamic assessment of tumor markers postoperatively has a high informative value in all colorectal carcinoma patients. 8. Pre- and postoperative high CEA levels are observed in patients assigned to the poor prognosis group, and should be given adjuvant therapy.Monitoring carcinoembryonic antigen in colorectal cancer: is it still useful?The results of a study conducted to determine the usefulness of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring in the follow-up of patients with resected colorectal cancer are reported herein. The subjects of this study were 125 patients in whom CEA had been determined preoperatively and 239 patients in whom CEA had been monitored postoperatively. The results revealed increased preoperative CEA in only 24% of the subjects, and that this increment was correlated with subsequent more advanced tumor stage and a higher recurrence rate (P < 0.01). The postoperative CEA level exceeded the threshold in 71% of the patients affected by recurrence, 94.4% of whom developed liver metastases and 50%, nonhepatic recurrence. This marker showed elevated sensitivity for liver metastases (99%), whereas the sensitivity was lower for nonhepatic recurrence of the disease (94%). Thus, we concluded that CEA monitoring can be useful for preoperative colorectal tumor grading, even if its validity in the early diagnosis of recurrence is problematic, especially in terms of radical repeated surgery and survival.[Increased carcinoembryonic antigen and absence of recurrence in monitoring colorectal cancer].Carcinoembryonic antigen has been used to monitor colorectal cancer treated patients, elevated carcinoembryonic antigen allows to predict recurrence however some serum levels is not ever a sign of disease. In a last paper 21% of the colorectal cancer patients treated surgically had not recurrent disease. The aim of the study was to follow these patients for at least one year. Thirty two patients with elevated carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels were studied. Five were excluded and 27 were followed with chest RX, computadorized tomography and colonoscopy. Carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels were measured by ELISA using Sorine Biomedica kit (normal value: 5 ng/ml). Eleven patients (41%) developed recurrence, seven had liver metastasis. The mean time among the elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen and the recurrence was 6.6 months. The recurrence was not observed in 18 patients, the carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels become normal in eight and in the eight others the carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels persisted elevated. Carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels can be elevated before the diagnosis of recurrence, mostly in liver metastasis, however, a number of patients with elevated carcinoembryonic antigen serum levels do not have a known cause.Serum and tissue CEA in colorectal cancer: clinical relevance.This article is an analysis of the information derived from the determination of tumor-tissue concentration of CEA in patients with colorectal cancer. To ascertain the relationship between tumor marker content with the histologic aspects and serologic levels of CEA of this neoplam.136 patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma and 41 with colorectal benign processes are analyzed and followed during an average time of 27 months. The CEA of the serum were obtained preoperatively and postoperatively and measured by radioimmunoassay (RIA). Tissular CEA levels were determined with RIA. The histological characteristics are analyzed (Dukes classification, grade of differentiation, index of atypia, microscopic vascular and lymphatic involvement.1) The cut off point of the tissular CEA with the best sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of normal mucosa is 386 ng/mg and for tumoral tissue is 1160 ng/mg. 2) There is no correlation between tissue and serologic CEA value. 3) The tissular level of CEA have a significant statistical correlation with Dukes stage (p < 0.003); other histological characteristics were no significative. 4) There are significant statistical correlations between serologic CEA and relapse but no with survival rates.1) Serologic CEA levels depend on numerous factors. 2) There aren't correlations between preoperative serologic levels and tissular CEA levels. 3) Tissular CEA do not predict what patients will have an elevated serologic CEA level in relapse.Postsurgical surveillance of colon cancer: preliminary cost analysis of physician examination, carcinoembryonic antigen testing, chest x-ray, and colonoscopy.This study is the first to examine the relative and absolute costs of physician examination, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assessment, chest x-ray, and colonoscopy in detecting recurrent disease in patients who have undergone surgical resection for primary colon carcinoma.Of the 1356 Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group patients in Intergroup Protocol 0089 who underwent surgical resection for Dukes' B2 and C colon carcinoma, 421 patients who developed recurrent disease were reviewed. Follow-up testing was performed according to protocol guidelines, with the cost of each test equal to 1995 Medicare reimbursement. Follow-up was defined as the time to recurrence for the 421 patients in whom disease recurred (mean 18.6 months) or up to 5 years for the additional 930 patients in whom disease did not recur (mean 38.6 months). Patients were divided into three categories: nonrecurrent, recurrent but not resectable, and recurrent but resectable with curative intent. The estimated mean cost of each test in detecting group 3 (recurrent but resectable) patients was calculated.Of the 421 patients who developed recurrent disease, 96 underwent surgical resection of their disease with curative intent (group 3). For group 3 patients, the first indication of recurrent disease was CEA testing (30), chest x-ray (12), colonoscopy (14), and other (40). Of the 40 "other" patients, 24 presented with symptoms. Routine physician examination, however, failed to identify a single resectable recurrence, and the total cost for physician examination was $418,615. The detection rate for CEA testing was 2.2%, the total cost was $170,880, and the cost per recurrence was $5,696. The detection rate for chest x-ray was 0.9%, the total cost was $120,934, and the cost per recurrence was $10,078. The detection rate of colonoscopy was 1%, the total cost was $641,344, and the cost per recurrence was $45,810.CEA measurement was the most cost-effective test in detecting potentially curable recurrent disease. Physician visits were useful only in the evaluation of symptoms; a routine physician examination had no added benefit.Value of postoperative surveillance after radical surgery for colorectal cancer: results of a cohort study.Early detection of recurrence after curative resection for primary colorectal cancer should improve patients' prognosis. However, the usefulness of postoperative surveillance programs has not been clarified yet. The present cohort study was aimed at assessing the effectiveness of systematic follow-up in patients with colorectal cancer who were operated on for cure, regarding both rate of tumor recurrence amenable to curative-intent surgery and rate of survival.One hundred ninety-nine colorectal cancer patients who underwent radical primary surgery were followed according a well-defined postoperative surveillance program, which consisted of laboratory studies (including serum carcinoembryonic antigen assay) every three months, physical examination and abdominal ultrasound or computed tomography every six months, and chest radiograph and total colonoscopy once per year. Cohorts were defined according to patients' compliance with the proposed follow-up program. A multivariate regression model was constructed to predict survival.One hundred forty patients were considered to be compliant with the surveillance program, whereas the remaining 59 patients occasionally attended follow-up investigations or did not comply at all. Although there were no differences in the overall recurrence rate (38 vs. 41 percent; P = 0.52), curative-intent reoperation was possible in 18 patients (34 percent) of those with tumor recurrence in the compliant cohort but in only 3 patients (12 percent) in the noncompliant cohort (P = 0.05). Similarly, the probability of survival was higher in the compliant cohort, both regarding overall (63 vs. 37 percent at 5 years; P < 0.001) and cancer-related (69 vs. 49 percent at 5 years; P < 0.02) rates. Cox regression analysis disclosed that only a more advanced TNM stage (odds ratio, 8.17; 95 percent confidence interval, 1.13-59.29) and noncompliance with the postoperative surveillance program (odds ratio, 2.32; 95 percent confidence interval, 1.50-3.60) had an independent negative impact on survival.Systematic postoperative surveillance in patients with colorectal cancer who were operated on for cure increases both the rate of tumor recurrence amenable to curative-intent surgery and rate of survival.CEA as a prognostic index in colorectal cancer.The carcinoembryonic antigen, CEA, is the tumor marker most used in colorectal patients, principally during follow up after radical surgery. High serum CEA level before surgery is often associated with worse prognosis, in some studies.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen levels (CEA) and the frequency of recurrence.Eighty-three patients with colorectal cancer at Dukes stages A, B or C were evaluated retrospectively. The patients follow up was at least two years or to death. CEA was determined in serum by enzyme immunoassay (Sorin Biomedica), normal value 0.5ng/ml.Disease recurrence was observed in 32 patients (38.5%), 13 Dukes B and 19 Dukes C. Seventy five per cent of the patients with CEA higher than 10ng/ml relapsed and 80% of the patients without recurrence had normal CEA. Disease recurrence in patients with preoperative elevated CEA occurred during the first year of follow up in 56% of the patients.Although the tumor stage is today the most valuable prognostic variable in colorectal cancer, the preoperative CEA value can provide some additional information in the prognosis of the patient.[Value of oncologic follow-up of patients operated for colorectal cancer. A prospective study of 1000 patients].The purpose of our prospective study was to evaluate the contribution of follow-up in resected colorectal cancer.One-thousand patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma who underwent radial resection from January 1975 to January 1990 were prospectively divided into two groups: the first group (n = 442, 42%) entered a 5-year follow-up protocol and the second group (n = 558, 56%) was free to make unscheduled visits in case of symptoms.Recurrence was found in 31.5% of the patients in the first group compared with 33% in the second group. Chorioembryonic antigen was the most accurate test detecting recurrence: 77% of the cases (97% for hepatic metastasis). Surgical resection of recurrent tumors was performed in 37% of the group 1 patients (curative resection in 15%) and in 9% (curative resection in 1.5%) of the group 2 patients (p < 0.001). 5-year survival after recurrence in group 1 was 11.5% versus 1% in group 2 (p < 0.01).These results emphasize the rational for a follow-up program in patients undergoing surgery for colorectal cancer.An evaluation of postoperative follow-up tests in colon cancer patients treated for cure.Currently patients with colon cancer who are potentially cured by surgery are followed periodically with physical examinations, blood tests and imaging studies to detect tumor recurrence early, on the presumption that intervention can effect outcome. There is little information to indicate whether frequent visits to the doctor's office or frequent testing improves survival or quality of life.Ninety-eight patients with resected stage B2, B3 or C (modified Astler-Coller) colon cancer who developed recurrent disease while enrolled in prospective adjuvant trials at Mayo Clinic sponsored by the North Central Cancer Treatment Group were studied to evaluate the utility of follow-up tests to detect the first recurrence of colon cancer and the outcome following various interventions for these recurrences. These patients had a history, physical examination, complete blood count, chemistry panel and chest x-ray approximately every 3-4 months in the 1st year and then every 6-12 months thereafter for a total of 5 years. Bowel evaluation was done at 6 months, 12 months and annually thereafter. In addition, a minority of patients had carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) testing, and radioisotope liver scans at various intervals.Symptoms signaled the diagnosis of recurrent disease in 55 patients, physical examination in 4 patients, and abnormalities in chest x-ray in 18 patients. An elevated CEA was the initial abnormal test in 5 patients, abnormal liver scans in 5 patients, elevated liver function tests in 6 patients and laparotomy for other reasons in 2 patients. Hemoglobin, barium enema, and fecal blood testing were useful in 1 patient each. Thirty-one percent of recurrences were diagnosed between scheduled visits. In our series, histories, physical examinations, and chest x-rays led to the detection of 79% of the recurrences while liver function tests, liver scans and CEAs led to the detection of 16% of recurrences. Sixteen patients underwent resection for cure for their first recurrence; the diagnosis of recurrence was signaled by symptoms in 6 patients, chest x-ray in 6 patients and abnormal liver function tests, CEA, hemoglobin, and laparotomy for colostomy closure in 1 patient each.The majority of tumor recurrences were detected by symptoms, physical examinations and chest x-rays. Testing for asymptomatic tumor recurrences during the 1st follow-up year is likely to be much less fruitful for detecting resectable recurrences than testing patients in the 2nd through 4th follow-up years. Patients who had a disease recurrence in the 1st postoperative year were less likely to be candidates for curative intent surgery. Lower tumor grade at initial diagnosis correlated both with likelihood of undergoing secondary surgical resection and the chance of doing well following this. These data may be helpful for defining more appropriate follow-up test for detection of tumor recurrence in patients with resected colon cancer.The miniscule benefit of serial carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring after effective curative treatment for primary colorectal cancer.Serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels have been recommended to detect asymptomatic recurrent colorectal cancer and to facilitate curative additional therapy. This study was designed to investigate the outcome of additional treatment for recurrent cancer in patients undergoing primary colorectal cancer treatment in a specialty center and subsequent relapsing with an elevation in serum CEA.Patients treated for their primary cancers at our institution whose followup included CEA monitoring and whose cancers subsequently recurred, were analyzed from a prospective database of almost 1,900 patients. CEA levels of > or = 5 ng/mL were considered elevated for purposes of treatment results. One hundred sixty-three patients were suitable for analysis. Median followup before and after recurrence was 14 months and 16 months, respectively.Fifty patients were able to undergo complete resection of their recurrence, and 26 of these patients are without evidence of recurrence at last followup. Two-thirds of recurrences were associated with an elevation of CEA; this elevation at recurrence was associated with decreased survival (p < 0.05, Kaplan Meier). Of the 109 patients with an elevation of CEA at recurrence, complete re-resection was accomplished in 26 patients. Of these, half remain cancer free. Of those with a normal CEA at recurrence, complete re-resection was feasible in 24 patients.Only 17% of patients with recurrent colorectal cancer undergoing potentially curative reresection have an elevated CEA. If we use the denominator of our patient population using an estimated relapse rate of 25-50%, the overall likelihood of CEA-directed curative re-resection confirms early estimates of less than a 5% survival advantage.Evaluation of serum carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring in the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients with metastatic lymph nodes and a normal preoperative serum level.The value of serial serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assay in the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients with metastatic lymph nodes and normal (< or = 5 ng/ml) preoperative CEA levels, was examined in this study. Thirty-eight patients were studied and compared with 22 patients with elevated CEA levels. The overall sensitivity of CEA for the diagnosis of recurrence was 36%. Postoperative CEA was strongly influenced by the site of recurrence. CEA monitoring showed the best results in patients who developed hepatic metastases (sensitivity 60%, specificity 94%, positive predictive value 60%, and negative predictive value 94%), and was ineffective for the detection of locoregional or pulmonary metastases. The results indicate that elevation of CEA in the postoperative course of these patients is an indicator of the presence of hepatic metastases. Postoperative CEA monitoring should not be omitted in Dukes C patients with normal preoperative levels, and is more reliable for the detection of liver metastases.Significance of postoperative serum level of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and actual half life of CEA in colorectal cancer patients.The postoperative levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and the actual half life (T1/2) of CEA were evaluated to ascertain their potency in predicting the recurrence of colorectal cancer after curative surgery in patients who had an abnormally high level of preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA, > or = 5 ng/ml). Ninety-four patients who underwent curative surgery were enrolled and 24 patients (25.5%) had recurrence during the follow-up period (median: 30 months, range: 2-69 months). T1/2 of CEA for all patients ranged from 1.2 days to 88.1 days, with a median of 4.4 days. T1/2 of CEA (mean +/- standard deviation) was 11.7 +/- 17.9 days in recurrent patients, whereas it was 6.2 +/- 4.9 days in patients without recurrence (p = 0.0224). The patients' age, gender, size of the tumor, location of the tumor, pre-, and postoperative CEA level, pathologic type of the tumor and Dukes stage had no significance in recurrence. The 1-year, 2-year, and 5-year disease-free survival rates were 95.1%, 81.1%, and 73.8% in patients with postoperative CEA levels less than 5 ng/ml (n = 62), respectively, and 71.4%, 64.8%, and 64.8% in patients with postoperative CEA levels higher than or equal to 5 ng/ml (n = 32), respectively (p = 0.04). Patients were divided into Group S (T1/2 of CEA < 4.4 days, n = 43) and Group L (T1/2 of CEA > or = 4.4 days, n = 51). The 1-year, 2-year, and 5-year disease-free survival rates were 95.3%, 85.1%, and 77.7% in Group S, respectively, and 80%, 67.5%, and 64.1% in Group L, respectively (p = 0.0261). In conclusion, the disease-free survival of colorectal cancer patients was prolonged in patients who had a short T1/2 of CEA or a low level of postoperative CEA. In high-risk colorectal cancer patients with an abnormally high level of preoperative CEA, recurrence may be predicted by checking an early postoperative CEA level and/or by a simple calculation of the actual half life of CEA.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring in curative surgery for recurrent colorectal carcinoma.This study is designed to review a carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA)-driven postoperative protocol designed to identify patients suitable for curative reresection when recurrent colorectal cancer is identified.A total of 285 patients who were operated on for colon or rectal carcinoma between 1981 and 1985 were evaluated (with CEA levels) every two months for the first two years, every three months for the third year, every six months for years 4 and 5, and annually thereafter. CEA levels above 5 microg were considered abnormal and were evaluated with diagnostic imaging and/or endoscopy.Follow-up was available for 280 patients (98.2 percent). Distribution of patients by Astler-Coller was: A, 14 percent; B1, 20 percent; B2, 39 percent; C1, 5 percent; C2, 21 percent. There were 62 of 280 patients (22 percent) who developed elevated CEA levels, with 44 patients who demonstrated clinical or radiographic evidence of recurrence. Eleven patients were selected for surgery with curative intent (4 hepatic resections, 1 pulmonary wedge resection, 2 abdominoperineal resections, 2 segmental bowel resections, and 2 cranial metastasectomies). Three of 11 patients (27 percent) benefited and have disease-free survivals greater than 60 months. Of the 223 patients without elevated CEA, 22 (9.9 percent) had recurrent cancer without any survivors. Overall, 3 of 285 patients (1.1 percent) were cured as a result of CEA follow-up.CEA-driven surgery is useful in selected patients and can produce long-term survivors.Surveillance of colorectal cancer: effectiveness of early detection of intraluminal recurrences on prognosis and survival of patients treated for cure.The authors evaluate the effectiveness of routine colonoscopy and marker evaluation in diagnosis of intraluminal recurrent cancer.Chart review was conducted on 481 patients who underwent curative resection for colorectal cancer between 1980 and 1990. Clinical visits were scheduled and carcinoembryonic antigen evaluation was performed every three months, and colonoscopy was performed preoperatively, 12 to 15 months after surgical treatment, and then with intervals of 12 to 24 months or when symptoms appeared.About 10 percent of patients developed intraluminal recurrences. More than one-half of metachronous lesions arose within the first 24 months, and median time to diagnosis was 25 months. Patients with left-sited tumors in the advanced stage had a higher risk of developing recurrent intraluminal disease. Twenty-nine patients underwent a second surgical operation, of which 17 cases were radical. In this group, the five-year survival was 70.6 percent, although no nonradically treated or nonresected patients survived longer than 31 months. Twenty-two patients were asymptomatic at time of diagnosis of recurrence, and of these, 12 patients underwent radical operation; on the other hand, of the 24 symptomatic patients, only 5 were treated radically. Carcinoembryonic antigen was the first sign of recurrence in eight cases. Colonoscopy must be performed within the first 12 to 15 months after operation, whereas an interval of 24 months between examinations seems sufficient to guarantee early detection of metachronous lesions.Serial tumor marker evaluation is of help in earlier diagnosis of local recurrences. Asymptomatic patients more frequently undergo another operation for cure and thus have a better survival rate.99Tcm-IMMU4 imaging in recurrent colorectal cancer: efficacy and impact on surgical management.The aims of this study were to evaluate the efficacy of scintigraphy with the 99Tcm-labelled anti-carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monoclonal antibody Fab' fragment (IMMU4) in the diagnosis of recurrent colorectal carcinoma and to investigate its usefulness in the intraoperative surgical management of patients undergoing re-operation because of a rising serum CEA. We evaluated 24 patients prospectively who had rising serum CEA 6-19 months after initial surgery for colorectal carcinoma. Ten patients had lesions confirmed by computed tomography, ultrasound, magnetic resonance imaging, endoscopic examination or barium enema. Fourteen patients had negative findings on one or more of the above studies, but were suspected of having occult disease from their rising serum CEA. All patients were scheduled for surgery for restaging during a "second look' procedure. Planar and single photon emission tomography (SPET) imaging was performed in all patients. All scintigraphic findings were correlated with surgical and histopathological results. The overall sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 81, 90 and 86% respectively when analysed by lesion, and 95, 60 and 88% respectively when analysed by patient. Ten of 14 (71%) patients with occult disease were correctly diagnosed as having recurrent disease. The SPET images were shown to have superior detectability (80%) compared with the planar images (35%). The surgeon judged the study to have had a neutral impact in 75% of the patients, but to have been helpful in 25%. We conclude that this antibody is potentially useful in detecting recurrent colorectal carcinoma in patients with rising serum CEA, especially when conventional imaging is negative or equivocal. It can also be helpful in altering planned surgery.[Follow up in carcinoma of the large intestine].A valid program of follow-up has always been a crucial point in the overall therapy of the colon-cancer. In this retrospective study, the authors have used as specimen 74 patients put under observation between the years 1987 and 1992. The patient have been followed throughout the diagnostic period with various methods. It has been the will of the authors, who have presented their protocol of reference, to put under comparison the various controlling methods in order to visualize their reliability, specificity and the indication of each one of them. The CEA is the most sensible haemanalysis for lifting the doubt of recidivation. As for the TAC and ultrasound it has been reserved the job of formulating a correct diagnosis; the results of both diagnostics through imagery have been more or less the same. However, the ultrasound examination have shown more false positives than the TAC. The research of the blood occult in the stool is a rapid and economic detection in the case of intramural recidivations, even if we cannot disregard the share of false positives. A high specificity for the study of intramural recidivations has been offered by the endoscopic scan particularly when associated by a brushing and biopsy.Serum tumor markers in colorectal cancer staging, grading, and follow-up.Early diagnosis of colorectal cancer, a frequent neoplasia in industrialized countries, permits curative surgery. In this study we assessed the clinical role of serum tumor markers determination in diagnosing, staging, and grading colorectal cancer; the role of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), CA 19-9, tissue polypeptide antigen (TPA) and CA 72-4 in colorectal cancer follow-up was also assessed. In 114 patients with colorectal cancer, the oncofetal antigen CEA was compared with the membrane-associated glycoproteins CA 19-9, CA 242, and CA 72-4 and with the cytokeratins TPA, tissue polypeptide-specific antigen (TPS) and tissue polypeptide monoclonal antigen (TPM). Overall, the most sensitive indices were TPA and TPS (67% and 70%, respectively). Tumor stage influenced the levels of CEA, CA 19-9, and TPA, but not those of TPS, while tumor grade influenced CEA and TPS, but not CA 72-4, TPA, and TPM. TPA was the most sensitive index in identifying early or well-differentiated colorectal cancers. The sensitivity was enhanced when this marker was determined in combination with CEA, in diagnosing both advanced and early colorectal tumors. Seventy-seven patients were followed up after therapy for at least 18 months. CEA was the most sensitive index of recurrence (58%); however, this sensitivity is too low to consider tumor markers useful in colorectal cancer follow-up.Serum CA 242 and CEA detect different patients with recurrent colorectal cancer.The aim of this study was to investigate the clinical value of CA 242 and CEA in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer. Serial serum samples were available for analysis in 67 patients with subsequent recurrence, of which 36 patients had been treated for colonic and 31 patients for rectal cancer. Liver metastases were found in 32 patients, local recurrences in 18 patients, lung metastases in 11 patients and other distant metastases in 6 patients. The same serum samples were used in quantitating the serum levels of both CA 242 and CEA. At the time of clinical recurrence an elevated CA 242 level was found in 41 patients and an elevated CEA level in 49 patients. Thirty-six patients (54%) showed an elevation of both CA 242 and CEA, five patients (7%) had increased CA 242 alone and 13 patients (19%) increased CEA alone. Altogether, 54 patients (81%) showed an elevation of either or both markers at the time of clinical recurrence. Initially CA 242 alone began to rise in 14 patients (21%) and CEA alone in 16 patients (24%). The lead time was calculated from 28 patients that had four or more serum samples available during follow-up. CA 242 increased in median 5,7 months and CEA in median 3,4 months before clinical recurrence (p=0.34). CA 242 was more sensitive for lung metastases (64%) than CEA (45%), whereas CEA was superior to CA 242 in liver metastases (88% versus 72%, respectively) and in local recurrences (56% versus 39%, respectively). Both CA 242 and CEA seem to be useful in early diagnosis of a recurrence in the follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer.Second-look operation for recurrent colorectal cancer based on carcinoembryonic antigen and imaging techniques.The usefulness of postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring and improvements in imaging techniques have renewed enthusiasm for second-look operations (SLO) as the most effective treatment for recurrent colorectal cancer by reresection following early detection. The aim of our study is to evaluate the role of CEA and imaging techniques-directed SLO.Seven hundred fifty-six patients with Dukes Stages B and C, who had undergone curative resection, were monitored postoperatively using CEA and imaging techniques. An SLO was performed on any potentially resectable recurrence, and in addition, an SLO was done when a persistently rising CEA value was detected.Recurrence developed in 18.8 percent (142/756) of patients, and 90.8 percent (129/142) of the recurrences were detected within the first three years following curative resection. When comparing carcinomas of the colon with that of the rectum, the former were associated with significantly more hepatic and intraabdominal recurrences, whereas the latter had significantly more locoregional and pulmonary recurrences. Seventy-two patients underwent SLO. Of these patients, 54.2 percent (39/72) had all of their disease resected, and 1.4 percent (1/72) had no detectable disease at the SLO. Among the 142 patients with recurrence, 71 (50 percent) patients underwent SLO. The resectable group at SLO carried a significantly better survival than the unresectable recurrence group (41.3 vs. 5.2 percent; P<0.01).Complete removal of colorectal cancer recurrences by SLO, on the basis of postoperative, follow-up CEA and imaging technique findings, results in improved survival.Follow-up after curative surgery for colorectal carcinoma. Randomized comparison with no follow-up.This study investigated the value of intense follow-up compared with no follow-up after curative surgery of cancer in the colon or rectum.One hundred seven patients were randomized to no follow-up (control group; n = 54) or intense follow-up (follow-up group; n = 53) after surgery and early postoperative colonoscopy. Patients in the follow-up group were followed at frequent intervals with clinical examination, rigid proctosigmoidoscopy, colonoscopy, computed tomography of the pelvis (in patients operated with abdominoperineal resection), pulmonary x-ray, liver function tests, and determinations of carcinoembryonic antigen and fecal hemoglobin. Follow-up ranged from 5.5 to 8.8 years after primary surgery.Tumor recurred in 18 patients (33 percent) in the control group and in 17 patients (32 percent) in the follow-up group. Reresection with curative intent was performed in three patients in the control group and in five patients (four of whom were asymptomatic) in the follow-up group. In the follow-up group two asymptomatic patients with elevated carcinoembryonic antigen levels were disease-free three and five and one-half years after reresection and were the only patients apparently cured by reresection. No patient underwent surgery for metastatic disease in the liver or lungs. Symptomatic metachronous carcinoma was detected in one patient (control group) after three years. Five-year survival rate was 67 percent in the control group and 75 percent in the follow-up group (P > 0.05); the corresponding cancer-specific survival rates were 71 percent and 78 percent, respectively.Intense follow-up after resection of colorectal cancer did not prolong survival in this study.Usefulness of CEA, TPA, GICA, CA 72.4, and CA 195 in the Diagnosis of primary colorectal cancer and at its relapse.A protocol with tumor markers as guidelines to follow up colorectal cancer patients was designed using criteria other than those commonly reported. They included combination of several markers and their dynamic evaluation of three different levels of increase: isolated elevated value (IEV), constant level of elevation (CE), and progressive increase (PI). In a total of 90 patients, the levels of combined serum CEA-TPA and GICA were serially measured, and in 71 of them, CA 72.4 and CA 195 levels were also determined. The tumor markers were measured during the first few months after surgery, and the usefulness of combined CEA-TPA-GICA and other, possibly more favorable combinations was determined in relation to "early" detection of recurrence and development of metastases. In addition the usefulness of conventional radiologic examinations and the impact on patients survival following "early" diagnosis was evaluated. A positive correlation was found between elevated preoperative serum tumor marker levels and the stage of disease. The postoperative variation of high serum CEA values was useful in identifying micrometastases after primary tumor resection. In the "early" diagnosed 14 patients with recurrence during the postoperative follow-up period, the highest sensitivity was found for TPA (87%) and, of the marker combinations, TPA-GICA (93%) with a lead time of 4.6 +/- 5.6 and 5.4 +/- 7.8 months (mean +/- SD) respectively. In nonrelapsed patients, falsely positive results of TPA-GICA (25%) were fewer than those for TPA-CA 195 (31%) and TPA-GICA-CA72-4 (35%). However, TPA-CA 195 and TPA-GICA-CA72-4, based upon their high sensitivity in patients with metastases, seemed in keeping with the effectiveness of TPA-GICA for monitoring of postoperative patients with colorectal cancer. In patients who developed recurrences, PI was more frequently present than IEV. In patients without recurrence, the opposite occurred. CE had less frequently discriminatory capability between these two groups than IEV and PI. Routine radiographic studies were ineffective whereas liver echography with its high sensitivity revealed the first sign of recurrence. Eight (50%) of the 16 relapses (two patients relapsed twice) were suitable for surgery because only one organ with a single metastasis was involved. Three (75%) of the 4 patients with "early" diagnosis of recurrence are alive without evidence of disease 5, 18, and 20 months after the last surgery. The results of this study revealed the importance of "early" diagnosis of recurrence for improved survival of patients with colorectal cancer.Raised carcinoembryonic antigen level as an indicator of recurrent disease in follow up of patients with colorectal cancer.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen level is raised in 80% of patients undergoing colonic resection for cancer. Subsequent elevation in the follow-up period may precede signs and symptoms as an indicator of recurrent disease. there is little evidence that "classical" follow up of patients in the general surgical outpatient clinic improves either survival or quality of life. Regular carcinoembryonic antigen level estimation requested by the general practitioner, allied to day-case colonoscopic surveillance may be a more rational approach.A study was undertaken to investigate the relationship between raised carcinoembryonic antigen level and the recurrence of colorectal cancer in patients following a curative primary resection.Retrospective analysis was carried out on the notes of 125 patients who had attended a dedicated hospital colorectal follow-up clinic between 1988 and 1992. Carcinoembryonic antigen level data were obtained by subsequent examination of the University of Edinburgh Department of Clinical Chemistry (immunoassay section) carcinoembryonic antigen database.A single carcinoembryonic level result of more than 100 ul-1 (normal range less than 60 ul-1) was found to be a highly sensitive (87%), specific (89%), and accurate (88%) indicator of recurrent disease. Raised carcinoembryonic antigen level preceded symptoms in 72% of patients with recurrence of colorectal cancer.Sequential laboratory estimation of carcinoembryonic antigen level organized by the general practitioner may represent an accurate method of detecting recurrent colorectal disease. Hospital review could be limited to colonoscopic surveillance and restaging of patients referred with evidence of recurrent disease.Five-year follow-up after radical surgery for colorectal cancer. Results of a prospective randomized trial.To determine whether an intensified follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer can lead to improved reresectability and a better long-term survival.A prospective randomized trial of 106 patients.Oulu University Hospital, a referral center in northern Finland.A total of 106 consecutive patients who underwent radical resection for colorectal cancer, 54 of whom were randomized into a conventional follow-up group and 52 into an intensified follow-up group.After a 5-year follow-up, the time of detection of recurrence, the recurrence rates, the first method showing recurrence, the mode of recurrence, reresectability, and survival were compared between the groups.The recurrences were identified earlier in the intensified follow-up group than in the conventional follow-up group (mean +/- SD, 10 +/- 5 months vs 15 +/- 10 months). The overall recurrence rate was 41%, with 39% in the conventional group and 42% in the intensified group. Carcinoembryonic antigen determination was the most common method showing recurrence in both groups. Endoscopy and ultrasound were beneficial in the intensified follow-up group, but computed tomography failed to improve the diagnostics. The mode of recurrence did not differ between the groups. Radical resections were performed on 19% (8/43) of the patients, 14% (3/21) in the conventional group and 22% (5/22) in the intensified group. The cumulative 5-year survival was 54% in the conventional group and 59% in the intensified group.Earlier detection of recurrent colorectal cancer by intensified follow-up does not lead to either significantly increased reresectability or improved 5-year survival.Second look in colorectal surgery.Follow-up should identify metachronous colonic neoplasms and precancers, suture line recurrences, and isolated liver or pulmonary metastases. For some sites of failure the surgical re-resection and multimodal approaches increase disease-free survival and quality of life. The aim of our study was to evaluate the role of the different follow-up plans and the carcinoembryonic antigen directed second-look surgery.One hundred-sixty patients radically resected for Dukes B or C colorectal cancer were evaluated by a follow-up plan (plasma carcinoembryonic antigen every 2 months; echography every 6 months; chest x-ray every 12 months; and colonoscopy at 1 year and then every 3-5 years).Eighty-nine recurrences were detected (55.6 percent). In 72 recurrences plasma carcinoembryonic antigen elevation was present. Eight carcinoembryonic antigen directed second-look surgeries were performed: in four patients surgical evidence of recurrence was found (two isolated liver metastases were radically resected); two patients with no surgical evidence of recurrence developed a surrenalic isolated metastases and pelvic and hepatic recurrences; two patients had a five-year disease-free survival. In the 17 symptomatic patients with no carcinoembryonic antigen elevation diffuse disease was present, not resectable for cure. Four solitary liver metastases, one metachronous colonic neoplasm, and one suture line recurrence presented a five-year survival.The authors emphasize that carcinoembryonic antigen-directed second-look surgery is not acceptable for elevated costs. Intensive follow-up plans are superflous, while the monitoring of the carcinoembryonic antigen and instrumental restaging as an indicator of solitary liver metastases and mucosal lesions are very useful.Value of carcinoembryonic antigen in the management of colorectal cancer.The practical value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assay in the management of colorectal cancer after surgery is controversial. The value of CEA in the management of colorectal cancer was reviewed and discussed to justify the use of CEA assay in the management of colorectal cancer.A retrospective study was performed on 318 patients who underwent resection by one surgeon (JYW) between 1981 and 1986 and who were followed for a minimum of 5 years or until death.The incidence of preoperative CEA levels > 5 ng/ml in Dukes Stages A, B, C, and D were 0, 32, 48, and 79 percent, respectively. Five-year survival rates for groups with CEA levels < or = 5 ng/ml and > 5 ng/ml were 85 percent and 55 percent (P < 0.05), respectively, in Dukes Stage B patients and 64 percent and 37 percent (P < 0.05) in Stage C patients. The sensitivity and specificity of postoperative CEA monitoring in detecting recurrent diseases were 66 percent and 94 percent, respectively, for patients with a preoperative CEA value < or = 5 ng/ml and 97 percent and 88 percent for patients with a higher preoperative CEA value.CEA is still the best tumor marker available to be used as an independent prognostic factor and as a monitor for recurrence of disease after primary tumor resection.Pre- and postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen determinations in hepatic resection for colorectal metastases. Predictive value and implications for adjuvant treatment based on multivariate analysis.The object of this study was to evaluate the prognostic significance of pre- and postoperative serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in the resectional treatment of colorectal hepatic metastases. The main question was whether postoperative CEA levels correlated with survival and the time to recurrence.Despite numerous investigations on prognostic factors in colorectal cancer, only sparse data are available to estimate the patient's individual risk for tumor recurrence postoperatively. It is controversial whether preoperative CEA values are of prognostic significance, and after observing the kinetics of CEA decline, elevated CEA levels postoperatively were found to be an ominous sign. CEA therefore could indicate the presence of a tumor burden after resection.One hundred sixty-six patients undergoing hepatic resection for colorectal metastases with curative intent were prospectively documented and underwent multivariate analysis for indicators of prognosis.Abnormal preoperative CEA levels were not of prognostic significance compared with values within the normal range (survival, 36 vs. 30 months; p = 0.12; disease-free survival, 12 vs. 10 months; p = 0.82). The postoperative serum CEA level, however, was the most predictive factor with regard to survival and the disease-free interval. Patients in whom CEA levels were abnormal before surgery and returned into the normal range after resection had significantly better survival times (37 vs. 23 months, p = 0.0001) and disease-free survival times (12 vs. 6.2 months, p = 0.0001) compared with patients with persistently abnormal values.Pre- and postoperative determination of the serum CEA level is mandatory to judge whether a curative resection has been performed and whether tumor has been left behind after the operation. Postoperative CEA levels also should be used as a stratification criterion in adjuvant treatment studies after hepatic resection to indicate patients with a high risk of tumor recurrence.The role of CA-242 and CEA in surveillance following curative resection for colorectal cancer.This study was undertaken to evaluate the role of a new tumour marker, CA-242, alone or in combination with CEA in the practical management of colorectal cancer patients after potentially curative resection. A cohort of 149 patients who had undergone 'curative' surgery was followed up according to an intensive protocol in order to detect recurrent disease. Over a median tumour marker follow-up period of 24 months there were 25 recurrences in 24 patients. Both CEA and CA-242 alone detected half the local recurrences. The sensitivity of CEA was 84% for distant or mixed recurrence compared with 64% for CA-242. An abnormality of either CEA or CA-242 enabled detection of five out of six local recurrences and 17 out of 19 distant or mixed recurrences with a median lead time of 5 months for each marker. Both markers were elevated concurrently in only one local and 11 distant recurrences. While CA-242 alone is not superior to CEA, their combined use (either abnormal) has a high sensitivity (88%), specificity (78%) and negative predictive value (97%); this may be useful in reducing unnecessary investigations in follow-up programmes and as a guide to the initiation of further treatment for recurrent disease.The value of serum carcinoembryonic antigen in predicting recurrent disease following curative resection of colorectal cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) estimations are used to facilitate early diagnosis of recurrent disease after treatment for colorectal cancer.This study was designed to determine the natural history of patients with normal and abnormal levels of CEA.Patients undergoing potential curative resection of colorectal tumors (Dukes Stage A-C) entered a prospective, randomized trial comparing two follow-up regimens (to be reported separately) had CEA levels measured every 3 months for two years; then every 6 months for the next three years. In the study protocol, a rise in CEA was not an indication for investigation to determine recurrence unless there was also other evidence of recurrent disease.Three hundred eleven patients were followed for a median of 4.5 (range, 2-5) years. Recurrent disease developed in 98 (32 percent) patients, 57 of whom had an elevated CEA (sensitivity 58 percent), with a median lead time of six (range, 1-30) months from first abnormal CEA to diagnosis of recurrent disease by other means. The specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of CEA as an indicator of subsequent recurrent disease was 93 percent, 79 percent, and 83 percent, respectively. The sensitivity of CEA for predicting hepatic metastases was 80 percent, with a median lead time of eight (range, 1-30) months, compared with only 46 percent for sites of recurrent disease other than the liver.CEA was the first indicator of recurrent disease in 58 percent of all patients and in 80 percent of patients with liver metastases. The diagnosis of recurrent disease may be made several months earlier by investigating the first abnormal CEA level, although any benefit in terms of survival remains to be proven.Clinical value of whole-body positron emission tomography with [18F]fluorodeoxyglucose in recurrent colorectal cancer.To assess the clinical value of whole-body positron emission tomography (PET) with [18F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) in recurrent colorectal cancer, 35 patients were studied: 15 had resectable liver metastases, one a resectable lung metastasis, eight resectable pelvic recurrence, eight a presacral mass with equivocal findings on imaging, and three increasing serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) without clinical or radiological signs of recurrent disease. PET affected management decisions in seven of 16 patients with metastatic disease. In one of eight patients with pelvic recurrence demonstrated by computed tomography (CT), PET detected unknown pulmonary metastases. In five of eight presacral masses with equivocal CT findings, PET was correct and unexpected distant metastases were detected in one of these patients. In two of three patients with increasing CEA levels and normal pelvic CT findings, pelvic recurrence was identified. Overall, whole-body PET affected management in 14 patients. PET is a valuable tool for staging local recurrence and metastatic disease.Modelling of serial carcinoembryonic antigen changes in colorectal cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) is a tumour marker mainly used for detection of recurrent colorectal cancer. CEA series in 295 patients, who had a macroscopic radical resection of a primary colorectal cancer were studied. A kinetic model was fitted to CEA series of individual patients. Applying the kinetic model recurrences were identified with a sensitivity of 70-80% and specificity of 80-90%. Simulations were performed in order to find the optimal sampling strategy for CEA during follow-up. Simulations showed that CEA determinations at a few weeks interval between would be optimal for early detection of recurrences.Usefulness of carcinoembryonic antigen monitoring despite normal preoperative values in node-positive colon cancer patients.The aim of our study was to determine to what extent serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) monitoring is helpful in detecting colorectal cancer recurrence in patients if their preoperative serum CEA is normal. Additional major objectives of this study were to correlate CEA immunohistochemical features of the primary tumor with serum CEA levels at the time of tumor recurrence in node-positive colorectal cancer patients with low preoperative CEA values.One hundred fourteen node-positive colorectal cancer patients with preoperative serum CEA levels of < 5.0 ng/ml undergoing clinically curative operations were studied. Primary tumors were evaluated for tissue CEA using the same monoclonal antibody as used for serum CEA determinations utilizing the avidin-biotin-peroxidase immunohistochemical technique.The exact preoperative serum CEA value did not correlate with tumor grade, immunohistochemical CEA intensity or pattern. In the 32 patients who developed recurrent cancer, the serum CEA at recurrence was greater than 5 ng/ml in 44 percent. All such patients had CEA present in their primary tumor. There was no correlation with the exact preoperative serum CEA, the intensity of the primary tissue CEA, or the localization of such CEA and subsequent serum elevation at recurrence.Serum CEA is a useful marker in the detection of recurrent colorectal cancer despite normal preoperative values.Role of CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 in the early detection of localized and diffuse recurrent rectal cancer.Sixty-six consecutive patients who underwent curative resection for rectal cancer were studied prospectively to evaluate the roles of sequential carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), tissue plasminogen activator (TPA), and carcinomatous antigen 19-9 (Ca 19-9) determinations in the early diagnosis of resectable recurrences. Thirty-three recurrences were detected between 6 and 42 months. CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 showed a sensitivity of 72.7 percent, 78.8 percent, and 60.1 percent, respectively, and a specificity of 60.6 percent, 60.6 percent, and 87.9 percent, respectively. In 23 cases the rise in the value of CEA and/or TPA and/or Ca 19-9 was the first sign of recurrences, and the diagnosis was established later by clinical methods. In this group, the lead time was two months for liver metastases and four months for disseminated metastases. As far as the relationship between localization of recurrence and marker level increase is concerned, of 16 hepatic metastases CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 showed a sensitivity of 94 percent (P less than 0.05), 69 percent, and 62 percent, respectively. Of six patients with local recurrences, CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 showed a sensitivity of 50 percent, 100 percent (P less than 0.05), and 83.3 percent, respectively. Of three patients with peritoneal carcinomatosis, CEA, TPA (P less than 0.05), and Ca 19-9 showed a sensitivity of 0 percent, 100 percent, and 0 percent, respectively. No significant differences were reported among the three markers according to multiple metastases and metachronous polyps. Fourteen patients (42.4 percent) underwent surgical treatment for recurrent disease, and eight of them (57 percent) showed a resectable disease, for a total resectability rate of 24.2 percent. The findings of our study indicate that a follow-up program based on CEA, TPA, and Ca 19-9 assays is related to an early diagnosis and a good resectability rate for both local and metastatic recurrences from rectal cancer.[Clinical evaluation of four tumor markers (CEA, TPA, CA50 and CA72-4) in colorectal cancer].In a total of 194 cases, consisting of 86 cases of colorectal cancer undergone operation later, 7 cases of non resectable cancer, 34 cases of recurrence, 43 cases of NED (no evidence of a recurrence after radical surgery for colorectal cancer) and 24 cases of benign colorectal disease, serum CEA, TPA, CA50 and CA72-4 levels were determined. The positivity rate was high for all four markers in stage V cases among 86 cases of colorectal cancer, and in cases of non resectable cancer and cases of recurrence. The highest positive rate was obtained with CEA. On the contrary, in cases of stage I to IV the positivity rates of these four tumor markers were as low as 0 to 34.8%. Out of 127 cases of colorectal cancer excluded of 43 NED cases, 52 cases were negative for all four tumor markers and 14 cases were positive only for CEA. In 49 cases, CEA and at least one of the other three tumor markers gave positive results. In 12 cases, CEA gave negative results and at least one of the other three tumor markers positive results. In conclusion, measurement of blood levels of these tumor markers is limited of its usefulness in early diagnosis of colorectal cancer. However, in the diagnosis of advanced stage and of recurrence during the postoperative follow-up period the measurement of tumor markers provides useful information. CEA is most sensitive among the four tumor markers tested and any combination of these four markers is not advantageous because of an increase in false positivity rate.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen in relation to survival, DNA ploidy pattern, and recurrent disease in 406 colorectal carcinoma patients.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in relation to survival, flow cytometric DNA ploidy pattern, Dukes stage, and recurrent disease was prospectively evaluated in 406 patients with colorectal carcinoma. In 246 patients (61%) the carcinomas were DNA aneuploid. Increased preoperative CEA levels (> 5 micrograms/l) were found in 151 of 363 evaluable patients (42%). Dukes stage-B patients with preoperative CEA elevation showed significantly poorer prognosis than those with normal CEA values (p = 0.001). A weak but significant correlation was found between preoperative CEA level and Dukes stage (Kendall's tau = 0.25, p < 0.01). Of 50 evaluable patients with clinical recurrence and postoperative normal or normalized CEA levels, 28 (56%) had a rise in CEA before or at the time of clinical recurrence. The sensitivity of the CEA test for primary and for recurrent disease was not significantly different in the DNA aneuploid and the DNA near-diploid groups.The role of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the management of patients with colorectal carcinoma: the experience of the Istituto Tumori of Milan.CEA determination has attained an important role in the clinical management of patients with tumors of the colorectal tract. In this paper the experience of the Istituto Tumori of Milan is reviewed and the results are discussed. Three hundred and thirty-six patients were followed after curative resection of colorectal carcinoma. The follow-up period was 15 years, from January 1975 to December 1990 (global follow-up 1358 years). In the course of follow-up 136 patients developed recurrent disease. The number of CEA determinations for each patient ranged from 1 to 37 (mean 8, total 3330). CEA levels of presurgical patients were related to the clinical stage. Among patients who developed recurrences 61% showed an increase in CEA serum levels. In 200 patients with a negative follow-up we observed only 15 cases of false-positive results.Comparison of plasma prolactin and CEA in monitoring patients with adenocarcinoma of colon and rectum.Plasma prolactin (PRL) and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) were measured by radioimmunoassay in 74 patients with adenocarcinoma of colon and rectum. The markers were correlated with disease stage, histological grade and progression/remission of disease. The circulating preoperative median PRL and CEA levels were significantly higher in colorectal cancer patients than in their respective controls. PRL was elevated in all Dukes stages and in all histological grades of the tumour whereas the rise in CEA was more pronounced in Dukes D. Out of 74 patients, 29% (21/74) developed recurrent disease and 31% (23/74) responded to the treatment. With regard to monitoring recurrence(s), the predictive value of PRL was 94% which was significantly greater than that of CEA which was only 62%. In patients who developed liver metastases PRL remained elevated whereas CEA showed more than 100-fold increase. Therefore, we feel that CEA is a better marker for monitoring patients who developed liver metastases. From our results, we suggest that PRL can be used as a better overall marker for detecting recurrence(s) in patients with colorectal adenocarcinoma.[Evaluation of combined CA-19-9 and CEA assay in monitoring recurrences and metastases of colorectal cancer].The results of combined CA-19-9 CEA assay were measured in 216 cases of colorectal cancer. In 28 preoperative patients, the positive rate 16.67% in Dukes' A group, 25% in B, 55% in C and 40% in D. It was proved less valuable in early diagnosis. The positive CA-19-9 alone in 66 with relapsed or metastases out of 182 undergoing radical resection was 63.63%, CEA alone 62.12%, and combined assay 86.36%. The false positive rate of CA-19-9 and CEA was 6.03% and combined assay 11.21%. In 27 palliative resections CA-19-9 in 40.74% cases, CEA in 44.44%, and combined assay in 59.2% was positive. In cases of nonresectable tumors, the positive rate was 66.7%, 66.7% and 83.33%, respectively. There was no definite correlation between the value of CA-19-9 and CEA. The data showed significantly higher sensitivity in combined assay than in either CA-19-9 or CEA alone. Combined assay with the sensitivity of 86.36% and the specificity of 88.79%, was more useful in finding of postoperative. recurrences or metastases. We suggest that this method should be used routinely in monitoring postoperative patients with colorectal cancer.Value of follow-up in the management of recurrent colorectal cancer.The purpose of this article was to study the effectiveness of a prospective follow-up programme in patients after curative surgery for colorectal cancer. Of the initial 151 selected patients, 61 (40%) developed a recurrence in whom only six cases (10%) of potentially curable recurrent lesions were detected. The first clues to recurrence in the 61 patients were history or physical examination in 49%, a rising CEA in 29% and a positive imaging finding in 10%, being difficult to decide which test first signalled a recurrent cancer in an additional 11%. Endoscopy and CEA determinations were the most rewarding investigations. CEA was a sensitive means of identifying disseminated recurrent disease and liver metastases compared with liver function tests or liver ultrasound every 3 months. Endoscopy was useful in the diagnosis of local recurrences. However no follow-up test was capable of detecting recurrent colorectal cancer when it might still have been curable. As a direct result of this follow-up programme 15 patients (23%) underwent re-exploration. No symptomatic patients were candidates for curative re-operation. Of the asymptomatic patients six (four colonic and two rectal cancers) (19.5%) were re-resected for cure. Only three of these were alive and without evidence of disease, 40, 43 and 69 months later so that long term survivors after curative re-resection represent only 5% of all patients with recurrences (7.2% of the recurrent colonic cancer and 3% of the rectal cancer). Our follow-up programme did not permit us to alter the incidence of disseminated recurrent disease, and the effectiveness of the curative re-resection represents an increase of only 1.3% in the global 5-year survival rates for colorectal cancer. Our study does not demonstrate any great value of 'classical' postoperative follow-up programme.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen and liver function tests in the detection of recurrent colorectal carcinoma.The optimal laboratory evaluation for the early detection of liver metastases from colorectal cancer is controversial. This investigation was undertaken to compare the efficacy of liver function tests (LFTs) with that of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels for the early detection of liver metastases. Patients who developed liver metastases after potentially curative resections of adenocarcinoma of the colorectum between 1974 and 1988 were reviewed. The following laboratory tests were serially evaluated during the follow-up period: CEA, alkaline phosphatase (AP), serum glutamic oxaloacetic transaminase (SGOT), serum glutamic pyruvic transaminase (SGPT), and lactic dehydrogenase (LDH). These values were retrospectively assessed from the time of documented liver metastases to identify which lab value(s) were elevated initially. Ninety-two patients were available for study. Average time for the occurrence of liver metastases was 20 months (range, 3-72 months). The incidence of elevation of individual tests at the time of suspicion of liver metastasis was: CEA, 94.6 percent (P less than 0.25, chi-squared); AP, 18.5 percent; SGOT, 12.0 percent; SGPT, 5.4 percent; and LDH, 29.3 percent. When comparing CEA with a battery of LFTs at the time of suspicion of liver metastasis, CEA was elevated with normal LFTs in 64.1 percent (P less than 0.05, chi-squared), the most frequent occurrence. At least one LFT was elevated with a normal CEA in only 2.2 percent; CEA and at least one LFT were increased in 30.4 percent; and both tests were normal in only 3.3 percent. These results indicate that, of the individual laboratory tests performed, CEA elevation heralds liver metastases significantly more frequently. LDH is the liver function test most frequently elevated when liver metastases are first suspected. When CEA is directly compared with a battery of LFTs, CEA is statistically significantly more frequently elevated. In fact, suspicion of liver metastases would have been delayed by the omission of LFTs in only 2.2 percent of patients. Therefore, we conclude that LFTs should be deleted from the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients, decreasing costs without significantly decreasing accuracy.Re-operation for recurrent colorectal cancer: the importance of early diagnosis for resectability and survival.Between 1978 and 1986, 179 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer were treated and 137 patients were operated a second time.82.1% of the patients showed elevated CEA levels (greater than or equal to 5 ng/ml) at the time of diagnosis. In 58.1% of the patients the CEA increase preceded the recognition of recurrence, and in 13.4% the diagnosis could be confirmed only by a second-look operation. In 46.7% of the re-operated patients a potentially curative resection of the locally recurrent or metastatic disease could be performed. The resectability was significantly lower in patients with symptomatic recurrent disease (34.5%) as compared to asymptomatic patients with CEA-directed positive imaging (52.7%) and the second-look patients (62.5%) respectively. A significant improvement in survival could be achieved especially in the second-look operated patients.Postoperative surveillance of patients with carcinoma of the colon and rectum.The early detection and management of recurrence following curative resection for colorectal carcinoma can prolong survival. However, at the present time there is no consensus on the appropriate follow-up protocol for such patients. This investigation was undertaken to determine which tests and procedures are most useful in detecting recurrence and the frequency with which they should be employed. Another purpose of this study was to identify those patients at high risk for recurrence. Sixty-five patients who underwent curative resection of adenocarcinoma of the colon and rectum were followed for at least two years or until recurrence. Thirty were classified as Duke's A carcinoma of the colon, 18 were Duke's B, and 17 were Duke's C. Mean follow-up was 44.9 months. The follow-up regimen consisted of clinical exam, liver function tests, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level, and chest x-ray every three months for the first two years postoperatively and every six months thereafter, and colonoscopy or barium enema and proctoscopy every six months for the first two years postoperatively and every year thereafter. Seventeen patients (26%) had a recurrence; 24% per cent of these developed within one year, 65 per cent developed within two years, 82 per cent developed within three years, and 94 per cent developed within four years of resection. Recurrence was detected by CEA in eight patients, chest x-ray in five, endoscopy in three, and laparotomy for small-bowel obstruction in one patient.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Is ultrasound superior to carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement in recurrent tumor screening of patients with colorectal carcinoma?Assuming that in the postoperative recurrent tumor screening CEA levels are as important as imaging techniques in elucidating the spread or the recurrence of a tumor, we examined 61 patients with colonic carcinoma. Those patients were operated curatively and were regularly controlled by clinical examination, laboratory, sonographic, endoscopic or radiological methods. In 3 patients there was a local recurrent, in 3 other patients there was a local recurrent and metastases. 8 patients showed sonographic livermetastases only, proved by computed tomography. In 6 patients CEA-levels rose. In 2 patients with sonographically confirmed metastases of the liver, there were neither clinical nor laboratory hints for metastases and the CEA-levels were normal. No one had elevated CEA-levels before detecting metastases. Our results indicate that ultrasound of the liver can detect metastases of colonic tumors earlier than clinical or laboratory sings do. Because of its greater diagnostic security, ultrasound is superior to CEA-measurement in recurrent tumor screening.Radioimmunoguided surgery in recurrent colorectal cancer: the role of carcinoembryonic antigen, computerized tomography, and physical examination.From January 1986 to December 1987, 32 patients with recurrent colorectal cancer had second-look radioimmunoguided surgery (RIGS system). All patients had pathologic confirmation of recurrence. The RIGS system identified 81% of recurrences, and in six patients recurrent tumor was identified only by RIGS. All patients had physical examination, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assay, and computerized tomography of the abdomen and pelvis. Detection of recurrence was based on symptoms in six, elevated CEA value in 25, and physical examination in one. The CEA was elevated preoperatively in 30 patients; two false-negative results occurred in symptomatic patients who had pelvic recurrence. The median CEA value in those with liver recurrence was 30 ng/ml (range 5.2 to 298) and for pelvic recurrence 13 ng/ml (range 1.9 to 31) (P less than .05). The overall sensitivity of CT was 41% (abdomen other than liver 37%, liver 56%, and pelvis 22%). The combination of elevated CEA, symptoms, and physical findings identified 100% of recurrences. We conclude that a rising CEA remains the most accurate indicator of recurrence. CT should not be done routinely to detect recurrent colorectal cancer unless CEA is elevated or the patient is symptomatic. In our study the intraoperative use of the RIGS system aided the surgeon in identifying occult tumors.The value of a follow-up programme after radical surgery for colorectal carcinoma.To evaluate the effectiveness of a follow-up programme after curative surgery for colorectal carcinoma, a 10-year series of 402 patients was surveyed for the detection rate of potentially curative recurrences and metachronous neoplasms. There were 120 recurrences (30%), and 100 of them (83%) were detected at scheduled check ups. Initial suspicion of recurrence was most often based on physical examination, carcinoembryonic antigen assay, or sigmoidoscopy. Reoperation was undertaken in 62 patients, in 26 cases (22%) for cure. The 5-year survival was 48% after curative reoperations. Metachronous adenomas and carcinomas occurred in 38 and 11 patients, respectively, giving corresponding cumulative 5-year incidences of 13% and 3.8%. Altogether, 37 patients (9.2%) had a curative reoperation for recurrent or metachronous carcinoma, and a further 38 patients (9.5%) had adenomas removed by polypectomy. It is concluded that regular follow-up is useful for the patients, and the follow-up schedule must be planned to detect both early recurrences and metachronous neoplasms.CEA directed second-look surgery for colon and rectal cancer.[Clinical significance of serum CEA determination in the diagnosis of colo-rectal cancer].Serum CEA levels of 581 specimens obtained from 350 colo-rectal cancer patients and 61 specimens from 54 non-tumor subjects were determined by sandwich method of CEA-EIA McAb kit supplied by the Beijing Institute of Biological Products. In patients with primary colo-rectal cancer, the serum CEA level was 15.0 +/- 52.1 ng/ml and 37.9% of patients gave a CEA level greater than 5 ng/ml. In recurrent colo-rectal cancer patients, serum CEA increased to 124.2 +/- 454.8 ng/ml with a positive rate of 78.0%. Both the CEA value and the positive rate of patients in clinically tumor-free period after surgery were 2.9 +/- 2.2 ng/ml and 16.5%, respectively. Serial follow-up CEA assays in selected cases were helpful to reflect the clinical status. Generally, CEA is useful to predict prognosis and to guide follow-up management.[Colorectal cancer: follow-up after curative resection].From Jan 1978 to Dec 1984, 128 patients had a curative resection of colorectal carcinoma. A program for early detection and surgical correction of recurrences was initiated in 88 patients with a mean age of 61 years (range 24 to 85). Seventy two patients complied with the program involving clinical examination, chest X-ray, alkaline phosphatase and CEA determinations and endoscopy at 6 month intervals. Mean follow up was 36 months (range 6 to 60). A total of 28 recurrences (32%) were detected: 4 local, 17 distant and 7 local and distant. Recurrences occurred in 46% of grade C, 19% of grade B and 0% of grade A lesions. Sixty eight% of recurrences were detected within 12 months and 93% within 36 months after surgery. Recurrences were detected by clinical examination in 71% of cases. CEA determination was sensitive (81% and specific (92%) for detection of recurrences in the remaining patients. Four patients (14%) were reoperated on with a survival of 3 to 26 months, all dying from disseminated disease. We conclude that this program did not help to improve the 5 year survival rate of colorectal carcinoma submitted to curative resection. CEA determination may be indicated at 2 month intervals during the period of increased recurrence risk.[A comparative evaluation of methods for diagnosing recurrence of rectal cancer after radical surgery].As a result of a study of 173 cases of rectal cancer, applicability of bleomycin-111indium for diagnosis of tumor recurrences was shown. Assays of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a separate diagnostic procedure proved inadequate due to their low sensitivity (42.1%). Since the effectiveness of ultrasonography application in diagnosing rectal cancer was as high as 91%, it should be recommended for follow-up of radically operated patients.Recurrence of colorectal cancer after hepatic resection.Survival estimates of 95, 65, and 49 percent at 1, 3, and 5 years, respectively, after hepatic resection in 77 patients when all gross metastatic cancer was removed compare favorably with the series of Wagner et al [20] of untreated, apparently comparable patients. In the present series, recurrent disease was evident after hepatic resection, most commonly in the lungs; the liver; and locally, in that order. About half of the 45 patients with a second recurrence were operated on, and the recurrence was completely removed in roughly half of these patients. A median survival estimate of 31 months (range 1 to 67 months) after complete removal of the second recurrence was better than the survival estimate of 14 months (range 1 to 18 months) for those in whom the recurrence could not be removed (p less than 0.01). An elevated carcinoembryonic antigen level as the only indicator of recurrence after hepatic resection has proved to be an ominous prognostic sign.Reoperation directed by carcinoembryonic antigen level: the importance of a thorough preoperative evaluation.Many asymptomatic patients suspected to have recurrent colorectal cancer based on an elevated carcinoembryonic antigen level will be spared unnecessary operation if strict attention is paid to their preoperative evaluation. Liver and renal function should be assessed. Unresectable extraabdominal and intraabdominal recurrence or metastases should be excluded. Patients being evaluated for recurrence after curative resection of a rectosigmoid cancer should undergo a bone scan. Having satisfactorily ensured normal results for these investigations, the surgeon should then proceed to search for an intraabdominal source of tumor recurrence.[Effect of serial CEA determination on diagnosis, therapy and prognosis of recurrent colorectal cancer].A rising CEA level did not indicate an early tumour recurrence in the follow-up of 660 patients with curative surgery because of colorectal carcinoma. In case of rectal carcinoma the first rise of the tumour marker preceded diagnosis of recurrence by other means 7.9 months on an average, in case of colonic carcinoma 5.1 months. The long-term survival after secondary procedure was 17.5% for patients with normal CEA value at time of reoperation and surmounted life expectancy of patients with rising tumour-marker level significantly (5.9%). The worst prognosis was found for the collective with rising CEA before diagnosis of relapse by other means, none of whom was saved by reoperation. The resectability rate of metastases was higher than that of local recurrences with nearly identical survival for both groups. Because of the long CEA lead times advances in therapy by second-look procedures are to be expected mainly for patients with pelvic recurrences after abdominoperineal extirpation.[Clinical evaluation of a combination assay of CEA, CA-19-9 and TPA in patients with colorectal cancer].The effectiveness of serum CEA (56 cases), CA-19-9 (53 cases) and TPA (48 cases) in patients with colorectal cancer has been evaluated. The preoperative sensitivity and specificity of CEA and CA 19-9 were found to be almost the same in level but the level of TPA was low. In 20 cases recurrent, the sensitivity of the marker was 66.7% in the liver, 60% in the lung, and 66.7% in the local recurrence of primary foci. In these recurrent cases, serum CEA in initially elevated to 65%, CA 19-9 to 25%, and TPA to only 10%. In diagnostic rate imaging or in our clinical findings, however, the frequency was almost the same as tumor markers.Variation in recognition of recurrent colonic cancer by different CEA assays.Forty-six patients were followed with serial CEA determinations by two CEA assays after curative resection of a primary or recurrent colonic cancer. Thirteen have had a histologically proven recurrence, of which only six (46 percent) were predicted by both assays, while seven (54 percent) were predicted by one assay only. The assays appear complementary in indicating tumor recurrence, and preliminary findings suggest that it may be beneficial to follow patients with more than one CEA assay after resection of a primary or recurrent colonic cancer.[CEA determination in the follow-up of colorectal cancers].CEA follow-up checks of 135 patients with colorectal carcinoma are described in a retrospective analysis. Unambiguous correlations were found to exist between clinical tumour staging and CEA findings in the context of both primary findings and recurrences and metastasation. Typical courses are described of 107 patients who received curative treatment. An assessment is made of the value of CEA determination in postoperative follow-up.[The value of follow-up studies after surgery of carcinoma of the large intestine].Follow-up of colorectal cancer resected for cure. An experience with CEA, TPA, Ca 19-9 analysis and second-look surgery.Sixty-four consecutive patients who had undergone curative resection for colorectal carcinoma were studied prospectively to evaluate the roles of sequential CEA determinations and independent instrumental follow-up in the early detection of resectable recurrences. Fifty-two of these patients also were submitted to sequential determinations of other tumor antigens: TPA (tissue polypeptide antigen) and Ca 19-9 (colon cancer antigen detected with a monoclonal antibody), for a retrospective evaluation of their utility as markers of recurrent tumors. Twenty-two recurrences were detected in a period ranging from 12 to 72 months (median, 47 months). CEA was the best predictor of recurrence (sensitivity, 90 percent) when compared with the other two markers (TPA sensitivity, 60 percent; Ca 19-9 sensitivity, 20 percent). When compared with the instrumental or biochemical examinations of the follow-up, CEA was still the most sensitive indicator of relapse although the specificity was quite low (78 percent) if minimal significative increases were considered. History and physical examination were more useful than CEA in detecting local recurrences in rectal cancer where the preoperative CEA level was low. A few second-look explorations based solely on small CEA increases failed to demonstrate recurrence or revealed peritoneal carcinomatosis. Selected second-look surgery based on demonstrated recurrences resulted in a resectability rate of 57 percent. A follow-up program based on frequent CEA assays, history, and physical examinations, including rectal, vaginal, and perineal exploration, is proposed. Extensive instrumental investigations should follow when a minimal significative CEA rise is observed, or when history and physical examinations suggest a possible recurrence. Second-look surgery should be evaluated after confirmed or highly suspected diagnosis of recurrence, on the basis of instrumental or clinical examinations.[Value of CT following surgery for rectal cancer (a prospective study)].The results of computed tomography of 48 patients after operation on rectal carcinoma who underwent close-meshed computer tomographic examinations are given in a prospective study. (First examination 6 weeks after operation, further examinations at intervals of 3 months, mean observation time: 12 months). The results of follow-up by means of computer tomographic examination are compared with clinical examinations and control of CEA levels. The use of computer tomographic examination resulted in 43 confirmed negative, 3 confirmed positive and 2 false negative findings (including cases with CT-aided fine needle biopsy). These results give an accuracy of 96% and thus exceed clinical examination and controls of CEA-level. How far early diagnosis of local recurrence of rectal cancer influences survival time, can be answered after completion of this study in the next few years.[The doubling time of circulating CEA as an individual prognostic criterion of recurrence in patients with gastrointestinal cancers].In a prospective study of 928 patients with gastrointestinal cancer registered for primary resection, the postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) time courses were analysed in connection with disease recurrence. Only patients with established diagnosis of disease recurrence and complete follow-up to death entered the evaluation of prognostic criteria of the CEA time course. In this group the CEA time courses of 103/201 patients with recurrent disease exhibited an exponential increase of the serum CEA concentration, i.e. a linear relationship of log CEA and time, which allowed the calculation of the CEA doubling time. All 103 patients developed metastatic spread and generally exhibited CEA doubling times ranging between 10 and 158 days, in patients developing peritoneal carcinosis up to 343 days. The individual CEA doubling times of patients with recurrent disease who received no treatment (n = 71) correlated well with the times of individual survival after the initial CEA increase of the log CEA phase (rs = 0.812; P less than 0.001) thus confirming the results of a previous retrospective study. When the survival time is expressed in multiples of the individual CEA doubling time (IDT), no patient survived longer than 10.8 IDT. The median value of survival was 5.4 IDT. Patients with metastatic spread who underwent various treatments of recurrent disease (n = 32) survived distinctly longer showing survival times up to 32.6 IDT. This could be confirmed by comparing the observed survival after the initial CEA increase of treated and untreated patients (life table method) exhibiting highly significant differences (P less than 0.001).Carcinoembryonic antigen and recurrent colorectal cancer.Comparison of two CEA assays in primary and recurrent large bowel carcinoma with different DNA ploidy pattern.Pre-operative CEA levels were measured in 100 patients with large bowel carcinomas with different DNA ploidy pattern and serial post-operative determinations performed in the 64 who had been operated for cure. The follow-up period was 3 1/2-8 yr. All CEA measurements were performed consecutively with a RIA (Roche), and subsequently repeated in one batch with an EIA (Roche) based on a monoclonal antibody. Both assays showed a similar number of 'false-negative' CEA levels pre-operatively--varying from 69% in aneuploid (AN) Dukes' A to 8% in AN Dukes' D tumours, and from 75% in near diploid (ND) Dukes' A to 40% in ND Dukes' D tumours. The sensitivity for detecting recurrence in patients with tumours of either ploidy pattern was slightly better with EIA than with RIA. A difference between the AN and ND group was shown somewhat better with RIA, the sensitivity in the AN group being 79% and the median lead time 7 months compared to 13% and 2 months in the ND group. The corresponding figures with EIA were 71% and 7 months for the AN group and 63% and 1 1/2 months for the ND group. However, all but one of the patients with ND DNA pattern who showed recurrence-associated CEA elevation with EIA also had an elevated level pre-operatively. We conclude that all patients operated for cure should be followed by regular CEA measurements post-operatively if they had an elevated CEA level prior to operation.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Carcinoembryonic antigen slope analysis as an early indicator for recurrence of colorectal carcinoma.We analyzed the time course of postoperative serum CEA concentrations in 229 patients with histologically confirmed colorectal carcinoma. Preoperative CEA levels were correlated with Dukes' stages, however, the preoperative CEA value was of limited value as a screening procedure. In 42 patients with tumor recurrence after radical resection, a diagnosis of relapse, based on a rise in the CEA concentration, preceded the positive clinical symptoms. Analysis of the CEA time course made it possible to differentiate local tumor recurrence and generalized metastasis, regardless of the histologic type or primary site of the tumor.[Value of CEA in the early diagnosis of colorectal cancer recurrence in the light of second-look results].[Determination of carcinoembryonic and carbohydrate antigens in the diagnosis of recurrences and metastases of rectal cancer].A study was made of the results of measuring the carcinoembryonic and carbohydrate antigens using a kit of reagents in 75 patients with rectal cancer recurrences and metastases. The concentration of these antigens in healthy persons was for CEA 6.4 +/- 0.71 micrograms/l, the carbohydrate antigen--19.6 +/- 2.51 units/ml. In this group of patients rectal cancer local recurrence was found in 52, metastases to the liver in 19 and metastatic involvement of the liver and lungs in 4. An elevated level of the CEA was detected in 92.8% of the patients with cancer recurrence (the mean concentration was 99.9 +/- 9.29 micrograms/l), and in 100% of the patients with metastases (the mean concentration was 193.4 +/- 30.42 micrograms/l). The content of the carbohydrate antigen in cancer recurrences was raised in 21.3% of the cases only, in metastases to the liver in 31.6% and in 2 patients with metastatic liver and lung involvement. Thus, measuring the CEA content turned out to be the most specific and sensitive test for the diagnosis of rectal cancer recurrences and metastases. The use of the carbohydrate antigen for this purpose was found ineffective.[Clinical evaluation of the tumor marker CA 19-9 in comparison with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in surgical pre- and postoperative diagnosis].A new tumor marker (CA 19-9) was investigated. CA 19-9 is a tumor-associated antigen which is detected by a monoclonal antibody. CA 19-9 (CIS-Centocor) was compared simultaneously with CEA (carcinoembryonic antigen) in 347 patients. 123 patients with gastrointestinal tumors showed a sensitivity of 31% for CA 19-9 (CEA 49%), combination increased sensitivity to 58%. The highest sensitivity was found in pancreas carcinoma (CA 19-9 75%, CEA 66%, combination 92%); it was lower in gastric, colon, and oesophagus carcinomas. In relapsed colorectal carcinomas sensitivity was 53% (CEA 78%, combination 85%). In cases of relapse, tumor markers may become positive even if they were not detectable before resection of the primary tumor. Specificity for CA 19-9 was 100% (CEA 84%) compared to a group of non-malignant diseases including patients with inflammations and patients with nicotin abuse (n = 102). Because of its high specificity and superior sensitivity to CEA in pancreas carcinomas CA 19-9 should be determined in primary and relapse diagnosis in combination with CEA.Serial levels of CA 19-9 and CEA in colonic cancer.The use of serial carbohydrate antigen (CA) 19-9 assays was assessed by comparison with serial carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) levels on the plasmas of 53 patients with colorectal carcinoma. The patients had all undergone resection for their primary tumors and in six instances subsequent resections for hepatic metastases. Initial CA 19-9 levels were greater than or equal to 37 U/mL in 22 of the 53 patients (41%) and in 68% of the patients with metastatic disease. Similar trends of serial CA 19-9 and CEA levels were found in 79% of the 53 patients. One patient with initially normal CEA levels had elevated CA 19-9 levels from the start. In ten of the 53 patients (19%), serial CA 19-9 levels remained low despite tumor recurrence or progression, and despite increasing CEA levels above 5 ng/mL. The increasing serial CEA trends predicted recurrence in 88% and increasing CA 19-9 trends in 50% of cases, which was increased to 70% by including trends of CA 19-9 levels below 37 U/mL. Following hepatic lobectomy, both serial CEA and CA 19-9 levels decreased rapidly. Used alone, serial CA 19-9 levels did not appear to be as sensitive as standard CEA in this retrospective study of selected patients.[Carcinoembryonic antigen: diagnosis and tumor progression in gastrointestinal tumors].Tumour progression in 340 patients with resected gastrointestinal primary tumours was monitored using the gradual increase in carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in serum. The commencement of the rise in CEA generally preceded clinical detection of the cancer by several months. The degree to which the rise in CEA correlated with the recurrence of cancer was investigated. There was a marked difference in the distribution of the rises in CEA between local tumour growth and distant metastases. CEA increases of more than 1 microgram CEA/l serum in 10 days occurred exclusively in patients with distant metastases. There was a further marked difference in the distribution of the CEA increase between the group with liver metastases and the groups with peritoneal carcinomatosis or other metastases. The site of the primary tumour had no influence on the CEA increase during formation of metastases.[Colorectal cancer recurrence. Early diagnosis by determination of a carcinoembryonic antigen in the serum].[Prospective follow-up study of radically resected colorectal carcinoma. Status after 5 years].207 patients curatively resected for colorectal cancer have been followed up in a prospective, controlled study using serial CEA, ultrasound, colonoscopy and clinical examination for early detection of recurrent tumor. After a median follow-up of 2.5 years, 52 recurrences (25%) have been detected, rising CEA value being the most sensitive indicator (86%) among the diagnostic procedures. 26 patients were reoperated for recurrent disease; in 10 out of 19 patients with local and 3 out of 7 patients with distant recurrence a potentially curative resection was possible. Median survival of patients not operated upon (n = 26) or incompletely resected (n = 13) is 8.5 months, whereas median survival for the 13 patients reoperated for cure has not yet been reached at 2 1/2 years. With respect to resectability, thorough clinical examination and endoscopy have been the most sensitive examinations (both 44%). Aggressive follow-up for suitable patients with colorectal cancer will detect most of the recurrences in an early asymptomatic phase, increase the rate of resectability and prolong survival in selected, curatively reresected cases.Results of a 400-patient carcinoembryonic antigen second-look colorectal cancer study.Four hundred patients with resectable colon and rectal cancers were operated on by 37 surgeons at 31 institutions. Patients were monitored with carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) level determinations and clinical examinations. One hundred thirty patients had recurrences, and 75 were reoperated on, with 43 reoperations CEA-directed and 32 clinically directed. Two of 75 died within 1 month after the second operation. Twenty-two second-look patients remain free of disease 5 years after their second operation. The highest resectability of recurrent cancer occurred in patients with a CEA level below 11 ng/ml in whom the CEA level was determined at intervals of 1 to 2 months.Eighty-four potential second-look operations based on sequential carcinoembryonic antigen determinations and clinical investigations in patients with recurrent gastrointestinal cancer.In our study of patients with resected primary gastrointestinal cancer, slope analysis of the post-operatively increasing carcinoembryonic antigen time courses signaled relapse in about 80 percent of the patients up to 12 months before positive clinical diagnosis. In 29 patients, clinical confirmation of the relapse could be obtained only after second-look surgery. Slope analysis generally differentiated localized from metastatic disease and therefore also predicted the site of relapse. A first evaluation of 84 patients with potential cases of second-look operations provided evidence for a significant increase in survival. Recently, the evaluation of individual carcinoembryonic antigen doubling times was used to derive an individual prognosis since doubling times strongly correlated with the survival of untreated patients. On this basis, it was clearly possible to show the benefit of second-look operation, since patients with resectable recurrences exhibited longer survival times compared with patients with similar carcinoembryonic antigen doubling times without treatment. Moreover, the introduction of monoclonal antibodies with increased specificity for malignant states, has facilitated the selection of patients for second-look operation because unspecific carcinoembryonic antigen elevations are less frequent and recurrent disease can be predicted more reliably due to the higher carcinoembryonic antigen increments associated with malignant growth.Detection of recurrent cancer of the colon and rectum.Outpatient follow-up in patients operated upon due to carcinoma of the colon and rectum is usually performed, due to a high rate of recurrence and with the aim of finding a curable recurrence. Due to the enormous cost of an extended follow-up system, a careful evaluation of the benefit is needed. The aim of the present investigation was to study the efficacy of the different tools in an extended follow-up. One hundred ninety patients with carcinoma of the colon and rectum were--apart from traditional clinical follow-up--followed with an extensive laboratory battery including carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), hemoglobin (Hb), electrophoresis, ALP, and GT. Forty-seven recurrences were found. Thirty-one of these recurrences were first detected by a rise in CEA. Seven cases were detected at clinical follow-up and six cases due to symptoms suggestive of recurrence. The predictive value of a positive test was 79.4% for CEA but very low for the other tests studied. A negative value for any of the tests in the battery was usually accurate. Follow-up after colorectal carcinoma should include CEA as the only laboratory parameter. Postoperative colonoscopy for removal of missed synchronous lesions, chest X-ray, and endoscopic investigations of the anastomotic region also seem to be of value.Detection of recurrent rectosigmoid carcinoma: prospective evaluation of CT and clinical factors.Twenty-nine patients who underwent curative resection for rectosigmoid carcinoma were followed for 1-4 years by history and physical examination, computed tomography, liver function tests, and carcinoembryonic antigen levels. Recurrences occurred in 13 patients: seven asymptomatic and six symptomatic. CT scans, obtained in 10 of these 13 patients, were positive in nine. Liver function tests were not elevated in any and carcinoembryonic antigen was abnormal in six of 11 patients. CT is the most sensitive test for the detection of recurrent disease.Value of serum levels of carcinoembryonic antigen, CEA, and gastrointestinal cancer antigen, GICA or CA 19-9, for preoperative staging and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal carcinoma.Serum levels of gastrointestinal cancer antigen (GICA) and carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) were determined in 167 patients with colorectal carcinoma. Eighty-eight patients were studied preoperatively, and 79 postoperatively, before, at the time of, and after the diagnosis of relapse. The authors aimed to assess how often the GICA test failed, i.e., was false-negative in patients in whom the CEA test was true-positive and, more importantly, whether it could give diagnostic information in patients in whom the CEA test failed. Before surgery, serum GICA gave similar information to serum CEA in 56 percent of the patients: true-positive in 18 percent and false-negative in 38 percent; less information in 42 percent; and more information in only 2 percent. During the postoperative follow-up, serum GICA gave similar information to serum CEA in 55 percent of the patients: true-positive (i.e., rising persistently from a postoperative nadir) in 27 percent and false-negative in 28 percent; less information in 44 percent; and more information in only 1 percent. Therefore, this test in its present version, where both the catcher and the tracer antibody are the same, NS 19-9, is redundant.The clinical validity of circulating tumor-associated antigens CEA and CA 19-9 in primary diagnosis and follow-up of patients with gastrointestinal malignancies.The clinical validity of monitoring the tumor markers carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and CA 19-9 were investigated in 602 patients with colorectal, gastric, and pancreatic carcinomas. Sensitivity and specificity of the tests were evaluated preoperatively as well as in the postoperative follow-up for early detection of disease progression and recurrence. At a 95% level of specificity as calculated from a group of 150 patients with benign diseases, the CEA test with monoclonal antibody had a preoperative sensitivity of 39% in colorectal cancer and 21% in gastric cancer. On the other hand, CA 19-9 had a sensitivity of 19% in colorectal cancer, 21% in gastric cancer, and 89% in pancreatic cancer. In the postoperative follow-up it was found that a combination of both tumor marker tests was most profitable in gastric carcinomas, yielding an increase of sensitivity from 59%-94%, showing a high degree of complementarity. The gain in sensitivity provided by the CA 19-9 test over the CEA-test in colorectal cancer was very low. The gain in sensitivity, however, provided by the CEA test over the CA 19-9 test in pancreatic carcinoma was also very low. On the basis of these results it has to be recommended that cases with pancreatic carcinoma are to be monitored most efficiently with the CA 19-9 test, whereas in cases with colorectal cancer the CEA test should be used primarily. However, in gastric cancer the combined use of CEA and CA 19-9 represents a highly valuable basis for monitoring the course of disease.Serum CEA testing in the post-operative surveillance of colorectal carcinoma.Six hundred and sixty-three patients were followed with serial serum CEA measurements in addition to routine clinical surveillance after radical resection of colorectal carcinoma. Of 626 available for analysis, 366 (58.4%) remained clinically free of recurrence and had a normal CEA (less than 20 ng ml-1) throughout and 89 (14.2%) had a temporary non-progressive rise in CEA with no evidence of secondary disease. Of 171 patients who developed proven or suggestive recurrence, 114 had a preceding rise in the serum CEA and in further 21 the CEA rose simultaneously with recurrence. In 36 patients secondary disease was detected while the CEA was still within normal limits. CEA was more effective as an early index of distant metastasis, thus in 76% of those patients with a preceding rise in CEA, the secondary disease was disseminated, whereas only 20% had localised recurrence. The pattern of rise in CEA was of no practical value in distinguishing localised from distant recurrence.Local recurrence following 'curative' surgery for large bowel cancer: I. The overall picture.The Large Bowel Cancer Project is a collaborative prospective study of 4228 patients with a histologically proven adenocarcinoma, of whom 2336 (55 per cent) survived a 'curative' resection. Follow-up information is available on 2220 patients (95 per cent). Subsequently, 309 (14 per cent) have developed a local recurrence confirmed by: biopsy (127; 41 per cent), clinical examination (77; 25 per cent), X-ray (15; 5 per cent), a raised CEA (2; 1 per cent), or some other method - e.g. CT scan or a confident unbiopsied laparotomy finding (88; 29 per cent). Statistically significant factors (chi2 test, P less than 0.05) associated with local recurrence are: Dukes' classification: A 4 per cent; B 13 per cent; C 18 per cent Tumour differentiation: Well 11 per cent; Moderate 14 per cent; Poor 21 per cent Obstruction: Absent 13 per cent; Present 21 per cent Perforation: Absent 13 per cent; Present 28 per cent Tumour mobility: Freely mobile 11 per cent; Others 21 per cent Operation performed (rectal and rectosigmoid tumours): Abdomino-perineal 12 per cent; Anterior resection 18 per cent; Surgeon (Consultant only): Range less than 5 per cent to greater than 20 per cent. Stratification of the above variables altered only the statistical significance pertaining to tumour differentiation (P less than 0.1, d.f. = 2). In particular, the differences between Consultant surgeons remained.Follow-up of patients with colorectal cancer.In our follow-up study of 65 patients after curative surgery for colorectal cancer, tests other than history and physical examination detected only two cases of potentially curable recurrent colorectal cancer. As a routine follow-up test, carcinoembryonic antigen determination is preferable to computerized tomographic scanning, since the sensitivity and specificity of carcinoembryonic antigen and computerized tomographic scanning were found to be equivalent and carcinoembryonic antigen is much less expensive. There was no benefit to the routine use of liver function tests or chest roentgenograms during follow-up. Since barium enema contributed little to what colonoscopy accomplished with greater comfort to the patient, barium enemas should be used only when colonoscopy is not totally successful in reaching the cecum. The most beneficial aspect of the follow-up of these patients is probably the elimination of future metachronous lesions by removal of small, benign polyps.[Prognostic value of CEA in postoperative monitoring of colorectal cancers].The prognostic value of CEA for the purposes of postoperative monitoring assessed in 45 patients with cancer of the colon and rectum. Values were obtained 1-36 months after surgery in all operable cases. Means were also evaluated statistically at various follow-up times. In patients who relapsed, values stayed significantly higher for up to 6 months after surgery than in those who did not. Cockran's method showed that the prognostic significance of this difference 6 months after surgery was p less than 0.05.A prospective evaluation of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in the management of colorectal carcinoma.[Carcinoembryonic antigen in colo-rectal tumors. Prognostic evaluation and postoperative monitoring].CEA radioimmunoassay. Clinical applications in colorectal cancer.Since 1978 carcino-embryonic antigen determinations (CEA) have been used systematically in the preoperative as well as in the postoperative assessment of 139 patients operated for colorectal cancers. From these data results that CEA determination is of poor value for screening purposes, as 30% of the tumors don't produce the specific CEA antigen. High preoperative levels which normalize after operation, are equal to curative resection. The importance of CEA is emphasized in the postoperative follow-up of especially Dukes B and C lesions, where starting from normal base figures, increasing CEA levels are suggesting recurrences, long before their clinical evidence. Serial CEA determinations may show a slow rise, and in these cases a second look procedure can be considered. Clinical examination stays primordial; CEA is a good marker, and on account of the low cost, allows to be inserted in the postoperative follow-up scheme.[Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in surgically treated cancer of the large intestine].Preoperative CEA value. Dukes stage and recurrence rate have been evaluated in 112 patients with large bowel cancer. Recurrence rate within 24 months was significantly higher (33% vs. 10%, p = 0.01) for preoperative CEA values of more than 5 ng/ml. In patients with moderately or poorly differentiated adenocarcinoma the recurrence rate was nearly 40% if the preoperative CEA value was elevated. Among 13 CEA-detected early recurrences, 3 (23%) have been cured by resection.[Clinical usefulness of the study of serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) for the determination of the degree of tumor progression, prognosis and monitoring of surgical treatment of neoplasms of the large intestine].Limitations of CEA monitoring as a guide to second-look surgery in colorectal cancer follow-up.Forty-two patients with localized colorectal cancer (Dukes' A, B, C stages) were treated with potentially curative surgery and controlled with a follow-up program, which included CEA monitoring, for a period ranging from 12 to 48 months (median 33 months). During this period, we observed recurrent neoplastic disease in 14 patients. A retrospective analysis of the results showed that: 1. patients with a preoperative CEA value greater than 20 ng/ml have a significantly higher risk of recurrence than the patients with CEA less than 20 ng/ml; 2. sensitivity of the CEA test was good for metastatic recurrent disease, fairly good for residual neoplastic disease, but insufficient for local recurrence; 3. test-specificity was poor, as demonstrated by the negative results of four exploratory laparotomies performed exclusively on the basis of increased CEA levels. Since the principal aim of a second-look operation is the cure of local recurrence, this type of surgery cannot be proposed only on the basis of increased CEA levels.Role of carcinoembryonic antigen in detection of asymptomatic disseminated disease in colorectal carcinoma.Fifty one patients were studied prospectively to evaluate the role of sequential determinations of the carcino-embryonic antigen concentration in the detection of asymptomatic disseminated disease after curative resection for colorectal carcinoma. Computed tomography of the liver was performed during the immediate postoperative period in all patients. Serum concentrations of the antigen were estimated at three month intervals for a minimum of two years. Computed tomography at the time of operation detected occult hepatic metastases in 12 patients. Of the remaining 39 patients, six developed local recurrence alone, two developed disseminated disease in the absence of hepatic metastases, and one developed hepatic disease at 10 months, as detected by sequential computed tomography. Of all 13 patients with asymptomatic hepatic metastases, only eight developed an increase in serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentrations before death. The median interval between detection by computed tomography and rise in antigen concentrations was 7.5 months. The corresponding median interval from increase in concentration to death was only 5.5 months. Of the six patients who developed local recurrence alone, only two had raised concentrations of the antigen. These results suggest that increase in the serum carcinoembryonic antigen concentration occurs late in colorectal carcinoma.[Diagnostic value of the assay of beta 2 microglobulin during the monitoring of surgically-treated colorectal cancers. Comparison with carcinoembryonic antigen].This work presents an evaluation of the diagnostic value of seric beta 2-microglobulin in the follow-up of operated colorectal cancers. Ninety-one patients were operated on with a curative intent between 1976 and 1979. These patients were followed for at least 2 years and divided in 2 groups: a) group NR: 48 patients apparently free of loco-regional recurrence and of distant metastases, b) group R: 43 patients presenting a cancerous relapse. High levels of beta 2-microglobulin were found in 21 patients of group NR (specificity: 56 p. 100) and in 25 patients of group R (sensitivity: 58 p. 100). In the same population, the specificity and the sensitivity of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) for the diagnosis of a relapse were 92 p. 100 and 88 p. 100 respectively. No significant statistical correlation was observed between the levels of beta 2-microglobulin and CEA. The sensitivity of the association beta 2-microglobulin + CEA was not superior to the dosage of CEA alone despite its reduced specificity (54 p. 100). These results indicate that the diagnostic value of the dosage of beta 2-microglobulin is inferior to that of CEA and is without interest for the detection of tumoral recurrence in the postoperative follow-up of colorectal cancers.Is CEA analysis of value in screening for recurrences after surgery for colorectal carcinoma?The progress of 139 patients operated upon for cure of colorectal carcinoma, was followed postoperatively with a standardized protocol. A CEA test was performed for comparison with other parameters. Median observation time was four years. When an upper limit for CEA of 7.5 micrograms/1 was allowed, sensitivity was found to be 78 per cent, specificity 91 per cent, and predictive value of an elevated CEA concentration, 83 per cent. In general, CEA measurement traced recurrence six months before clinical diagnosis. In only a few cases was recurrence first heralded by an abnormality in other blood chemistry test results. CEA may thus be used in postoperative screening for recurrence even though most recurrences, when detected, are not curable.Clinical significance of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in patients with adenocarcinoma in colon and rectum.Determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in serum has been performed in 253 patients with proved adenocarcinoma in the colon and rectum. Preoperative CEA was normal in 58.3% of the patients. A correlation between CEA level and Dukes' grading was found. There was, however, no statistically significant difference in recurrence rate between patients with normal and patients with elevated pre-operative CEA. Transient CEA elevation was seen in the follow-up period after curative resection in 21.8%. 75% of the patients with recurrence had abnormal CEA, and CEA elevation was the first sign of recurrence in 59.1%. The majority of these patients, however, had advanced disease not available for surgical treatment. In cases with local resectable tumour CEA often was normal. Only a few patients had advantage of CEA determination for diagnosis of recurrence and its routine use is therefore questioned.Plasma CEA in the post-surgical monitoring of colorectal carcinoma.This paper reports the findings of the M.R.C., study into the use of the plasma CEA test for early detection of recurrence following "successful" surgery for colorectal carcinoma. This study was set up in 1973, and represents the largest series of patients published on this topic. It was primarily prospective, 468 patients being entered at the time of, or after the initial diagnosis of colorectal carcinoma. Follow-up was for at least 2 years, and both initially and throughout the follow-up the clinician treating the patient was kept "blind" to the patient's plasma CEA level. The general conclusion is that the CEA test provides a useful additional tool for the early detection of recurrence in these patients. Sixty-five per cent of patients with recurrence showed a raised plasma CEA level, and over half the patients who developed recurrence had a raised level some time before the disease was detected by other means. A surprising number of patients had a raised CEA level on a single occasion which subsequently returned to normal at the next follow-up and did not seem to be associated with malignancy. The problems associated with this type of study and their limiting effect on interpretation are discussed.Correlation of single and serial CEA determinations with the clinical evolution of cancer patients.The correlation between CEA results and the clinical evolution of 56 patients with breast and colorectal cancer, was studied. In mammary cancer (41 patients) there was a correspondence of 75% between single initial CEA values and clinical state at the time of the determination. For colorectal cancer patients the correspondence was 80%. A follow up of the patients during 4 years permitted the evaluation of serial CEA results in the prognosis of the disease. Two or more consecutive CEA results with the same significance (increased or normal) correlated better than single values with the clinical evolution of the disease (93% of correspondence). Normal values in patients with active disease were indicative of favourable prognosis; the appearance of single values above normal but below three times the upper normal limit, do not justify changes in the installed therapy. Two or more consecutive increased results are indicative of present or future deterioration of the patient. Cases of non-correspondence between consecutive serial. CEA results and clinical evolution of the patient are considered as "real false results" (7%). Serial CEA determination resulted very useful in the follow up of the oncological patient in the frame of other laboratory and diagnostic means, as a part of the periodic clinical control.Serial CEA assays and liver scintigraphy for the detection of hepatic metastases from colorectal carcinoma.Of 340 patients with histologically proven colorectal carcinoma, hepatic metastases were diagnosed in 90 (26 per cent), in 50 at the time of initial surgery (synchronously) and in 40 during the post-operative follow-up (metachronously). At the time of initial surgery, plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels were markedly elevated in patients with synchronous metastases and normal or only moderately elevated in those with metachronous metastases. During follow-up, CEA levels in the entire group of patients with metastases remained normal in 8 per cent and rose in the remainder: very quickly in 85 per cent and slowly in 15 per cent. Hepatic metastases were diagnosed by strict scintigraphic criteria in 70 per cent of patients and were suggested by liberal criteria in the remainder. During follow-up, hepatic metastases progressed in the scintigraphic image from those defined by liberal to those diagnosed by strict criteria. In two-thirds of the patients, liver scintigraphy proved to be superior to the CEA test in diagnosing hepatic metastases by strict criteria; in the majority of the remainder of patients, the CEA test, particularly in cases with a pattern of fast increase of CEA in plasma, suggested metastases before a definite diagnosis could be made by liver scintigraphy. In only 3 per cent of the patients neither liver scintigraphy nor the CEA test were indicative of metastases. Thus, the two diagnostic modalities, when combined, could attain a sensitivity of 97 per cent, when patients with persistently rising CEA levels and concomitant liver lesions defined by the liberal criteria were grouped with those for whom scintigraphy was unequivocal.CEA monitoring among patients in multi-institutional adjuvant G.I. therapy protocols.The Gastrointestinal Tumor Study Group (GITSG) has since 1975 included protocols for monitoring carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in its colorectal cancer adjuvant trials. Among the 563 patients on the colon cancer study (GI 6175) and the 207 patients on the rectal cancer study (GI 7175), one third had preoperative CEA determinations and more than 90% had some postoperative CEA monitoring. Colon cancer patients whose preoperative CEA was greater than 5 ng/ml had a greater probability of recurring than those whose values were lower (33% versus 18% recurrence with 21 months minimum follow-up; p < 0.05). The prognostic value of preoperative CEA was apparent only in patients with Dukes' C1 colon tumors. Preoperative CEA values were not of prognostic significance among the rectal adenocarcinoma patients. Although elevated levels of CEA after resection of either colon or rectum cancers were strongly associated with subsequent tumor recurrence, no single CEA value, arbitrarily defined as "elevated", provided an adequate screening test with both high sensitivity and high specificity. Postoperative CEA elevations were more strongly predictive of recurrence when part of a steadily rising trend. In the colon cancer study, the median monthly increase in CEA for disease-free patients was estimated to be zero, and for the relapsed patients 5.8%. The corresponding estimates for patients on the rectal cancer protocol were zero and 7.8%. Only 36 of the 344 disease-free patients on the colon protocol and 14 of the 94 disease-free patients on the rectal protocol (15%) exhibited a rate of increase of CEA as high as 3% per month over the entire period of observation. Two thirds of the relapsed patients on both studies showed a rate of increase this high or higher. The patterns of CEA rise in individual patients were quite varied, however, and monthly rates of increase as established in our study are not to be used as guidelines in patient management.Carcinoembryonic antigen: usefulness as a postsurgical method in the detection of recurrence in Dukes stages B2 and C colorectal cancers.Sequential carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) plasma levels were obtained postoperatively in 181 patients with colorectal Dukes stages B2 and C colorectal cancers to assess their usefulness as part of a follow-up program designed to detect disease progression. In all, 1,684 determinations were obtained in patients who were, at the time, free of any clinical or radiologic evidence of disease. If individual CEA determinations are considered and if 10 ng/ml is specified as the limit between normal and elevated CEA levels, both sensitivity (45.0%) and specificity (93.4%) make determination of CEA levels an acceptable screening test in this well-defined population, especially as it also fulfills the criteria of patient acceptance, potential benefit to the patient, and low cost. Preoperative CEA levels were also determined in 93 of the 181 patients, and these results confirm the prognostic value of the slope between preoperative and postoperative CEA levels.Predictive value of plasma CEA levels: preoperative prognosis and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal carcinoma.Plasma CEA levels were determined in 280 patients with histologically proven colorectal carcinoma: in 180 once or twice preoperatively and repeatedly postoperatively, and in 100 postoperatively only. Preoperative levels correlated directly with surgical-pathologic state and inversely with the time of recurrence; i.e., groups of patients with more advanced stage showed higher proportion of elevated CEA levels, and patients with higher levels had recurrences earlier. Levels above 20 ng/ml were strongly suggestive of liver metastases or disseminated disease. Postoperative plasma CEA levels displayed three patterns of variation. 1) Levels fluctuating within normal range, below 3.2 ng/ml, strongly evidenced that surgery was effective, and 2) those fluctuating below 7.5 ng/ml indicated usually nonmalignant concomitant disease; in either group no more than 10 per cent of the patients had recurrences. 3) Levels rising persistently from a postoperative nadir indicated recurrence or, when the rise was dramatic, liver metastases or disseminated cancer in at least 97 per cent of the patients.A retrospective study of serial CEA determinations in the early detection of recurrent colorectal cancer.In the past five years, routine CEA determinations have been carried out on all patients after curative operation for colorectal carcinoma. These patients also underwent a clinical follow-up examination in the Oncology Outpatient Department. In 86 patients, recurrence of a tumor was confirmed. In 31 cases, a second-look operation was carried out. The CEA determinations were retrospectively analyzed in these patients and correlated with the time the recurrence of the tumor was diagnosed. These results show that of 86 patients only 15 (17.4 per cent) had pathologic CEA values before clinical symptoms of tumor recurrence. In the patient group with local recurrence, only 11 (23.9 per cent) of 46 patients had previously pathologically raised CEA values. Of 31 patients, 15 (48.4 per cent) underwent curative resection after the second-look operation. At this time, 12 patients (38.7 per cnt) still had normal CEA values, whereas only three patients (9.7 per cent) had pathologically raised CEA values. From these results, it was established that early diagnosis of tumor recurrence was very low. Therefore, one should not rely more on postoperative routine CEA determinations in the postoperative monitoring of patients following curative operations for colorectal carcinoma than on regular comprehensive follow-up examinations of these patients.Postoperative screening of patients with carcinoma of the colon.A prospective evaluation of 149 patients with Dukes' B2 or C colorectal carcinoma, including periodic history, physical examination, chest radiograph, liver function tests, complete blood count, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) radioimmunoassay, barium enema, and endoscopic studies, has been underway since 1976. Thirty-four patients have had recurrence. This study suggests that the history of CEA are the most sensitive noninvasive methods with which to detect recurrent tumors but are unlikely to indicate recurrence at a therapeutically advantageous stage.The usefulness and limitations of CEA assay in the management of colorectal cancer.We investigated the usefulness and limitations of the measurement of CEA in the evaluation of tumor resection and the detection of recurrence in colorectal cancer patients. Preoperatively, 46 of 90 patients (51.1%) had CEA values of 5.0 ng/ml or higher. The percentage of patients with elevated CEA in whom the CEA values returned to normal one month postoperatively was significantly higher in those who had undergone a curative resection than in those who had undergone a non-curative resection (p less than 0.02). Among patients with normal CEA values, the changes were nil or only slight in CEA values, one month postoperatively. Among 28 with recurrences, 24 (85.7%) had CEA values of 5.0 ng/ml or higher. All 11 with liver recurrences had values of 10.0 ng/ml or higher. In 4 with liver recurrences and in cases where CEA measurements were made, CEA values were found to be abnormal 3 to 10 months before the recurrences and a rapid elevation occurred for a short period. However, 4 out of 10 with local or lymphnode recurrences showed normal CEA values. CEA measurement was useful in detection of liver recurrences, but not so useful in detecting local or lymphnode recurrences.Prognostic significance of CEA in colorectal cancer: a statistical study.Pretreatment and serial posttreatment carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) serum levels were studied with respect to the course of disease in 222 patients with colorectal cancer. The CEA values during the subsequent six years were expressed in actuarial or cumulative plots in relation to tumour-free period, time of diagnosis of recurrence and other parameters. The pretreatment CEA value was highly significant but gave no more prognostic information than the Dukes classification. The pretreatment CEA had prognostic significance only in inoperable patients. Elevated pretreatment CEA did not exclude the possibility of curative treatment. Normalization of CEA after resection did not indicate completeness of cure. In patients with local or distant recurrences CEA occasionally rose before recurrences became clinically apparent. Positive lead time was 0-625 days. However, in about 40% of the patients clinical diagnosis of recurrence preceded a rise of CEA. Maximal negative lead time was 585 days. Statistically, recurrence without a rise of CEA was exceptional. The results strongly suggest that serial CEA determinations cannot replace physical examination and follow-up.Evaluating serial cancer marker studies in patients at risk of recurrent disease.The proportional hazards model of Cox (1972, Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Series B 34, 187--220), with a time-dependent covariate, is used to analyze serial cancer marker data. A particular advantage of this method is the case with which missing marker data are handled. Analysis of a real data set shows that high levels of the cancer marker carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) are associated with increased risk of death in patients with resected colorectal cancer. Several aspects of CEA marker history are analyzed, including CEA level at death time t, CEA level 200 days prior to time t, and whether or not CEA exceeded 5 ng/ml prior to t. Methods to test the hypothesis of no marker effect and to give estimates and confidence intervals for model parameters are outlined both for continuous and for grouped time-to-response data. For grouped data a likelihood ratio test of the proportional hazards assumption is suggested.Value of serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations for early detection of recurrent cancer.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) has been monitored at intervals of approximately three months in patients who had undergone potentially curative surgery for breast cancer, head and neck cancer, lung cancer, and colorectal cancer, but who were considered to be at high risk of recurrence. Monitoring of CEA in patients' serum was of no value for the early detection of tumour recurrence in either breast or head and neck cancer patients. It was of value for the early detection of lung cancer recurrence, but these patients were always beyond the scope of cure. In colorectal cancer patients, two-thirds of recurrences were heralded by a rising CEA, but only one of 15 patients had disease confined to local tissues which could be totally excised, although a further three patients had liver metastases which were apparently localized to one lobe of the liver. For colorectal cancer patients, serial CEA estimations are an effective method for the early diagnosis of recurrence, although this seldom translates into improved patient benefit.A statistical evaluation of baseline and follow-up carcinoembryonic antigen in patients with resectable colorectal carcinoma.A long-term CEA follow-up was evaluated statistically for a series of 74 patients with primary colorectal carcinoma who underwent resections for cure. Thirty-three recurrences and 29 deaths were reported among this population after a median follow-up interval of 55 months. Preoperative CEA levels correlated with the Dukes' classification. However, the preoperative level adds significant information to Dukes' classification in the prediction of recurrence. Postoperative CEA assays taken later in the clinical evaluation process carry the most prognostic information for subsequent recurrence. Using matched-pairs techniques, the authors noted that CEA often rose in anticipation of recurrence, sometimes as early as one year before recurrence. The following four follow-up CEA events were evaluated: 1) three consecutive rising CEA's 2) CEA rises 5.0 ng/ml; 3) CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml; 4) CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml two consecutive times. The follow-up CEA events examined were characterized by false positive rates ranging from 17% to 66% and true positive rates ranging from 43% to 56% in the prediction of recurrence. From follow-up CEA evaluations, further clinical investigation appeared most warranted when CEA exceeds 5.0 ng/ml at two consecutive follow-up evaluations, but the chances of finding any subsequent recurrent disease was near 50%. Among patients experiencing recurrences, although forewarned by CEA elevations, there was no subsequent time when patients were most likely to have recurrence of disease.[Value of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the diagnosis and postoperative monitoring of patients with colorectal cancer].Serum CEA monitoring in the follow-up of colorectal cancer patients with negative preoperative serum CEA.[The CEA-concentration in plasma of patients with colorectal carcinoma and polyps has been determined by radioimmunoassay (RIA, Z-gel-method)].82% of the cancer patients and 52% of the patients with polyps showed CEA levels above the upper normal limit of 2,5 microgram/1. CEA-values of more than 10 microgram/1 could only be detected in patients with carcinoma. Complete removal of the tumour by surgery has been followed by a marked decrease of prior increased plasma-CEA to values in the normal range, which could not be observed in the cases with tumour residues or metastases. In the patient's follow-up recurrence or metastases could be recognized several months before clinical detection by a renewed increased of the CEA-level in plasma.[Indications for repeat operations for recurrence of rectocolic cancer: contribution of serum carcino-embryonic antigen levels (author's transl)].Preoperative CEA level: a prognostic test in patients with colorectal carcinoma.Preoperative and postoperative carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels were evaluated in 42 patients with colorectal carcinoma. Preoperative CEA values correlated inversely with survival at a statistically significant level and provided prognostic information not available by pathologic staging. Postoperative plasma CEA can accurately predict recurrent disease and may, when serial values are elevated, serve as an indication for a second-look procedure.[Carcino-embryonic antigen as screening protein in the follow-up of patients with surgically-treated gastrointestinal cancer (author's transl)].Carcino-embryonic antigen (CEA) was determined in 206 patients with gastrointestinal cancer (131 colonic and 75 stomach) at the 2nd Department of Surgery of the University of Vienna. The value of CEA in predicting tumour recurrence and/or metastatic spread has been assessed within the framework of regular follow-up control examinations after surgery. A postoperative rise in CEA titre corresponded with cancer recurrence or metastasis both in patients with stomach (91%), as well as colonic cancer (86%), whilst low postoperative CEA values correlated with a negative clinical report only in patients with carcinome of the colon to any degree of accuracy (91%). The correspondence was much lower in patients with stomach cancer (67%).Results of CEA-initiated second-look surgery for recurrent colorectal cancer.The clinical significance of the pattern of elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels in recurrent colorectal cancer.Serial serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assays were performed in 148 patients after potentially curative surgery for colorectal cancer. Thirty-seven patients developed proved recurrent tumour in a follow-up period of 2-5 years. Elevated CEA levels were recorded in 36 of these patients and in 27 rising levels preceded clinical symptoms of recurrent tumour. Two distinct patterns of CEA rise were observed: a 'fast' rise in which serum concentrations reached 100 microgram/l within 6 months of the first elevation and a 'slow' rise in which concentrations remained less than 75 microgram/l for at least 12 months. The majority of patients with the 'fast' rise had metastatic spread, whereas most patients with a 'slow' rise had local recurrence alone. This differential pattern may help to predict the site of recurrent tumour.[CEA assays in postoperative detection of recurrent colorectal carcinoma (author's transl)].Carcinoembryonic antigen in the diagnosis and follow-up of colorectal carcinoma.[Interest and limits of estimation of the carcinoembryonic antigen in colonic and rectal (author's transl)].An attempt is made to define the usefulness and limitations of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) radioimmunoassay for evaluation of diagnosis, tumor resection and detection of tumor relapse in 108 patients with colorectal carcinoma. Preoperative CEA levels were correlated with pathological stage and tumors localisations. Increasing levels of CEA were found with advanced stage of disease (Stage C and D lesions). Our results indicate: 1) that an incomplete drop in circulating CEA level one month after surgery was a bad prognostic sign; 2) that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased CEA levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.Predictive value of plasma CEA in patients with colorectal carcinoma.Two years follow-up of 46 patients with colorectal carcinoma resected "for cure" shows that of the nine patients with an elevated (less than 5 ng/ml) CEA plasma titer one to six months after surgery, only one, or 11%, had remained disease free. Of the 38 patients with normal (less than 5 ng/ml) plasma CEA, 27, or 71%, were free of disease two years after surgery. In another 85 patients presenting six months to ten years after resection "for cure" of their colorectal carcinoma, normal CEA levels were found in 73, and only five, or 6.4%, of these presented with disease progression when followed for two years; of the 12 patients that presented with CEA values less than 5 ng/ml, disease progression was evident in eight or 67%; in eight patients with CEA levels of greater than 10 ng/ml, the proportion of patients with disease progression increased to 87.5% (7/8). When a patient with a history of colorectal cancer, but seemingly free of disease, presents with levels not only repeatedly above normal (greater than 5 ng/ml) but above the levels found in some nonmalignant conditions (greater than 10 ng/ml), thorough re-examination of the patient to locate the site of possible disease progression is indicated. In 14 such patients further diagnostic methods showed local recurrences in four, metastasis limited to the liver in six, and other metastasis in four. In conclusion, in patients with colorectal carcinoma postoperative elevated CEA plasma levels are a sign of poor prognosis. Consistently elevated CEA levels (greater than 10 ng/ml) are a strong indication of disease progression.Clinical value of carcinoembryonic antigen: diagnosis, prognosis, and follow-up of patients with cancer.Plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in nanograms per milliliter was assayed in 149 patients with benign and 567 patients with malignant disease. Elevated CEA level (greater than 5.0) was a good indicator of malignant disease but a poor screening test for cancer because of the high false-negative rate. Degree of elevation of plasma CEA level correlated with incidence of metastatic disease in patients with colorectal, gastric, and breast carcinomas, but no correlation was seen between CEA levels and status of lymph nodes in patients with localized disease. Patients with localized colorectal cancer, but elevated CEA levels before resection, had a 2.1-fold increase in the incidence of recurrence; however, this added to the prognostic value of Dukes' staging only when the CEA level remained elevated postoperatively. In 87% of patients with colorectal cancer, the CEA level was elevated at the time of recurrence, but a therapeutic value of reexploration for unexplained CEA level elevation was not confirmed.[Importance of the analysis of the carcinoembryonic antigen in clinical oncology].330 patients (126 with gastric neoplasms, 204 with large bowel carcinoma) were submitted to serial assays to evaluate the possible relations between C.E.A. levels, pathologic stage and histologictype of the neoplasm and to define the usefulness of the C.E.A. test in monitoring the followup of the patients with gastrointestinal neoplasms. From our experience it ensues that C.E.A. test positivity (C.E.A. greater than or equal to 5 ng/ml, according to the method employed) is higher in colon neoplasms in comparison with gastric neoplasms, in the adenocarcinomas compared with the anaplastic forms. Besides, the study of the relationship with the pathologic stage points out the scanty usefulness of the C.E.A. test in the early diagnosis of gastroenteric neoplasms (Dukes A-B-C1 = 29.2%; CH stage = 88.1%). The use of C.E.A. test during the follow up seemed us of fundamental importance. We observed that: a) after radical surgery, 72% of the patients showed a normalization of C.E.A. values; b) there is a significant relationship between clinical course and C.E.A. as it can predict, sometimes several months earlier, the occurrence of relapses and metastases; c) there is also a close relationship (P less than 0.001) between the modifications of the antigen under chemotherapy and the clinical response. At present, C.E.A. seems to play, above all, fundamental role in choosing a correct treatment after radical surgery or in modifying the chemotherapeutic treatment in non surgical cases or in non radically resected patients.A retrospective and prospective study of serial CEA determinations in the early detection of recurrent colon cancer.The results of the present study emphasize the importance of minimizing the time delay between a significant elevation in CEA and a second-look operation. Equally important are the frequency of serial determinations, a thorough understanding of the limitations of the assay, and careful evaluation of the clinical condition of the patient.Long-term follow-up of colorectal carcinoma patients by repeated CEA radioimmunoassay.The use of serial CEA determinations to predict recurrence of colon cancer and when to do a second-look operation.The concept of second-look surgery was introduced by Wangensteen 25 years ago, and 17% of patients were reported to be converted to a cancer-free state. Instead of an arbitrary time interval for reoperation, serial CEA values were used as the indicator of colon cancer recurrence and second-look operation. Twenty-two retrospective and 18 prospective patients were evaluable. There was no operative mortality. The CEA Nomogram was used to determine whether the CEA change was significant. All patient-samples were analyzed in duplicate, stored, and compared with the most recent sample; therefore, each patient served as his own control. The prospective results emphasize the importance of minimizing the time delay between a significant change in CEA values and reoperation. Equally important are the frequency of serial determinations (every one or two months), a thorough understanding of the limitations of the CEA radioimmunoassay, and the clinical condition of the patient.Use of CEA as an indicator of early recurrence and as a guide to a selected second-look procedure in patients with colorectal cancer.The usefulness of the CEA as an indicator of recurrence and a guide to selected second-look surgery was evaluated from a retrospective analysis of 358 patients with colorectal cancer and from a prospective experience with 16 patients all of whom had been admitted for second-look surgery because of postoperative elevations of CEA only. Our previous experience had shown that after curative resection the CEA usually returned to normal levels (less than 5 ng/ml) within one month, but became elevated at time of clinically obvious recurrence being very high in patients with liver metastases, but only moderately elevated or normal in patients with local recurrence. All 16 patients had previously had curative resection of colorectal cancer; 13 in the rectum or rectosigmoid and three in the right colon. There were 13 Dukes' C and three Dukes' B cancers. All had been followed clinically and by CEA testing at three monthly intervals and were considered free of disease (NED) at time of CEA elevation. The median disease free interval was 13 months (range 4-57 months) and the median CEA prompting admission for second-look operation was 21 ng/ml (range 10-56 ng/ml). The sites of recurrence were liver in six, lung in two and localized disease in six. Two patients had negative exploration for recurrence and were found to have cholelithiasis only (one of these later died of metastases). Resection for cure was done in seven and palliative resection or biopsy only was done in nine patients. At this time, four patients are NED (12-37 months), five are living with disease (10-16 months) and seven have died of disease (2-12 months). The CEA test provides a method of early detection of recurrence and may permit surgical retrieval in selected patients and earlier initiation of palliation in other patients. The longterm effects in patient salvage remain to be defined.The use of serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations to predict recurrence of carcinoma of the colon and the time for a second-look operation.Our patients have demonstrated that serial carcinoembryonic antigen determinations contributed to the detection of recurrent tumor and that shortening the delay between carcinoembryonic antigen elevation and reoperation has resulted in an increase from 27 to 78 per cent in instances of resectable recurrent tumor encountered. If these results continue to be substantiated, the carcinoembryonic antigen assay has made a significant contribution in the control of this disease. Serial carcinoembryonic antigen assays should be performed every two months. All benign inflammatory conditions that cause carcinoembryonic antigen elevations must be searched for, and ruled out, before reoperation is decided upon. The physician must be cognizant not only of the significance of the assay but also of the limitations, and he must rely heavily on his clinical judgment.Preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen level as a prognostic indicator in colorectal cancer.We examined the relation of carcinoembryonic antigen levels to time, site and extent of recurrence in 358 patients with colorectal cancer. The recurrence rate was higher in patients with Dukes' B and Dukes' C lesions who had preoperative levels higher than 5 ng per milliliter. There was a linear inverse correlation between preoperative levels and estimated mean time to recurrence in patients with Dukes' B and C lesions, ranging from 30 months for a level of 2 to 9.8 months for a level of 70 ng per milliliter. In patients with Dukes' C lesions the median time to recurrence was 13 months if preoperative levels were higher than 5 ng per milliliter, and 28 months if they were lower. Preoperative carcinoembryonic antigen levels in patients with resectable Dukes' B and C cancer provided an additional criterion for allocating these patients to groups at high or low risk for recurrence.Characteristics of adenocarcinomas of the colorectum with low levels of preoperative plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA).Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) is evaluated preoperatively and then serially postoperatively in 97 patients with colorectal carcinoma. CEA is initially elevated (greater than 2.5 ng/ml) only in 58% of the these patients. The group without preoperative CEA elevation has a statistically significant higher proporation of Dukes A lesions (p less than 0.05), seems less likely to suffer recurrence or have CEA elevation at the time of recurrence, and has a longer disease-free interval, than the group with preoperative CEA elevation. However, no distinction between the two groups can be made on the basis of the patients age, sex, presenting signs and symptoms, or location and size of their primary lesions. Higher postoperative CEA values are associated with liver metastases in both groups.Carcinoembryonic antigen test for recurrent colorectal carcinoma. Inadequacy for early detection.Serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) tests were performed on 36 patients with histologically proved locally recurrent or residual malignant disease after resection of colorectal carcinoma but with no clinical evidence of distant metastasis. Only nine patients (25%) had abnormal CEA levels of greater than 5 ng/ml despite the fact that most patients had had symptoms of recurrence for several months. Among the nine of our patients, none had CEA values greater than 5 ng/ml, and only three had levels greater than 2.5 ng/ml (3.4, 3.8, and 4.7 ng/ml). The CEA assay is not a sensitive test for early detection of recurrence of colorectal carcinoma.Carcinoembryonic antigen: 3 years' experience in a cancer clinic.Long-term studies on multiple plasma samples of 988 patients with carcinoma of entodermal origin indicate that, especially for patients with colorectal cancer, repeatedly elevated or rising carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) values are a sign of poor prognosis when found preoperatively, postoperatively or during chemotherapy. Persistently elevated CEA values in postoperative patients apparently free of disease are a useful marker for early detection of recurrence or metastases. Normal CEA values are of little or no prognostic value.Carcinoembryonic antigen: clinical and historical aspects.To further define and determine the usefulness of CEA, 1100 CEA determinations have been made over the past two years at The Ohio State University Hospitals on patients with a variety of malignant and nonmalignant conditions. Correlation of CEA titers with history and clinical course has yielded interesting results not only in cancers of entodermally derived tissues, for which CEA has become an established adjunct in management, but also in certain other neoplasms and inflammatory states. The current total of 225 preoperative CEA determinations in colorectal carcinomas shows an 81% incidence of elevation, with postoperative titers remaining elevated in patients having only palliative surgery but falling to the negative zone after curative procedures. An excellent correlation exists between CEA levels and grade of tumor (more poorly differentiated tumors showing lower titers). Left-side colon lesions show significantly higher titers than right-side lesions. CEA values have been shown to be elevated in 90% of pancreatic carcinomas studied, in 60% of metastatic breast cancers, and in 35% of other tumors (ovary, head and neck, bladder, kidney, and prostate cancers). CEA levels in 35 ulcerative colitis patients show elevation during exacerbations (51%). During remissions titers fall toward normal, although in 31% still remaining greater than 2.5 ng/ml. In the six colectomies performed, CEA levels all fell into the negative zone postoperatively. Forty percent of adenomatous polyps showed elevated CEA titers (range 2.5-10.0) that dropped following polypectomy to the negative zone. Preoperative and postoperative CEA determinations are important in assessing the effectiveness of surgery. Serial CEA determinations are important in the follow-up period and in evaluation of the other modes of therapy (e.g., chemotherapy). These determinations of tumor antigenicity give the physician added prognostic insight into the behavior of the tumor growth. Rectal examination with guaiac determinations, sigmoidoscopy, cytology, barium enema, and a good clinical evaluation remain the primary tools for detecting colorectal disease. However, in the high-risk patient suspicious of developing cancer, CEA determinations as well as colonoscopy are now being used increasingly and provide additional highly valuable tools in the physician's armamentarium.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) as a prognostic and monitoring test in clinically complete resection of colorectal carcinoma.The prognostic and postoperative monitoring capabilities of the CEA assay were compared to pathological staging of the operative specimens, clinical followup including endoscopy, radiology and scanning techniques, as well as DNCB skin testing and laboratory enzyme determinations (alkaline phosphatase and transaminase). A total of 46 patients with curative resection for colorectal carcinoma were studied. This included 23 patients with recurrent tumors compared to 23 long-term survivors without signs of recurrence at the time of the study. Preoperative CEA determinations were a good prognostic tool comparable to pathological staging of the specimen. Post operative CEA monitoring was the earliest sign of recurrence in 14 of 23 patients and was positive at the time of recurrence determined by other methods in 20; it was negative in only three cases. The incidence of false positive results among the non recurrent group became a lesser problem when repeated elevated values were required before considering the patient as having a recurrence. From these data, it seems reasonable to propose the use of a second-look operation in patients with maintained elevation of circulating CEA and no clinical signs of tumor presence, if we are to treat recurrence at an early stage. Chemotherapy would be an alternative way to deal with this problem, since the absence of clinical signs in general correlate with small bulk of tumor which at this time may be more susceptible to chemotherapeutic agents.Assessment of serial carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) assays in postoperative detection of recurrent colorectal cancer.Monthly serial postoperative CEA determinations, three-monthly system review plus physical examination, and a battery of six-monthly laboratory and radiologic tests were compared in order to evaluate each in detection of recurrent colorectal cancer. Twelve of the 33 patients studied prospectively developed recurrent disease. In this study CEA was found not to be a substitute for careful clinical follow-up, but if used in a serial manner it was a useful adjunct for detection of early recurrent cancer, especially intra-hepatic and retroperitoneal disease recurring in patients with elevated pretreatment CEA levels. The other laboratory and radiologic tests employed were often useful to confirm progressing disease, but they did not reveal any first evidence of recurrent disease.[Value and limits of the determination of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in postoperative evaluation of patients with colonic and rectal carcinomas].An attempt is made to define the usefulness and limitations of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) radioimmunoassay for evaluation of tumor resection and detection of tumor relapse in patients with large-bowel carcinoma. In 45 patients for whom complete tumor resection was reported, all but 5 showed a drop in CEA to normal values after surgery. The 5 patients whose CEA did not fall to below 5 ng/ml showed a subsequent rise in CEA level and later were all found to have a tumor relapse. The results indicate that an incomplete drop in circulating CEA level one month after surgery is a bad prognostic sign. Twenty-two of these patients were followed up by repeated CEA radioimmunoassay for several months after surgery; 8 showed a progressive increase in CEA levels preceding clinical diagnosis of tumor relapse by 2-10 months. The clinical history of these 8 patients is briefly described. The results demonstrate that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased CEA levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.CEA levels at recurrence and metastases; importance for detecting secondary disease.The relation of CEA plasma levels to prognostic factors was studied in 170 patients with various stages of colo-rectal cancer. Several parameters of known relevance for the prognosis were analyzed. Among the patients with involvement of regional lymph nodes at the time of the primary, 53% had a raised CEA value (greater than 5 ng/ml serum) as opposed to 21% when this was not the case (p less than 0.05%). When serosal break-through had occured, 47% of the patients had raised values compared to 21% of those with no serosal break-through (p less than 0.02%). After radical surgery, all patients who remained healthy acquired persistent low plasma CEA, giving the assay a prognostic value. Altogether 20 patients had local recurrences without distant metastases and were thus potential candidates for a re-operation for cure. 70% had raised CEA plasma values, giving the assay a better than expected usefulness in the clinical follow-up, the significance of the difference from operated and healthy patients or healthy control persons being high, p less than 0.001%. The secondary rise in CEA appeared to be unconnected with whether or not the primary tumor had been accompanied by raised plasma CEA. The localization and the histopathological differentiation of the primary tumor seemed to be of less importance for the serum CEA than the dissemination of the tumor.CEA as a monitor of gastrointestinal malignancy.Ninety-four patients with carcinoma of the colon have been followed with serial determinations of plasma CEA (carcinoembryonic antigen) levels over a 3-year period using the Hansen assay. Nine hundred twelve CEA determinations have been made in these patients. Plasma CEA levels rose in 90% of the instances of clinical progression documented in these patients. In 30% of patients, this rise indicated progression 6 months or more before it was detected by standard clinical methods. Unfortunately, a few patients never developed elevated CEA levels even though disease clearly progressed. False positive results have also been encountered, with significant elevations occurring in patients who have since remained without evidence of disease for several months. Our data indicate that at least two sequential elevated CEA values, the second being higher, must be a minimal criterion for consideration of possible progression of disease. Even with this standard, we have encountered false positive results in 10% of our patients, indicating recurrence or progression where none has occurred clinically. CEA measurement is of limited usefulness for 30 days after curative surgery, because the elevation of CEA levels due to the original amount of tumor present as well as due to surgery per se may persist for this length of time in a significant number of patients. On the other hand, CEA levels have responded to chemotherapy in close correlation with observed clinical course in those patients with metastatic disease treated in this series. Initial pretherapy CEA values have so far proved to be good prognostic indicators of disease course following complete resection. With an initial CEA value of less than 2.5 ng/ml of plasma, recurrent has been rare (1/20). If the pretreatment CEA was greater than 7.0 ng/ml, it has been the rule (7/9).Role of serial plasma C.E.A. assays in detection of recurrent and metastatic colorectal carcinomas.Serial estimations of plasma carcinoembryonic antigen (C.E.A.) levels have been carried out in 220 patients with colorectal carcinomas who had potentially and apparently curative surgery. In a two-year follow-up period 53 patients developed recurrences or metastases. In 36 of these patients sustained rises in plasma C.E.A. titres occurred synchronously with or between three and 18 months before the clinical detection of recurrences or metastases. The use of serial plasma C.E.A. assays is therefore recommended as an additional diagnostic aid for the earlier detection of recurrent or metastatic colorectal carcinomas.Detection of recurrence of large-bowel carcinoma by radioimmunoassay of circulating carcinoembryonic antigen (C.E.A.).The usefulness and limitations of the carcinoembryonic antigen (C.E.A.) radioimmunoassay for the evaluation of tumour resection and for the detection of tumour relapse were studied in patients with large-bowel carcinoma. The level of plasma-C.E.A. was determined before any treatment in a group of 101 patients with histologically proven adenocarcinoma of the colon and rectum. 71% of all patients and 63% of cases with localised tumour (Dukes A and B) had a preoperative C.E.A. value of 5 ng. per ml. or higher. This limit was reached by only 1 of 90 apparently healthy, non-smoking blood-donors. Among 45 patients for whom a complete tumour resection was reported, all patients except 5 showed a drop of C.E.A. to normal values after surgery. The 5 patients whose C.E.A. did not fall to below 5 ng. per ml. showed a subsequent rise in C.E.A. level and were all found later to have a tumour relapse. The results indicate that an incomplete drop of circulating C.E.A. level one month after surgery has a bad prognostic significance. 22 of these patients were followed up by repeated C.E.A. radioimmunoassay for several months after surgery. 8 showed a progressive increase in C.E.A. levels preceding clinical diagnosis of tumour relapse by two to ten months. 6 other patients showed a moderate increase in C.E.A. levels, suggesting a tumour relapse not yet clinically detectable. The remaining 8 patients showed no increase in C.E.A. level above 5 ng. per ml. and no clinical symptoms of relapse. The results demonstrate that relapses of colon and rectum carcinoma can be detected by increased C.E.A. levels months before the appearance of any clinical evidence.Carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in colonic cancer. Use in preoperative and postoperative diagnosis and prognosis.